Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5161.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:2025-2027 FISCAL BIENNIUMNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) This budget reflects the valuable contributions of Senator Bill Ramos, who served as a member of the Transportation Budget Cabinet in both the Senate and the House of Representatives during his tenure in the legislature. Senator Ramos committed his life to public service and the improvement of the state of Washington and its transportation system. The legislature dedicates this transportation budget in loving memory of our friend and colleague Senator Bill Ramos (1956-2025).(2) The transportation budget of the state is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth, the several amounts specified, or as much thereof as may be necessary to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated from the several accounts and funds named to the designated state agencies and offices for employee compensation and other expenses, for capital projects, and for other specified purposes, including the payment of any final judgments arising out of such activities, for the period ending June 30, 2027.(3) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this subsection apply throughout this act.(a) "Fiscal year 2026" or "FY 2026" means the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.(b) "Fiscal year 2027" or "FY 2027" means the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.(c) "FTE" means full-time equivalent.(d) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an unappropriated status.(e) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only for the specified purpose. Unless otherwise specifically authorized in this act, any portion of an amount provided solely for a specified purpose that is not expended subject to the specified conditions and limitations to fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.(f) "Reappropriation" means appropriation and, unless the context clearly provides otherwise, is subject to the relevant conditions and limitations applicable to appropriations.(g) "LEAP" means the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee.(End of part)GENERAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIESâOPERATINGNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 101. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATIONMotor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$588,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 102. FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSIONGrade Crossing Protective AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$504,000Pilotage AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$150,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$654,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 103. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTMotor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$216,000Puget Sound Ferry Operations AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$132,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$348,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 104. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONMotor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,186,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The entire motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for road maintenance purposes.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 105. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTUREMotor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,530,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 106. FOR THE LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEEMotor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$759,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 107. FOR THE OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISESMove Ahead WA Flexible AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$3,020,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: (1) The entire move ahead WA flexible accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for increasing the number of certified women and minority-owned contractors in the transportation sector statewide, with priority given to areas outside of the Puget Sound area and supporting these contractors to successfully compete and earn more transportation contracting opportunities. This purpose must be accomplished through various programs including, but not limited to: (a) Outreach to women and minority-owned business communities and individuals; (b) technical assistance, mentorship, and consultation as needed in areas such as financing, accounting, contracting, procurement, and resolution of disputes and grievances; (c) language access programs for those with limited English proficiency; (d) developing a truck rotation program to allow smaller minority and women-owned trucking companies to pool their resources and compete with larger scale trucking operations; and (e) other programs that aim to increase the number of women and minority contractors that are successful in obtaining contracts in the transportation sector directly with state agencies such as the department, with local jurisdictions, or as subcontractors for prime contractors. The office may revise program standards, as needed, with legislative consultation.(2) The office of minority and women's business enterprises and the department of transportation's office of equity and civil rights must develop two new business-size thresholds within the office's certification program. The two new thresholds must include emerging small businesses and rising small businesses with gross receipts of no more than (a) $3,000,000 and (b) $10,000,000. This work must evaluate all state-funded contracts over $50,000,000 for emerging small business goals, rising small business goals, small business goals, or any combination thereof. The office of equity and civil rights and the office of minority and women's business enterprises must submit a report to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature by November 1, 2025, on this work and any recommendations on next steps.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 108. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCECarbon Emissions Reduction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$4,920,000Aeronautics AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$6,850,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,000,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$13,770,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $4,920,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely for a tribal electric boat grant program. Federally recognized tribes, tribal enterprises, and tribal members are eligible to apply for grant funds for the purchase of or conversion to electric motors and engines for fishing vessels.(2) $6,850,000 of the aeronautics accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a Cascadia sustainable aviation fuel institute or accelerator to advance sustainable aviation fuel ecosystem build out, develop regional partnerships, and promote market adoption of sustainable aviation fuel within Washington state and the entire Cascadia region.(3) $2,000,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to Snohomish county for preconstruction and site readiness activities related to the sustainable aviation fuel research and development center at Paine Field.(4)(a) The interagency electric vehicle coordinating council created under RCW 43.392.030, through its industry electric vehicle advisory committee or another appropriate ad hoc committee, must address electric vehicle charger infrastructure property crime. For purposes of this subsection, the committee may include the following additional members:(i) One representative of the Washington state attorney general's office;(ii) One representative of a law enforcement agency or association whereby electric vehicle charger property crime is impacting the agency's or association's jurisdiction specializing in theft prevention or property crimes;(iii) One representative of a recycled materials association or trade organization operating in the state of Washington with experience in nonferrous metals recycling;(iv) Two representatives from the electric vehicle services equipment industry whereby both level 2 and level 3 charging providers are included;(v) One representative from a local governmental agency or association representing a city whereby electric vehicle charger property crime is impacting the agency's or association's community;(vi) One representative from a power utility whereby electric vehicle charger property crime is impacting the utility's service territory;(vii) One representative from a county whereby electric vehicle charger property crime is impacting the county;(viii) Two representatives of a neighborhood or community advocacy group from communities heavily impacted by metal theft or illegal recycling activities;(ix) One representative with technical expertise in the electric vehicle charging industry;(x) One representative of the workforce performing electric vehicle charger installations;(xi) One representative of electric vehicle charging station site hosts;(xii) One representative of electric vehicle drivers; and(xiii) Any other representative deemed necessary by the council, including representatives from organizations or industries with technical expertise or representing communities with lived experience.(b) Based on the advice of the committee, the interagency electric vehicle coordinating council shall:(i) Provide guidance and recommendations on actions to reduce instances of electric vehicle charger property crime in the state of Washington;(ii) Be available to respond to Washington legislator questions or requests related to electric vehicle charger property crime;(iii) Submit its findings, recommendations, and activities as part of the interagency electric vehicle coordinating council's annual report to the appropriate committees of the legislature.(c) The interagency electric vehicle coordinating council shall ensure the committee meets and reports at council meetings regularly.(d) Proprietary information identified by private sector entities and provided to any member agency of the interagency electric vehicle coordinating council to inform the implementation of this subsection is exempt from disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.(5) The department shall provide information related to emission reductions resulting from fuel conversion activities funded with appropriations from the carbon emissions reduction account to the joint transportation committee in accordance with section 814, chapter . . ., Laws of 2025 (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5801) (transportation resources).(6) The department of commerce is required to convene a work group that includes representatives from cities, counties, ports, fire protection districts, regional fire protection service authorities, public hospital districts, library districts, the office of the state treasurer, the Washington economic development association, county assessors, and other impacted stakeholders to develop a common understanding of tax increment financing and make recommendations to the legislature on improvements and reforms to tax increment financing. In performing its duties, the work group may invite the participation of third-party professionals, such as bond counsel, economists, and project finance experts. A report, with any findings and recommendations, shall be made to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 15, 2025. NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 109. FOR THE BOARD OF PILOTAGE COMMISSIONERSPilotage AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$3,335,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 110. FOR THE ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCILMotor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$987,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 111. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESCarbon Emissions Reduction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$12,000,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) $12,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for zero emission electric vehicle supply equipment infrastructure at facilities to accommodate charging station installations. The electric vehicle charging equipment must be coordinated with the state efficiency and environmental performance program. The department must prioritize locations based on state efficiency and environmental performance location priorities and where zero emission fleet vehicles are located or are scheduled to be purchased.(b) The department shall report when and where the equipment was installed and the state agencies and facilities that benefit from the installation of the charging station to the fiscal committees of the legislature by January 2, 2027, with an interim report due January 2, 2026. The department shall collaborate with the interagency electric vehicle coordinating council to implement this section and must work to meet benchmarks established in chapter 182, Laws of 2022 (transportation resources).(2) The department, with the assistance of designated staff in the Washington state department of transportation, must register for the clean fuels credit program and track revenue generation pursuant to chapter 70A.535 RCW for investments funded in an omnibus transportation appropriations act.(3) The department must provide a report to the transportation committees of the legislature that estimates current biennial and future carbon reduction impacts resulting from zero-emission electric vehicles and supply equipment infrastructure funded in this section by June 30, 2027.(4) The department shall provide information related to emission reductions resulting from fuel conversion activities funded with appropriations from the carbon emissions reduction account to the joint transportation committee in accordance with section 814, chapter . . ., Laws of 2025 (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5801) (transportation resources).NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 112. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYModel Toxics Control Capital AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$15,715,000Carbon Emissions Reduction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$39,840,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$55,555,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $15,715,000 of the model toxics control capital accountâstate appropriation and $38,340,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the department to provide grants to transition from diesel school buses and other student transport vehicles to zero emission vehicles and for the necessary fueling infrastructure needed for zero emission student transportation. The department must prioritize school districts serving tribes and vulnerable populations in overburdened communities as defined under RCW 70A.02.010. Up to five percent of the appropriation in this section may be used for technical assistance and grant administration.(2) $1,500,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide one or more nonproject environmental impact statements for alternative jet fuel production pathways, including blending and distribution infrastructure.(3) The department shall provide information related to emission reductions resulting from fuel conversion activities funded with appropriations from the carbon emissions reduction account to the joint transportation committee in accordance with section 814, chapter . . ., Laws of 2025 (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5801) (transportation resources).NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 113. FOR THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNORState Patrol Highway AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$718,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The entire state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to the state office of equity to contract with an independent consultant to conduct the studies, evaluations, and reporting functions required in RCW 43.06D.060(2), and for the office to conduct the work specified in RCW 43.06D.060 (1) and (3).NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 114. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGEAeronautics AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$94,000Highway Safety AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$108,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$202,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The entire aeronautics accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy to:(a) Conduct an independent assessment of the passenger and air cargo forecasts cited in the Puget Sound regional council regional aviation baseline study, including an evaluation of the underlying data, assumptions, methodologies, and calculation of the level of uncertainty around the forecast;(b) Conduct a comprehensive literature review to identify effective national and international strategies to reduce demand for air travel, including diverting such demand to other modes and whether such diversion avoids net environmental impacts to overburdened communities and vulnerable populations;(c) Conduct a review of existing operational and technological enhancements to address environmental impacts from commercial aviation activities, including, but not limited to, climate friendly routing of aircraft, innovations intended to address the climate change effects of noncarbon dioxide emissions from aviation activities, simulation models applied to congested airports, and online tools to track, analyze, and improve carbon footprints related to aviation activities. The review should identify the feasibility of enhancements to be deployed in the state of Washington; and(d) Provide a report to the office of the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 31, 2025.(2)(a) $108,000 of highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy, in consultation with the Washington traffic safety commission and other entities as it deems appropriate, to develop an inventory of evidence-based, research-based, policies and programs aimed at reducing impaired driving and the resulting traffic fatalities and serious injuries.(b) The institute must create an inventory of the national and international research associated with the following impaired driving public policies and programs:(i) Lowering the blood alcohol concentration for purposes of impaired driving from the current .08 level;(ii) Sobriety checkpoints; and(iii) Increased enforcement and penalties.(c) By June 30, 2026, the institute shall publish a report with information identifying the projected costs and benefits of implementing the policies and programs identified in (b) of this subsection, including an assessment of the comparative benefits associated with each policy and program. The report may also include recommendations on future research in this area.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 115. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONMultimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,500,000Move Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$540,000Move Ahead WA Flexible AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$5,000,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$8,040,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $5,000,000 of the move ahead WA flexible accountâstate appropriation and $2,300,000 of the multimodal transportation account are provided solely for the University of Washington's sidewalk inventory and accessibility mapping project to develop a public dataset under an open license and develop the tools needed to publish that data according to an open data specification. The project must include, but is not limited to, utilization of existing data sources, imagery, detailed surveys, and manually collected, detailed data for city streets, county rural and urban local access roads and collectors/arterials, state roads of all types, and roads owned by other entities. The project may draw on partially developed sidewalk data for all state facilities. To the extent practicable, the final product must be suitable for use by the department of transportation, local and regional agencies, tribal governments, and the general public. A project status report is due to the transportation committees of the legislature on December 1st of each year until the work is completed.(2) $540,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Washington state transportation center to continue the WSDOT-UW professional master's degree fellowship program, to continue department of transportation engineering internships, and to encourage more students to consider careers in transportation, engineering, and related fields.(3) $200,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the University of Washington's mobility innovation center to conduct transportation-related research in partnership with the department of transportation, private sector, and local transportation agencies.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 116. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITYAeronautics AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,200,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $1,200,000 of the aeronautics accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to Washington State University for staff and support services for the temporary sustainable aviation fuel research and development center at Paine Field.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 117. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUEMotor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$2,460,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $2,460,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5801), Laws of 2025 (transportation resources). If chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5801), Laws of 2025 is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this section lapses.(End of part)TRANSPORTATION AGENCIESâOPERATINGNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 201. FOR THE WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMISSIONHighway Safety AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$9,794,000Highway Safety AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$39,998,000Highway Safety AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$60,000Cooper Jones Active Transportation Safety AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$400,000School Zone Safety AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$850,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$51,102,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $600,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the commission to purchase telematics data from a qualified vendor that provides anonymized information on vehicle speeds and driver behaviors, such as hard braking, on a statewide basis and in selected geographical areas based upon demographic characteristics and crash history. The commission must provide an annual report summarizing findings from the telematics data to the transportation committees of the legislature beginning by June 30, 2025, and until June 30, 2027.(2) $1,500,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a pilot program for dedicated probation or compliance officers at the local level to improve compliance with ignition interlock device installation requirements associated with impaired driving offenses. The commission must select locations based on an assessment of ignition interlock device compliance rates, and the willingness and ability to have staff dedicated to this activity. The commission must provide to the transportation committees of the legislature a preliminary status report on the specific locations selected and any outcome information by December 1, 2025, with a final report due by June 30, 2027.(3) $2,000,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to implement a multifaceted approach to supplement existing funding targeted at impaired driving and other enforcement. The areas of emphasis expected to be funded include additional high visibility enforcement and indigenous knowledge-informed tribal traffic safety support. Funding is also provided for the commission to administer and provide oversight of these activities. The commission must provide a preliminary report to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management on these funded activities and any outcome information by December 1, 2025, with a final report due by December 1, 2026.(4) $350,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to complete an annual report on impacts of the automated traffic safety cameras used in the state as required in RCW 46.63.220(6)(b)(ii), beginning July 1, 2026.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 202. FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARDRural Arterial Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$4,059,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$3,532,000County Arterial Preservation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$4,549,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$12,140,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Within appropriated funds, the county road administration board may opt in as provided under RCW 70A.02.030 to assume all of the substantive and procedural requirements of covered agencies under chapter 70A.02 RCW. The board shall include in its 2025 and 2026 annual reports to the legislature a progress report on opting into the healthy environment for all act and a status report on diversity, equity, and inclusion within the board's jurisdiction. The county road administration board may revise program standards, as needed, with legislative consultation.(2) $2,500,000 of the rural arterial trust accountâstate appropriation and $2,500,000 of the county arterial preservation accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for a grant program to assist counties and cities with the costs associated with obtaining a new federal highway administration load rating for bridges to accommodate legal loads as authorized under RCW 46.44.041.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 203. FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARDTransportation Improvement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$4,771,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Within appropriated funds, the transportation improvement board may opt in as provided under RCW 70A.02.030 to assume all of the substantive and procedural requirements of covered agencies under chapter 70A.02 RCW. The board shall include in its 2025 and 2026 annual reports to the legislature a progress report on opting into the healthy environment for all act and a status report on diversity, equity, and inclusion within the board's jurisdiction. The transportation improvement board may revise program standards, as needed, with legislative consultation.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 204. FOR THE JOINT TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEECarbon Emissions Reduction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$624,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$3,379,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$350,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$4,353,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $75,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is for the joint transportation committee, in collaboration with the facilities program within the department of transportation, to evaluate the cost and benefits associated with having the facilities program take on full responsibility for planning and support of some or all of the facilities currently operated by the Washington state ferries. The joint transportation committee must provide a preliminary assessment, including any recommendations, by December 1, 2025. The joint transportation committee must prepare a final report, including any recommendations, by October 1, 2026.(2) $390,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is for the joint transportation committee, from amounts set aside out of statewide fuel taxes distributed to cities according to RCW 46.68.110(2), for the following activities:(a) $250,000 is to contract with the association of Washington cities for the contracting for a facilitator for the process of updating the memorandum of understanding reached by the association of Washington cities and the Washington state department of transportation in 2013 for the construction, operations, and maintenance responsibilities for city streets as part of state highways. With the help of the facilitator, a work group must be convened to collaborate on updating the agreement and developing recommendations for maintaining the agreement. Work group participants must consist of six members representing cities, appointed by the association of Washington cities, and six members of the Washington state department of transportation. The final work of the facilitated process must be completed by June 2027.(b) $140,000 is for the joint transportation committee to contract for an update to the 2019 assessment of city transportation funding needs to assess the current state of city transportation funding, identify emerging issues, and recommend funding sources to meet current and future needs. The association of Washington cities and the Washington department of transportation shall provide technical support to the study. The joint transportation committee must issue a report of its findings and recommendations to the transportation committees of the legislature by September 2026.(3) $75,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is for the joint transportation committee to continue the alternative project delivery methods and innovative practices study under section 204(9), chapter 310, Laws of 2024. The next phase of the study must provide additional consultation on collaborative procurement and contracting approaches that may be used by the Washington state department of transportation in public works contracting to increase contract competition and support containing costs and project delivery schedule. A supplemental report on findings and recommendations, including any changes in current practice and statutory requirements, is due to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2025.(4) $274,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is reappropriated for the joint transportation committee for a study of the impacts of implementing California's emissions standards for ocean-going vessels at berth in Titles 13 and 17 of the California Code of Regulations in Washington. The joint transportation committee must report to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 31, 2025.(5) $250,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is for the joint transportation committee to contract with the Freight Policy Transportation Institute of Washington State University to serve as the independent review team to work in coordination with the Washington state department of transportation's analysis, funded in section 217(5) of this act, of highway, road, and freight rail transportation needs, options, and impacts from shifting the movement of freight and goods that currently move by barge through the lower Snake river dams to highways, other roads, and rail.(a) The department shall include the independent review team in all phases of the analysis to enable the team to develop an independent assessment of the analysis, assumptions, stakeholder engagement, and cost and impact estimates. Summary findings from the independent assessment must be provided to the department, the governor's office, and the transportation committees of the legislature on a quarterly basis, with an end of biennium report due to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 31, 2026.(b) The independent review team must conduct an independent stakeholder engagement effort. The river transportation work group must be formed to provide data and guidance to the independent review team for the independent stakeholder engagement effort. The river transportation work group must be made up of stakeholders, including farming and agricultural production, fishing industry, tug and barge operators, shippers and receivers, public ports, railroad operators, cruise lines, the federal highway administration, and the army corps of engineers. Consultations with federally recognized tribes must also occur in coordination with the Washington state department of transportation.(c) The independent review team shall make regular presentations to the joint transportation committee and, by request, to the transportation committees of the legislature.(6) $200,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is for the joint transportation committee to conduct a study and make recommendations on alternative new methods for local governments to fund sidewalk improvements, including but not limited to establishing a sidewalk utility. The study must review revenue options utilized in other states and make evaluations based on fairness, stability, adequacy, regressivity, simplicity, and the effect on economic vitality. The joint transportation committee must submit a preliminary report of findings and recommendations to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 15, 2025. A final report is due to the office of the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by June 30, 2026.(7) $250,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is for the joint transportation committee to review and evaluate administrative, performance, and delivery efficiencies for alternative fuel and zero emission vehicle and vessel and infrastructure programs and other transportation electrification programs funded under the climate commitment act. As part of its review, the committee must analyze previously and currently funded programs under the omnibus operating, capital, and transportation appropriations acts. By October 1, 2026, the committee must provide to the transportation committees of the legislature a report on evaluation findings and recommendations on improvements to program delivery, including the consolidation of any programs, and as to which agency or agencies are appropriate and optimal to administer such climate commitment act funded programs.(8)(a) $100,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is for the joint transportation committee to continue its contract with a national expert on developing inclusive, mixed-income, mixed-use transit-oriented housing to complete a review of transit-oriented development conditions in cities in King, Pierce, Spokane, Clark, and Snohomish counties as described under section 204(13), chapter 310, Laws of 2024.(b) The review must also analyze transit-oriented development housing supply and affordability strategies within chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1491), Laws of 2025, and include any recommendations on how such legislation may be most effectively implemented by local governments. The contracted party shall provide its review to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 15, 2025.(9) $100,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is for the joint transportation committee to oversee the development of tools and methodologies to assist in program delivery evaluation for fuel conversion activity programs that receive appropriations from the carbon emissions reduction account. Program delivery evaluation must include carbon emissions reduction estimates by program and by unit of time, program cost per unit of emission reduction, quantified benefits to vulnerable populations and overburdened communities by program cost, any additional appropriate qualitative and quantitative metrics, and actionable recommendations for improvements in program delivery. A report is due to the transportation committees of the legislature by October 1, 2025.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 205. FOR THE TRANSPORTATION COMMISSIONMotor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$2,105,000Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 ExpressToll Lanes AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$150,000State Route Number 520 Corridor AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$488,000Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$178,000Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$368,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$3,289,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) To generate savings and efficiencies, the commission shall conduct its meetings either in Olympia or virtually.(2) Within the parameters established under RCW 47.56.880, the commission shall review toll revenue performance on the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 corridor and adjust Interstate 405 tolls as appropriate to increase toll revenue to provide sufficient funds for payments of future debt pursuant to RCW 47.10.896 and to support improvements to the corridor. The commission shall consider adjusting maximum toll rates, minimum toll rates, day-of-week rates and time-of-day rates, and restricting direct access ramps to transit and HOV vehicles only, or any combination thereof, in setting tolls to increase toll revenue. The commission is encouraged to make any adjustments to toll rates in coordination with the planned expansion of express toll lanes between the cities of Renton and Bellevue.(3) The commission must evaluate and consider temporary toll rate adjustments for the state route number 99 tunnel to support management of increased demand leading up to and during the 2026 World Cup.(4)(a) $200,000 of the state route number 520 corridor accountâstate appropriation and $200,000 of the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the commission, in coordination with the department of transportation, to conduct a pilot or pilots of advanced tolling technology provided by the private sector. The purpose of this pilot or pilots will be to assess the viability and accuracy of advanced technologies that may reduce the implementation and long-term costs of the toll system or enable more flexible operations. The commission shall retain a separate independent third-party vendor or vendors who can provide expert oversight, guidance, and advisement on the work, including: The pilot design; the evaluation plan; data analysis; and reporting on findings.(b) A final report of findings is due to the transportation committees of the legislature by July 1, 2026. The report must, at a minimum: Outline the technology tested; provide a comparison of system performance, operations, costs, and revenue collection efficiencies between the test system or test systems and the roadway toll system in use today; assess the requirements for achieving compatibility with the existing back-office system; provide a summary of how lessons learned from the pilot or pilots were incorporated into the planned procurement of new roadside toll systems; and provide recommendations on next steps.(5) The commission shall partner with the department of transportation to design and implement a toll relief program based upon income qualification. Implementation must start with facilities where tolling begins in fiscal year 2026 or later. The commission shall work with the department of transportation to assess potential impacts of extending the toll relief program based upon income qualification to existing tolled facilities that opened prior to fiscal year 2026. The assessment, at a minimum, must determine potential impacts to meeting current financial and legal requirements in place for each facility. The commission, in partnership with the department of transportation, shall provide annual updates on the program to the transportation committees of the legislature.(6) The commission shall provide regular updates on the status of ongoing coordination with the state of Oregon regarding toll rates and exemptions. Prior to finalizing tolling proposals, the commission shall advise on the status of any bistate agreements to the joint transportation committee beginning in September 2025 and quarterly thereafter until any agreements are finalized.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 206. FOR THE FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARDFreight Mobility Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,412,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Within appropriated funds, the freight mobility strategic investment board may opt in as provided under RCW 70A.02.030 to assume all of the substantive and procedural requirements of covered agencies under chapter 70A.02 RCW. The board shall include in its 2025 and 2026 annual reports to the legislature a progress report on opting into the healthy environment for all act and a status report on diversity, equity, and inclusion within the board's jurisdiction. The freight mobility strategic investment board may revise program standards, as needed, with legislative consultation.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 207. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROLAlaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$42,000State Patrol Highway AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$710,586,000State Patrol Highway AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$24,001,000State Patrol Highway AccountâPrivate/LocalAppropriation. . . .$4,603,000Highway Safety AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$10,276,000Ignition Interlock Device Revolving AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,705,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$328,000State Route Number 520 Corridor AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$90,000Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$274,000I-405 and SR 167 Express Toll Lanes AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,894,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$755,799,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $580,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the operation of and administrative support to the license investigation unit to enforce vehicle registration laws in southwestern Washington. The Washington state patrol, in consultation with the department of revenue, shall maintain a running estimate of the additional vehicle registration fees, sales and use taxes, and local vehicle fees remitted to the state pursuant to activity conducted by the license investigation unit. Beginning October 1, 2025, and semiannually thereafter, the Washington state patrol shall submit a report detailing the additional revenue amounts generated since July 1, 2023, to the director of the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature. At the end of the fiscal quarter in which it is estimated that more than $625,000 in state sales and use taxes have been remitted to the state since July 1, 2023, the Washington state patrol shall notify the state treasurer and the state treasurer shall transfer funds pursuant to section 406 of this act.(2)(a) $250,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the activities of a vehicle registration pilot program in the Puget Sound region. The pilot program must emphasize compliance with annual vehicle registration requirements. By February 15, 2026, the Washington state patrol must provide a status report on pilot program implementation.(b) The Washington state patrol must provide information on the funding needed and a preliminary plan for statewide implementation of activities related to ensuring compliance with annual vehicle registration in the report under (a) of this subsection.(3) Washington state patrol officers engaged in off-duty uniformed employment providing traffic control services to the department of transportation or other state agencies may use state patrol vehicles for the purpose of that employment, subject to guidelines adopted by the chief of the Washington state patrol. The Washington state patrol must be reimbursed for the use of the vehicle at the prevailing state employee rate for mileage and hours of usage, subject to guidelines developed by the chief of the Washington state patrol.(4)(a) By December 1st of each year during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the Washington state patrol must report to the transportation committees of the legislature on the status of recruitment and retention activities as follows:(i) A summary of recruitment and retention strategies;(ii) The number of transportation funded staff vacancies by major category;(iii) The number of applicants for each of the positions by these categories;(iv) The composition of workforce;(v) Other relevant outcome measures with comparative information with recent comparable months in prior years; and(vi) Activities related to the implementation of the agency's workforce diversity plan, including short-term and long-term, specific comprehensive outreach, and recruitment strategies to increase populations underrepresented within both commissioned and noncommissioned employee groups.(b) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the office of financial management, with assistance of the Washington state patrol, must conduct two surveys regarding the competitiveness with law enforcement agencies within the boundaries of the state of Washington pursuant to RCW 43.43.380, with the first survey being informational regarding the change since the last survey was conducted and the second survey used as part of the collective bargaining process. Prior to the 2026 legislative session, the office of financial management, with assistance of the Washington state patrol, must also provide comparison information regarding recruitment bonus amounts currently being offered by local law enforcement agencies in the state.(5)(a) $8,504,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the land mobile radio system replacement, upgrade, and other related activities.(b) Beginning January 1, 2026, the Washington state patrol must report semiannually to the office of the chief information officer on the progress related to the projects and activities associated with the land mobile radio system, including the governance structure, outcomes achieved in the prior six-month time period, and how the activities are being managed holistically as recommended by the office of the chief information officer. At the time of submittal to the office of the chief information officer, the report must be transmitted to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature.(6)(a) $2,610,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for enhancing the state patrol's diversity, equity, and inclusion program, a community engagement program to improve relationships with historically underrepresented communities and to recruit and retain a diverse workforce, and contracting with an external psychologist to perform exams. The state patrol must work with the state office of equity and meet all reporting requirements and responsibilities pursuant to RCW 43.06D.060. Funds provided for the community engagement program must ensure engagement with communities throughout the state.(b) The state patrol may revise program standards, as needed, with legislative consultation.(7)(a) $7,552,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for costs associated with the work zone speed safety camera pilot program with the amounts for specific activities as follows:(i) $2,353,000 for the Washington state patrol's oversight, administrative, overtime, and other costs associated with the processing of work zone speed violations;(ii) $3,990,000 for interagency reimbursements to the office of administrative hearings for adjudication related expenses associated with work zone speed violations; and(iii) $1,209,000 for interagency reimbursements to the office of attorney general for legal guidance and adjudication related expenses associated with work zone speed violations.(b) By December 1st of each year during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the Washington state patrol, in conjunction with the other agencies involved in the work zone speed safety camera pilot program, must report on the number of deployments and locations, workload, violations issued, detailed expenses incurred by each agency in the pilot program, and efficiency measures each agency is taking in operating the pilot program in the most cost-effective manner possible.(8) $1,668,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for three accelerated training programs for lateral hires. It is the intent of the legislature that the three accelerated training programs for lateral hires offered in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium achieve at least 30 qualified graduates based on the Washington state patrol aggressively recruiting, advertising bonus policies, and taking other steps to achieve this outcome.(9) By December 1, 2026, the Washington state patrol must provide a report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature on the status of McClain v. Washington State Patrol and an update on legal expenses associated with the case.(10) $7,572,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for one additional trooper basic training class with troopers graduating in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium and funding to initiate an additional trooper basic training class with troopers graduating in the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium.(11) Within existing resources, the Washington state patrol must offer a minimum of 14 emergency vehicle operator courses per year at its Shelton driving track exclusively for basic law enforcement academies offered by the criminal justice training commission.(12) It is the intent of the legislature to address any demographic disparities that might exist regarding traffic stops initiated by troopers, including traffic stops of indigenous motorists. Therefore, within the amounts provided in this section, the Washington state patrol must provide a report to the joint transportation committee by October 1, 2025, detailing the demographic breakout of traffic stops for each of the most recent three calendar years for which data is available. The report must include counts and per capita rates for each demographic group on: (a) Traffic stops; (b) verbal warnings; (c) written warnings; (d) citation issuance; (e) arrests; and (f) searches. The joint transportation committee must hold a work session on the traffic stop report by December 15, 2025. If deemed warranted, the joint transportation committee shall make recommendations to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature on future funding adjustments or other actions necessary to address any demographic disparities identified in the report.(13) $800,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for increased chain enforcement on Interstate 90 in the area around Snoqualmie Pass. The legislature intends that the Washington state patrol, pursuant to RCW 46.37.005, require commercial vehicles to carry chains statewide during winter months and, in coordination with the department of transportation, develop a process for monitoring compliance at weigh stations.(14) $3,500,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to address emergent issues that may arise due to the high level of commissioned and noncommissioned vacancies. Potential uses of the funding include the following: Employee leave buyouts, increased contracting to maintain adequate service levels, unanticipated facility and equipment needs, increased overtime, travel, and other related costs.(15) $3,000,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for hiring additional staff and purchasing equipment for the toxicology laboratory to reduce the DUI processing backlog, with the expectation that processing times will be reduced. Beginning December 1, 2025, and semiannually thereafter, the state patrol must report on the activities undertaken and planned with the funding provided in this subsection and current DUI processing times compared to those as of June 2025.(16) $4,500,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for updates and improvements to the agency's wide area and local area network.(17) $5,000,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to enhance the vehicle replacement cycle for higher mileage vehicles in the agency's fleet.(18)(a) $3,644,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for administrative costs, advertising, outreach, and bonus payments associated with developing and implementing a state trooper expedited recruitment incentive program for the purpose of recruiting and filling vacant trooper positions in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium. The legislature is committed to continuing the state trooper expedited recruitment incentive program until the vacancy levels are significantly reduced from current levels. The recruitment, advertising, and outreach associated with this program must continue efforts to create a more diverse workforce and must also provide an accelerated pathway for joining the state patrol for high quality individuals who have previously been employed as a general authority peace officer.(b) The state trooper expedited recruitment incentive program must include:(i) Thorough hiring procedures to ensure that only the highest quality candidates are selected as cadets and as lateral hires, including extensive review of past law enforcement employment history through extensive reference checks, Brady list identification, and any other issues that may impact the performance, credibility, and integrity of the individual;(ii) An accelerated training program for lateral hires from other agencies that recognizes the knowledge and experience of candidates previously employed in law enforcement; and(iii) A sign-on bonus for each trooper hired through the expedited recruitment incentive program as follows:(A) $5,000 for each cadet after completion of the Washington state patrol academy;(B) $5,000 for each successful graduating cadet after completion of a one-year probation period;(C) $8,000 for each lateral hire after completion of the accelerated training program for lateral hires;(D) $6,000 for each lateral hire after completion of a one-year probation period; and(E) $6,000 for each lateral hire after completion of two years of service.(c) The expenditures on the state trooper expedited recruitment incentive program are contingent upon execution of an appropriate memorandum of understanding between the governor or the governor's designee and the exclusive bargaining representative, consistent with the terms of this section.(d) For the purposes of this subsection:(i) "Cadet" means a person employed for the express purpose of receiving the on-the-job training required for attendance at the Washington state patrol academy and for becoming a commissioned trooper.(ii) "Lateral hire" means an eligible employee previously employed as a general authority peace officer.(19) $2,178,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to continue the bonus policy for commissioned staff who reach 26 or more years of service in the Washington state retirement system pursuant to chapter 237, Laws of 2024.(20) $600,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for staffing and security equipment for Washington state patrol to staff the international border crossing and provide support for the department of homeland security, during the months of June and July 2026 for the purposes of the World Cup, to facilitate border crossings and screening against human trafficking, narcotics trafficking, unlawful crossings, and other unlawful activity.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 208. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSINGDriver Licensing Technology Support AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,765,000Marine Fuel Tax Refund AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$34,000Motorcycle Safety Education AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$5,382,000Limited Fish and Wildlife AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$495,000Highway Safety AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$289,511,000Highway Safety AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$1,311,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$94,639,000Motor Vehicle AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$1,336,000Ignition Interlock Device Revolving AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$6,831,000Department of Licensing Services AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$8,585,000License Plate Technology AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$3,747,000Abandoned Recreational Vehicle AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$3,109,000Limousine Carriers AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$128,000Electric Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$459,000DOL Technology Improvement & Data ManagementAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$968,000Agency Financial Transaction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$16,317,000Move Ahead WA Flexible AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,506,000Driver's Education Safety Improvement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$10,460,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$446,583,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $1,100,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation and $1,100,000 of the move ahead WA flexible accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the department to provide an interagency transfer to the department of children, youth, and families for the purpose of providing driver's license support. In addition to support services required under RCW 74.13.338(2), support services may include reimbursement of:(a) The cost for a youth in foster care of any eligible age to complete a driver training education course, as outlined in chapter 46.82 or 28A.220 RCW;(b) The costs incurred by foster youth in foster care for a motor vehicle insurance policy;(c) The costs of roadside assistance, motor vehicle insurance deductibles, motor vehicle registration fees, towing services, vehicle maintenance, comprehensive motor vehicle insurance, and gas cards; and(d) Any other costs related to obtaining a driver's license and driving legally and safely.(2)(a) $2,200,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for organizations providing driver's license assistance and support services.(b) By December 1st of each year during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the department must submit information on the contracted providers, including: The annual budget of the contracted providers in the preceding year; information regarding private and other governmental support for the activities of the providers; and a description of the number of people served, services delivered, and outcome measures.(3) Within existing resources, the department must continue to issue nonemergency medical transportation vehicle decals under the high occupancy vehicle lane access pilot program in accordance with sections 217(2) and 208(20), chapter 310, Laws of 2024.(4)(a) $3,109,000 of the abandoned recreational vehicle disposal accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for providing reimbursements in accordance with the department's abandoned recreational vehicle disposal reimbursement program. It is the intent of the legislature that the department prioritize this funding for allowable and approved reimbursements and not to build a reserve of funds within the account. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the department must report any amounts recovered to the office of financial management and appropriate committees of the legislature on a quarterly basis.(b) Within the amounts appropriated under this subsection, the department, after consulting with abandoned recreational vehicle disposal reimbursement program participants, must assess current practices and reimbursement rates associated with the fiscal sustainability of the program. By December 1, 2025, the department must submit a financial plan demonstrating sustainability for a minimum of two subsequent fiscal biennia at current or proposed fee rates.(5)(a) Within existing resources, the department, in collaboration with the Washington traffic safety commission, must evaluate and develop a proposal, including any statutory recommendations, to require a safe driving course for drivers who are repeat offenders of civil traffic violations but before a safe driving course would be required for driver's license reinstatement under RCW 46.20.2892.(b) The department must submit the proposal to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 15, 2026.(6) The department shall report on a quarterly basis on licensing service office operations, associated workload, and information with comparative information with recent comparable months in prior years. The report must include detailed statewide and by licensing service office information on staffing levels, average monthly wait times, the number of enhanced drivers' licenses and enhanced identicards issued and renewed, and the number of primary drivers' licenses and identicards issued and renewed. By November 1, 2025, the department must update a report with recommendations on the future of licensing service office operations based on the recent implementation of efficiency measures designed to reduce the time for licensing transactions and wait times, and the implementation of statutory and policy changes.(7) $6,000 of the motorcycle safety education accountâstate appropriation, $1,000 of the limited fish and wildlife accountâstate appropriation, $406,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation, $137,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation, $5,000 of the ignition interlock device revolving accountâstate appropriation, and $6,000 of the department of licensing services accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the department of licensing for additional finance and budget staff. By December 1, 2025, the department shall submit a report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature on the specific steps the department has taken to address the findings of the State Auditor's Office FY2022 Accountability Audit Report No. 1032793.(8) $50,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to conduct a study on the feasibility of implementing and administering a per mile fee program. The study must identify the staffing and resources needed to implement and administer the program, including possible technical investments, leveraging existing technology platforms. The legislature intends to require a final report that includes potential third-party costs and options to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 31, 2025.(9)(a) $300,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to enter into an interagency agreement with the commission on Asian Pacific American affairs to contract with one or more private nonprofit organizations with appropriate expertise and experience to provide REAL ID compliance support to residents of the state who are compact of free association citizens, comprised of citizens of the Federated States of Micronesia, the Republic of the Marshall Islands, and the Republic of Palau, by providing the following assistance using a culturally and linguistically appropriate approach:(i) Communication and community outreach activities to inform compact of free association citizens of federally acceptable identification options that will be required and for which they are eligible for the purposes of domestic air travel once the REAL ID Act policy takes effect;(ii) Case management assistance through the use of community navigators who can provide assistance in the process to obtain federally acceptable identification documents that will be required for the purposes of domestic air travel when the REAL ID Act policy is in effect, including in obtaining any documentation necessary for the application process; and(iii) For those who meet the requirements of (b) of this subsection, financial assistance to obtain federally acceptable identification documents that will be required for the purposes of domestic air travel when the REAL ID Act policy is in effect, including financial assistance to obtain a foreign passport.(b) To qualify for assistance under (a)(ii) of this subsection (9), a compact of free association citizen who resides in the state of Washington must be:(i) A recipient of, or eligible for, public assistance under Title 74 RCW; or(ii) A participant in, or eligible for, the Washington women, infants, and children program.(10) $173,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter . . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5127), Laws of 2025 (improving collector vehicle regulations). If chapter . . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5127), Laws of 2025 is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(11) $19,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter . . . (Senate Bill No. 5234), Laws of 2025 (snowmobile fees). If chapter . . . (Senate Bill No. 5234), Laws of 2025 is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(12) $44,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter . . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5410), Laws of 2025 (veteran parking privileges) or chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1371), Laws of 2025 (veteran parking privileges). If neither chapter . . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5410), Laws of 2025 or chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1371), Laws of 2025 are enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(13) $4,971,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter . . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5444), Laws of 2025 (special license plates). If chapter . . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5444), Laws of 2025 is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(14) $36,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter . . . (Senate Bill No. 5462), Laws of 2025 (vehicle inspection backlog). If chapter . . . (Senate Bill No. 5462), Laws of 2025 is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(15) $64,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter . . . (Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5689), Laws of 2025 (blood type information). If chapter . . . (Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5689), Laws of 2025 is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(16) $150,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to send periodic notifications to vehicle owners with significantly expired vehicle registrations to increase compliance with annual vehicle registration requirements. Notifications must contain information about vehicle registration requirements and possible penalties associated with operating a vehicle with an expired registration.(17) $726,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5801), Laws of 2025 (transportation resources). If chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5801), Laws of 2025 is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection lapses. Of this amount:(a) $256,000 is provided solely for the implementation of new revenues; and(b) $470,000 is provided solely for the department to implement a program to compensate registered tow truck operators for private property impounds.(18) $50,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to translate the driver licensing examination manual and knowledge test into Dari, Farsi, and Somali.(19) $7,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . ., Laws of 2025 (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1113) (misdemeanor dismissal). If chapter . . ., Laws of 2025 (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1113) is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(20) $106,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . ., Laws of 2025 (House Bill No. 1244) (driver training alternative). If chapter . . ., Laws of 2025 (House Bill No. 1244) is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(21) $1,081,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . ., Laws of 2025 (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1596) (speeding). If chapter . . ., Laws of 2025 (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1596) is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(22) $100,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the development of an implementation plan for digital driver's license capability on mobile phones, including needed legislation for introduction in the 2026 legislative session. It is the legislative intent to provide $3,870,000 in funding, adjusted as appropriate, for the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium to implement the digital driver's license by configuring the necessary interfaces with native wallet systems.(23) $2,000,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to continue the DOL2Go program, bringing driver licensing and identicard services to underrepresented and rural communities.(24) $464,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department's costs to provide an interagency transfer to the Washington center for deaf and hard of hearing youth to continue efforts to make driver training education more accessible for deaf and hard of hearing youth in the state.(25) $300,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for additional actions in accordance with the recently completed evaluation of ways to implement an older and medically at-risk driver program.(26) $10,460,000 of the driver education safety improvement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . ., Laws of 2025 (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1878) (young driver safety). If chapter . . ., Laws of 2025 (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1878) is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(27) $22,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . ., Laws of 2025 (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1332) (transportation network companies). If chapter . . ., Laws of 2025 (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1332) is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 209. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâTOLL OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCEâPROGRAM BPuget Sound Gateway Facility AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$7,701,000State Route Number 520 Corridor AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$50,261,000State Route Number 520 Civil Penalties AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,378,000Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$38,652,000Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$26,683,000Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 ExpressToll Lanes AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$42,255,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$167,930,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $1,300,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge accountâstate appropriation and $12,820,000 of the state route number 520 corridor accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the purposes of addressing unforeseen operations and maintenance costs on the Tacoma Narrows bridge and the state route number 520 bridge, respectively. The office of financial management shall place the amounts provided in this subsection, which represent a portion of the required minimum fund balance under the policy of the state treasurer, in unallotted status. The office may release the funds only when it determines that all other funds designated for operations and maintenance purposes have been exhausted.(2) As long as the facility is tolled, the department must provide annual reports to the transportation committees of the legislature on the Interstate 405 express toll lane project performance measures listed in RCW 47.56.880(4). These reports must include:(a) Information on the travel times and travel time reliability (at a minimum, average and 90th percentile travel times) maintained during peak and nonpeak periods in the express toll lanes and general purpose lanes for both the entire corridor and commonly made trips in the corridor including, but not limited to, northbound from Bellevue to Rose Hill, state route number 520 at NE 148th to Interstate 405 at state route number 522, Bellevue to Bothell (both NE 8th to state route number 522 and NE 8th to state route number 527), and a trip internal to the corridor (such as NE 85th to NE 160th) and similar southbound trips; and(b) Underlying congestion measurements, that is, speeds, that are being used to generate the summary graphs provided, to be made available in a digital file format.(3) The department shall make detailed annual reports to the transportation committees of the legislature and the public on the department's website in a manner consistent with past practices as specified in section 209(5), chapter 186, Laws of 2022.(4) As part of the department's 2027-2029 biennial budget request, the department shall update the cost allocation recommendations that assign appropriate costs to each of the toll funds for services provided by relevant Washington state department of transportation programs, the Washington state patrol, and the transportation commission. The recommendations shall be based on updated traffic and toll transaction patterns and other relevant factors.(5) $150,000 of the state route number 520 corridor accountâstate appropriation, $150,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge accountâstate appropriation, $150,000 of the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project accountâstate appropriation, and $150,000 of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the development of a strategic, long-range tolling feasibility assessment that indicates the operational viability and revenue potential for possible future tolled facilities in the state. At a minimum, the department, working in partnership with the transportation commission, shall: Identify candidate projects for modeling analysis utilizing a screening tool that seeks to maximize systemwide performance; determine tolling feasibility and potential gross and net toll revenue for each identified project; consider various approaches to tolling operations and their associated costs; and identify the potential impacts of tolling to surrounding roadways. The strategic tolling feasibility assessment must be submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature by October 1, 2026.(6) As part of its 2026 supplemental budget submittal, the department must submit recommendations to further reduce mailing and other customer correspondence costs over the long-term, including implementation cost estimates.(7) The legislature intends that tolling commence as soon as possible on the I-405 express toll lanes Renton to Bellevue corridor. The legislature intends to provide additional funding for operations and maintenance expenditures on the corridor if such funding is necessary due to earlier than expected tolling commencement.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 210. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâINFORMATION TECHNOLOGYâPROGRAM CMove Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$11,970,000Transportation Partnership AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,472,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$127,544,000Puget Sound Ferry Operations AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$307,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$3,059,000Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)âStateAppropriation. . . .$1,488,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$146,840,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 211. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâFACILITY MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS, AND CONSTRUCTIONâPROGRAM DâOPERATINGMotor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$43,820,000Move Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$2,044,000State Route Number 520 Corridor AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$34,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$45,898,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $2,000,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for tenant improvements and other costs associated with administrative space efficiency actions taken throughout the agency. The department must continue to aggressively pursue office and administrative space efficiency as detailed in recent reports identifying opportunities for savings and cost avoidance, including:(a) Reducing costs, such as leases, facility maintenance, and utilities, from agency consolidations;(b) Implementing colocations with other state, local, and other public agencies to reduce costs and improve cost-efficiency while meeting utilization standards; and(c) Evaluating specific additional opportunities for space efficiency, consolidations, and colocation opportunities associated with the Bellingham engineering field office, the Corson Avenue regional headquarters campus, the Dayton Avenue northwest regional headquarters, and the transportation building in Olympia.(2) By January 1st of each year during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the department must provide a progress report on implementing the actions under subsection (1) of this section in the most recent calendar year and any planned actions in the subsequent two-year period in these efforts.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 212. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâTRANSPORTATION EQUIPMENT FUNDâPROGRAM EMove Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$20,000,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The entire move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department's costs related to replacing obsolete transportation equipment and replacing fuel sites. Beginning December 1, 2025, and annually thereafter, the department must provide a report to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature detailing the current progress on replacing obsolete equipment, progress towards reaching a level purchasing state, and the status of a fuel site replacement prioritization plan. The report must also include:(1) A list of department-owned and managed fuel sites prioritized by urgency of replacement;(2) A status report on the installation and use of fuel site infrastructure that can support zero emission vehicles; and(3) A description of action steps taken in the use of nonappropriated transportation equipment fund resources to maximize the replacement of obsolete equipment and reduce the growing fund balance, including specific modifications to equipment purchasing behavior to increase deployment in the field.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 213. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâAVIATIONâPROGRAM FAeronautics AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$13,398,000Aeronautics AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$2,597,000Aeronautics AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$60,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$16,055,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The department shall submit a report to the transportation committees of the legislature by October 1, 2026, identifying a selection of sustainable aviation projects for funding by the legislature. In considering projects to recommend to fund, the department shall only consider projects that advance the state of sustainable aviation technology and lead to future innovation. Innovative sustainable aviation projects may include, but are not limited to, pilot projects demonstrating the use of:(a) Mobile battery charging technology;(b) Hydrogen electrolyzers and storage;(c) Electric ground equipment; and (d) Hanger charging technology.(2) $500,000 of the aeronautics accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for Snohomish county to conduct a study to plan for and identify on-site or off-site improvements necessary to implement capacity expansion at Paine Field to meet future regional commercial passenger demand.(3) $300,000 of the aeronautics accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Port of Bremerton to conduct the second phase of a feasibility study on the possibility of offering commercial service at the Bremerton National Airport. The department may not require a match for this project.(4) $750,000 of the aeronautics accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the city of Yakima for an overflow parking lot at the Yakima Air Terminal. The department may not require a match for this project.(5) $1,774,000 of the aeronautics accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the commercial aviation work group created in chapter 463, Laws of 2023, specifically for the following activities:(a) The state commercial aviation work group shall comprehensively evaluate the long-range commercial aviation needs of Washington within the broader context of state transportation needs and the specific needs of western Washington taking into consideration airport capacity in adjacent states and provinces. The work group shall review existing data and conduct research to determine Washington's long-range commercial aviation facility needs while considering alternatives to additional airport capacity.(b)(i) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the work group shall investigate the expansion of existing aviation facilities and possible siting locations for new greenfield aviation facilities, with the expected outcome to be a report that compares the strengths and weaknesses of each site considered. In this investigation, the work group shall consider both new sites and those previously identified in previous aviation planning documents. The work group must consider all impacts that, whether by the expansion of a current facility or the location of a new greenfield site, the creation of a new primary commercial aviation facility may have, including impacts on:(A) Community members and quality of life;(B) The environment, including the impacts of a facility on water quality and the ability of the state to meet the greenhouse gas emissions limits established in RCW 70A.45.020;(C) County master plans and other local planning and zoning, including development regulations and comprehensive plans adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW; and(D) Current airspace operations.(ii) The work group shall:(A) Perform outreach to and make efforts to collaborate with:(I) Applicable federal agencies including the federal aviation administration, the United States environmental protection agency, the United States department of defense, and the United States department of energy;(II) Indian tribes, as defined in RCW 43.376.010, through outreach and collaboration by the work group under this subsection does not constitute or substitute for formal government-to-government consultation under the 1989 State-Tribal Relations/Centennial Accord and chapter 43.376 RCW;(III) The environmental community;(IV) Local communities;(V) Economic development agencies;(VI) Other states and provinces as appropriate;(B) Identify potential site infrastructure shortfalls and make recommendations as to how they could be most suitably addressed, including the feasibility of the specific transportation infrastructure required to move people to the potential site. This process includes the delivery of an adequate supply of aircraft fuel and supporting infrastructure along with facilities needed to transition to the use of sustainable aviation fuels;(C) Consider the cost of construction of a facility and supporting infrastructure;(D) In cooperation with the federal aviation administration, analyze:(I) Airspace requirements and airspace restrictions of potential sites;(II) Any possible terrain and man-made obstacles that could possibly create a hazard to aircraft;(III) Local weather patterns and microclimates to determine if they will create issues for the operation of large aircraft; and(E) Carry out other duties as assigned by the legislature.(c) The work group shall not consider:(i) Expansion opportunities for a port or county run airport located in a county with a population of 2,000,000 or more; or(ii) The expansion of an existing airport or the siting of a new airport that would be incompatible with the operations of a military installation.(d) In addition, the work group shall provide information to the transportation committees of the legislature on the future of aviation growth in the state, including potential commercial aviation, general aviation, and air cargo demands, with consideration of new technologies, alternative transportation modes, and the airport of the future.(e) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to endorse, limit, or otherwise alter existing or future plans for capital development and capacity enhancement at existing commercial airports in Washington.(6) $2,100,000 of the aeronautics accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the move ahead WA aviation grants. The department shall prioritize projects eligible for federal funding.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 214. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâPROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORTâPROGRAM HMotor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$70,272,000Motor Vehicle AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$500,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,176,000Move Ahead WA Flexible AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$572,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$72,520,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, if the department takes possession of the property situated in the city of Edmonds for which a purchase agreement was executed between Unocal and the department in 2005 (Tax Parcel Number 262703-2-003-0009), and if the department confirms that the property is still no longer needed for transportation purposes, the department shall provide the city of Edmonds with the first right of purchase at fair market value in accordance with RCW 47.12.063(3) for the city's intended use of the property to rehabilitate near-shore habitat for salmon and related species.(2)(a) $572,000 of the move ahead WA flexible accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to track and maximize clean fuels credits and revenue generated by state agencies pursuant to chapter 70A.535 RCW.(b) The LEAP Transportation Document 2025-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed April 26, 2025, anticipates fulfillment of the requirements under chapter 70A.535 RCW of generating credits and revenue for transportation investments funded in an omnibus transportation appropriations act, including the move ahead WA transportation package. The omnibus transportation appropriations act anticipates credits for ferry electrification for new hybrid electric vessels, active transportation, transit programs and projects, alternative fuel infrastructure, connecting communities, and multimodal investments.(c) Pursuant to the reporting requirements of RCW 70A.535.050(5), the department must present a detailed projection of the credit revenues generated and achieved directly as a result of the funding and activities in this subsection.(3) $350,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely for the department to explore alternative uses of the state's highway rights-of-way consistent with section 214(7), chapter 310, Laws of 2024.(4) The department may not execute a state highway route transfer under RCW 36.75.090 and 47.24.010 without approval from the receiving city or county from July 1, 2025, until June 30, 2026. The department may continue discussions with local jurisdictions regarding state highway route transfers to local jurisdictions that may occur after consideration of the final report and recommendations of the Washington State Route Jurisdiction Study expected by December 2025.(5) The legislature must be consulted before any decisions on parcel numbers 7666206955 and 7666206950 for more than temporary use and before entering into any negotiations, or signing any contracts or lease for development, lease, or sale of those properties.(6) $250,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . ., Laws of 2025 (Substitute House Bill No. 1774) (lease of unused highway land). If chapter . . ., Laws of 2025 (Substitute House Bill No. 1774) is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(7) $285,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . ., Laws of 2025 (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1902) (streamlining of permitting for transportation projects work group). If chapter . . ., Laws of 2025 (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1902) is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 215. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâPUBLIC-PRIVATE PARTNERSHIPSâPROGRAM KMotor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,647,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$200,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâFederalAppropriation. . . .$51,526,000Carbon Emissions Reduction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$167,962,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$221,335,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $25,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the clean alternative fuel vehicle charging and refueling infrastructure program described in RCW 47.04.350.(2) $125,851,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a point-of-sale voucher incentive program, inclusive of costs for program administration and staffing, to encourage the faster adoption of zero-emission medium and heavy-duty vehicles to further state climate goals under RCW 70A.45.020 and state equity goals under chapter 70A.02 RCW. The voucher incentive program must be administered by a third-party administrator that has experience administering voucher incentive programs, with oversight conducted by the department.(a) The voucher program is required to be designed based on the recommendations of the Joint Transportation Committee report Washington State Infrastructure and Incentive Program Design for MHD ZEVs, and to include:(i) Simplified zero-emission vehicle eligibility requirements;(ii) Vehicle and infrastructure incentives aligned with programs in other jurisdictions, where appropriate, to streamline user planning;(iii) Financial enhancements for select populations based on equity considerations, including for vehicles in disadvantaged communities and vehicles to be purchased by small, minority-owned businesses, with consideration for support of the secondary vehicle market;(iv) A centralized user and manufacturer portal for information, application, and assistance;(v) A fleet assistance and qualification program to assist in zero-emission vehicle and infrastructure planning, to be administered by the Washington State University extension energy program in coordination with the department and the voucher program's third-party administrator; and(vi) A voucher preapproval process to evaluate participant eligibility, readiness for fleet deployment, and infrastructure preparedness.(b) The following battery electric and hydrogen fuel cell electric vehicle categories and associated charging, as well as refueling infrastructure for these categories, are eligible for the voucher program, subject to additional qualification criteria to be determined by the department and the voucher program third-party administrator:(i) On-road vehicles from class 2b, heavy work pickups and vans, through class 8, heavy tractor-trailer units and refuse trucks; and(ii) Cargo handling and off-road equipment.(c) School buses and transit vehicles eligible for state grant programs for the purchase of zero-emission vehicles are not eligible for vouchers under this program, but are eligible for fleet assistance provided in association with the voucher program, which must include assistance in determining state and federal grant eligibility for these vehicles.(d) The voucher amounts selected by the department and voucher program third-party administrator must further the policy goals of the program cited in this subsection by offsetting investments required for medium and heavy-duty vehicle and equipment owners to transition to zero-emission vehicles and equipment. The department and voucher program third-party administrator must condition vehicle and infrastructure voucher funding to ensure these program policy goals are furthered through the voucher funding provided.(e) Consistent with voucher program design, the department is required to distribute funds to the voucher program third-party administrator sufficiently in advance of final requirements for voucher distribution being met to facilitate the voucher's timely distribution by the third-party administrator to sellers of zero-emission vehicles and infrastructure.(3)(a) $14,986,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for grants, or to serve as a state match for secured federal funds, to finance hydrogen refueling infrastructure and fueling stations for medium and heavy-duty vehicles and up to two years of hydrogen fueling station operational costs along corridors designated as hydrogen corridors by the state or near or on transit agency, port, or public utility district property, or finance hydrogen fuel cell transportation infrastructure projects. The department, in consultation with the interagency electric vehicle coordinating council, should pursue any federal funding available through the charging and fueling infrastructure discretionary grant program and any other sources under the federal infrastructure investment and jobs act (P.L. 29 117-58), and other public or private funding sources as necessary, to bring hydrogen fueling stations into commercial operation.(b) $2,500,000 of the amount provided in (a) of this subsection is provided solely to Community Transit for a hydrogen fuel cell demonstration project.(c) $200,000 of the amount provided in (a) of this subsection is provided solely for hydrogen fuel cell demonstration projects that provide long term power equipment and fuel for traffic signals at critical intersections during emergencies involving power disruptions or shutoffs.(4) $400,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely for the cities of Bellevue and Redmond to each purchase an electric fire engine.(5) $1,725,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely for a Tacoma Public Utilities medium-duty zero-emission utility service vehicle pilot project that includes charging infrastructure and mobile battery units.(6) $890,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter . . ., Laws of 2025 (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5801) (transportation resources). If chapter . . ., Laws of 2025 (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5801) is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(7) $8,342,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâfederal appropriation is provided solely for the electric vehicle charger reliability and accessibility accelerator program for projects to support the repair or replacement of existing broken or nonoperational publicly accessible chargers.(8) $3,164,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâfederal appropriation is provided solely for funding for the west coast charging and fueling corridor project for two medium and heavy-duty vehicle electric vehicle charging station sites and one site with a hydrogen refueling station along the I-5 corridor.(9) The department shall notify the transportation committees of the legislature if approval of federal funding for department activities under the national electric vehicle infrastructure formula program, the electric vehicle charger reliability and accessibility accelerator program, or the west coast charging and fueling corridor project is permanently revoked.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 216. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâHIGHWAY MAINTENANCEâPROGRAM MMotor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$571,090,000Motor Vehicle AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$7,000,000Move Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$53,675,000Puget Sound Gateway Facility AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$3,402,000RV AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,100,000State Route Number 520 Corridor AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$4,726,000Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,585,000Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$10,752,000Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 ExpressToll Lanes AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$2,624,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$655,954,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $5,000,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a contingency pool for snow and ice removal. The department must notify the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature when they have spent the base budget for snow and ice removal and will begin using the contingency pool funding.(2) $25,000,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for repair and replacement of traffic barriers including, but not limited to, low-speed concrete barriers, beam guardrails, steel-backed timber guardrails, and other systems necessary to fabricate, construct, and install traffic barriers to improve safety on state highway infrastructures.(3) $11,500,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for lane striping using the most reflective paint available to maximize the visibility of lane striping, especially at night.(4)(a) $5,000,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to address the risks to safety and public health associated with homeless encampments on department owned rights-of-way. The department must coordinate and work with local government officials and social service organizations who provide services and direct people to housing alternatives that are not in highway rights-of-way to help prevent future encampments from forming on highway rights-of-way and may reimburse the organizations doing this outreach assistance who transition people into treatment or housing or for debris clean up on highway rights-of-way. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, a minimum of $2,000,000 must be used to deliver more frequent removal of litter on the highway rights-of-way that is generated by unsheltered people and may be used to hire crews specializing in collecting and disposing of garbage, clearing debris or hazardous material, and implementing safety improvements where hazards exist to the traveling public and department employees. The department may use these funds to either reimburse local law enforcement costs or the Washington state patrol if they are providing enhanced safety to department staff during debris cleanup or during efforts to prevent future encampments from forming on highway rights-of-way.(b) Beginning November 1, 2025, and semiannually thereafter, the Washington state patrol and the department of transportation must jointly submit a report to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature on the status of these efforts, including:(i) A summary of the activities related to addressing encampments, including information on arrangements with local governments or other entities related to these activities;(ii) A description of the planned activities in the ensuing two quarters to further address the emergency hazards and risks along state highway rights-of-way; and(iii) Recommendations for executive branch or legislative action to achieve the desired outcome of reduced emergency hazards and risks along state highway rights-of-way.(5) $1,000,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a partnership program between the department and the city of Spokane, to be administered in conjunction with subsection (4) of this section. The program must address the safety and public health problems created by homeless encampments on the department's property along state highways within the city limits. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $555,000 is for dedicated department maintenance staff and associated clean-up costs. The department and the city of Spokane shall enter into a reimbursable agreement to cover up to $445,000 of the city's expenses for clean-up crews and landfill costs.(6) $1,025,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to implement safety improvements and debris clean up on department-owned rights-of-way in the city of Seattle at levels above that being implemented as of January 1, 2019, to be administered in conjunction with subsection (2) of this section. The department must maintain a crew dedicated solely to collecting and disposing of garbage, clearing debris or hazardous material, and implementing safety improvements where hazards exist to the traveling public, department employees, or people encamped upon department-owned rights-of-way. The department may request assistance from the Washington state patrol as necessary in order for both agencies to provide enhanced safety-related activities regarding the emergency hazards along state highway rights-of-way in the Seattle area.(7) $1,015,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a partnership program between the department and the city of Tacoma, to be administered in conjunction with subsection (4) of this section. The program must address the safety and public health problems created by homeless encampments on the department's property along state highways within the city limits. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $570,000 is for dedicated department maintenance staff and associated clean-up costs. The department and the city of Tacoma shall enter into a reimbursable agreement to cover up to $445,000 of the city's expenses for clean-up crews and landfill costs.(8) $3,675,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for initial and ongoing implementation costs of the department's Snoqualmie winter operations study recommendations, which include installation of large regulatory signs, installation of a remote avalanche control system, developing chain enforcement processes in coordination with the Washington state patrol, improving cost recovery from violators, and securing an on-call class C towing company.(9) $2,000,000 of the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for maintenance activities in the vicinity of the state route number 99 deep bore tunnel. Appropriations in this subsection assume additional revenue from a temporary toll rate adjustment on the state route number 99 tunnel leading up to and during the 2026 World Cup.(10)(a) $1,200,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with the city of Fife to address the risks to safety and public health associated with homeless encampments on department-owned rights-of-way along the SR 167/SR 509 Puget Sound Gateway project corridor in and adjacent to the city limits.(b) The city must coordinate and work with the department and local governments and social service organizations who provide services and direct people to housing alternatives that are not in highway rights-of-way to help prevent future encampments from forming on highway rights-of-way. State funds may be used to reimburse the organizations doing this outreach assistance who transition people into treatment or housing that is not on the rights-of-way or for debris clean up on highway rights-of-way.(c) The department may hire crews specializing in collecting and disposing of garbage, clearing debris or hazardous material, and implementing safety improvements where hazards exist to the traveling public and department employees. (d) Funds may also be used to reimburse local law enforcement costs or the Washington state patrol if they are participating as part of a state or local government agreement to provide enhanced safety related activities along state highway rights-of-way.(e) It is the intent of the legislature that the city and collaborating partners should place particular emphasis on utilizing available funds for addressing large scale and multiple homeless encampments that impact public safety and health. Funding for initiatives associated with such encampments may include targeted assistance to local governments and social service organizations, directing moneys toward not only initial efforts to clear encampments, clean up debris and restore sightlines, but to ongoing work, monitoring, and maintenance of efforts to place individuals in housing, treatment, and services, and to better ensure individuals experiencing homelessness receive needed assistance while sites remain safe and secure for the traveling public.(11) $180,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for graffiti mitigation operations using spray drone technology.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 217. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâTRANSPORTATION OPERATIONSâPROGRAM QâOPERATINGHighway Safety FundâState Appropriation. . . .$10,621,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$88,980,000Motor Vehicle AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$2,088,000Motor Vehicle AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$294,000Move Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$8,124,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$5,000,000State Route Number 520 Corridor AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$247,000Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$44,000Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,122,000Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 ExpressToll Lanes AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$36,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$116,556,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the department shall continue a pilot program that expands private transportation providers' access to high occupancy vehicle lanes. Under the pilot program, when the department reserves a portion of a highway based on the number of passengers in a vehicle, the following vehicles must be authorized to use the reserved portion of the highway if the vehicle has the capacity to carry eight or more passengers, regardless of the number of passengers in the vehicle: (i) Auto transportation company vehicles regulated under chapter 81.68 RCW; (ii) passenger charter carrier vehicles regulated under chapter 81.70 RCW, except marked or unmarked stretch limousines and stretch sport utility vehicles as defined under department of licensing rules; (iii) private nonprofit transportation provider vehicles regulated under chapter 81.66 RCW; and (iv) private employer transportation service vehicles. For purposes of this subsection, "private employer transportation service" means regularly scheduled, fixed-route transportation service that is offered by an employer for the benefit of its employees. Nothing in this subsection is intended to authorize the conversion of public infrastructure to private, for-profit purposes or to otherwise create an entitlement or other claim by private users to public infrastructure.(b) The department shall expand the high occupancy vehicle lane access pilot program to vehicles that deliver or collect blood, tissue, or blood components for a blood-collecting or distributing establishment regulated under chapter 70.335 RCW. Under the pilot program, when the department reserves a portion of a highway based on the number of passengers in a vehicle, blood-collecting or distributing establishment vehicles that are clearly and identifiably marked as such on all sides of the vehicle are considered emergency vehicles and must be authorized to use the reserved portion of the highway.(c) The department shall expand the high occupancy vehicle lane access pilot program to for hire nonemergency medical transportation vehicles, when in use for medical purposes, as described in section 208(20), chapter 472, Laws of 2023. Under the pilot program, when the department reserves a portion of a highway based on the number of passengers in a vehicle, nonemergency medical transportation vehicles that meet the requirements identified in section 208(20), chapter 472, Laws of 2023 must be authorized to use the reserved portion of the highway.(d) The department shall expand the high occupancy vehicle lane access pilot program to private, for hire vehicles regulated under chapter 81.72 RCW that have been specially manufactured, designed, or modified for the transportation of a person who has a mobility disability and uses a wheelchair or other assistive device. Under the pilot program, when the department reserves a portion of a highway based on the number of passengers in a vehicle, wheelchair-accessible taxicabs that are clearly and identifiably marked as such on all sides of the vehicle are considered public transportation vehicles and must be authorized to use the reserved portion of the highway.(e) Nothing in this subsection is intended to exempt these vehicles from paying tolls when they do not meet the occupancy requirements established by the department for express toll lanes.(2) The appropriations in this section assume implementation of additional cost recovery mechanisms to recoup at least $100,000 in credit card and other financial transaction costs related to the collection of fees imposed under RCW 46.17.400, 46.44.090, and 46.44.0941 for driver and vehicle fee transactions beginning January 1, 2023. The department may recover transaction fees incurred through credit card transactions.(3) $10,621,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 17, Laws of 2023 (speed safety cameras). Pursuant to the reporting requirements of RCW 46.63.200(10), the department, in collaboration with the Washington state patrol and the Washington traffic safety commission, must report to the transportation committees of the legislature by July 1, 2027, on the data and efficacy of speed safety camera system use in state highway work zones. A preliminary report on the pilot activities is due to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2025, and must include, but is not limited to: (a) The number of deployments and locations of the speed safety cameras, (b) staffing workload, (c) number of violations issued, (d) detailed expenses incurred by each agency in the pilot, and (e) efficiency measures each agency has taken in operating the pilot program in the most cost-effective manner possible.(4) $1,279,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for maintenance and operations of the virtual coordination center. The department is encouraged to apply for federal grant funds for the virtual coordination center and may use state funds as a match. By December 1, 2026, the department shall report to the transportation committees of the legislature: (a) Recommendations to expand the center's operations, including specific additional jurisdictions and corridors across the state; and (b) amounts received and dates of receipt of any new cash and in-kind matches from virtual coordination center partners including, but not limited to, the city of Seattle, King county, other state and local jurisdictions, and private sector partners.(5) $1,900,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely for the department, in coordination with the independent review team of the joint transportation committee, to conduct an analysis of highway, road, and freight rail transportation needs, options, and impacts from shifting the movement of freight and goods that currently move by barge through the lower Snake river dams to highways, other roads, and rail, consistent with section 217(9), chapter 310, Laws of 2024. The department shall provide status updates on a quarterly basis in coordination with the joint transportation committee. The department must submit a final report to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 31, 2026.(6) $4,000,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for transportation operations activities to help keep people and goods moving during the 2026 World Cup. These activities include, but are not limited to, transportation management center operations and upgrades, additional incident response team coverage, trail crossing improvements, and updated guide signage/wayfinding.(7) $5,000,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to address emergent issues related to safety for pedestrians and bicyclists. Funds may only be spent after approval from the office of financial management. By December 15th of each odd-numbered year, the department shall provide a report to the legislature listing all emergent issues addressed in the prior fiscal biennium.(8) The department is encouraged to erect wayfinding signs along northbound and southbound Interstate 5 identifying routes to Paine Field airport.(9) $6,000,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for low-cost enhancements. The department shall give priority to low-cost enhancement projects that improve safety or provide congestion relief. The department must identify low-cost enhancement projects that could substantially fulfill safety improvements before proceeding on full project scope designs and engineering. Low-cost enhancements may include, but are not limited to, new signage, rumble strips, speed bumps, flashing crosswalk lights, lowering speed limits, lane narrowing via traffic calming, and other safety improvements. By December 15th of each odd-numbered year, the department shall provide a report to the legislature listing all low-cost enhancement projects completed in the prior fiscal biennium.(10) The department shall promote safety messages encouraging drivers to slow down and move over and pay attention when emergency lights are flashing on the side of the road and other suitable safety messages on electronic message boards the department operates across the state. The messages must be promoted through June 30, 2027. The department may coordinate such messaging with any statewide public awareness campaigns being developed by the department of licensing or the Washington state traffic safety commission, or both.(11) $1,050,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for Washington's share of efforts to mitigate collision risk at the Lewis and Clark and Astoria-Megler bridges, including a vessel collision risk assessment, installation of an air gap sensor, and expansion of the virtual coordination center.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 218. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâTRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORTâPROGRAM SMotor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$45,218,000Motor Vehicle AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$780,000Motor Vehicle AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$500,000Move Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$3,650,000Move Ahead WA Flexible AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$5,400,000Puget Sound Ferry Operations AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$510,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$7,920,000State Route Number 520 Corridor AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$220,000Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$136,000Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$127,000Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 ExpressToll Lanes AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$114,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$64,575,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) $2,000,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation and $5,400,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for efforts to increase diversity in the transportation construction workforce through:(i) The preapprenticeship support services (PASS) and career opportunity maritime preapprenticeship support services (COMPASS) programs, which aim to increase diversity in the highway construction and maritime workforces and prepare individuals interested in entering the highway construction and maritime workforces. In addition to the services allowed under RCW 47.01.435, the PASS and COMPASS programs may provide housing assistance for youth aging out of the foster care and juvenile rehabilitation systems to support their participation in a transportation-related preapprenticeship program and support services to obtain necessary maritime documents and coast guard certification; and(ii) Assisting minority and women-owned businesses to perform work in the highway construction industry.(b) The department shall report every even-numbered year to the transportation committees of the legislature on efforts to increase diversity in the transportation construction workforce.(c) The office of equity and civil rights may revise program standards, as needed, with legislative consultation.(2) $1,512,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation and $488,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for monitoring, assistance, engagement, reporting, and other activities consistent with section 218(2), chapter 310, Laws of 2024.(3) $3,650,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for activities to help keep people and goods moving during the 2026 World Cup. These activities include, but are not limited to, digital advertising for traveler information, Title VI compliance and language access, and Americans with disabilities act compliance and training.(4) The department's office of equity and civil rights and the office of minority and women's business enterprises must develop two new business-size thresholds within the office's certification program. The two new thresholds must include emerging small businesses and rising small businesses with gross receipts of no more than (a) $3,000,000 and (b) $10,000,000. This work must include evaluation of all state-funded contracts over $50,000,000 for emerging small business goals, rising small business goals, small business goals, or any combination thereof. The office of equity and civil rights and the office of minority and women's business enterprises must submit a report to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature by November 1, 2025, on this work and any recommendations on next steps.(5) Within amounts provided in this section, a maximum of $75,000 is for the department's office of equity and civil rights to contract with Western Washington University to analyze the economic benefit of utilizing small businesses on department projects to the Washington state economy.(6) For department small works roster projects under RCW 39.04.151, the department may only allow firms certified as public works small business enterprises, under RCW 39.19.030, to bid on the project contract, unless the department determines there would be insufficient bidders for a particular project. The department shall report on the effectiveness of this policy to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2026.(7) $6,791,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to complete the transportation reporting and accounting information system to the current cloud version of the software.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 219. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâTRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND RESEARCHâPROGRAM TInterstate 405 and State Route Number 167 ExpressToll Lanes AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,500,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$32,682,000Motor Vehicle AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$43,115,000Motor Vehicle AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$400,000Move Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$6,900,000Move Ahead WA Flexible AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$6,348,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,489,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâFederalAppropriation. . . .$2,816,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâPrivate/LocalAppropriation. . . .$100,000State Route Number 520 Corridor AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$657,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$96,007,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $1,557,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to upgrade the department's linear referencing system (LRS) and highway performance monitoring system (HPMS).(2) $5,400,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation and the entire move ahead WA flexible accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for Interstate 5 planning. The work under this subsection must include, but is not limited to, the following:(a) Continued development of an Interstate 5 master plan;(b) Advancing seismic vulnerability analyses;(c) An interim report on the progress of the Interstate 5 master plan to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management by June 30, 2026; and(d) An assessment of Interstate 5 on-ramps in the core area of the interstate system from the Pierce county line in Federal Way to state route number 531/Smokey Point boulevard in Arlington to evaluate installing new meters or revising high occupancy vehicle bypasses at existing meters and prioritize locations for ramp meter installations or high occupancy vehicle bypass conversions.(3) $140,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely for the city of Seattle's office of planning and community development to continue to support an equitable development initiative to reconnect the South Park neighborhood, currently divided by state route number 99, consistent with section 219(4), chapter 310, Laws of 2024. The city must provide a final report that includes recommendations by June 30, 2027.(4) Consistent with RCW 47.04.280(1)(d), when the department submits the attainment report required under RCW 47.04.285, it shall visually display statewide annual hours of travel delay by displaying data within each major corridor, to the extent practicable.(5) $1,500,000 of the Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 express toll lanes accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to develop an implementation plan for state route number 167 that builds on the SR 167 master plan completed in June 2023. The SR 167 implementation plan must include, but is not limited to, high-level engineering and cost estimating work necessary to update the I-405/SR 167 corridor funding and phasing report that needs to be completed to advance priority project components developed in the SR 167 master plan. The SR 167 implementation plan with recommendations is due to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2026.(6) $4,620,000 of the motor vehicle accountâfederal appropriation is provided solely for work on the road usage charge research project overseen by the Washington state transportation commission using amounts of the federal grant award.(7) The department shall continue to coordinate planning work focused on the transportation system in western Washington across modes with the goal of maximizing system performance toward the policy goals in RCW 47.04.280 in the most cost-effective manner. This coordination must include, but is not limited to: The Interstate 5 highway corridor, existing rail infrastructure and future high-speed rail alignment, and commercial aviation capacity. The department must report on the status of these planning efforts including, but not limited to, a long-term strategy for addressing resilience of the transportation system in western Washington through consideration of changing demand, modal integration, and preservation needs. The coordinated work must include an analysis of different alternatives to promote system resilience, including performance and cost of each scenario. The report is due to the joint transportation committee by November 1, 2025.(8) $1,500,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to develop a corridor vision and implementation plan that identifies improvement options to address safety and multimodal mobility needs on the state route number 164 corridor from Dogwood Street East in Auburn to High Point Street in Enumclaw. The department must submit a report to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature with recommended safety and multimodal infrastructure improvements by June 30, 2027.(9) $657,000 of the state route number 520 corridor accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with the University of Washington department of mechanical engineering, to further study measures to reduce noise impacts from the state route number 520 bridge expansion joints. The field testing shall be scheduled during existing construction, maintenance, or other scheduled closures to minimize impacts. The testing must also ensure safety of the traveling public. The study shall examine the types and durability of the materials used to provide noise mitigation and the costs associated with the differing types of materials. A draft report must be submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature and the governor by March 1, 2026. A final report must be submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature and the governor by December 31, 2026.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 220. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâCHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIESâPROGRAM UAeronautics AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$7,000Transportation Partnership AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$147,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$103,363,000Puget Sound Ferry Operations AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,120,000State Route Number 520 Corridor AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$86,000Connecting Washington AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,180,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$5,835,000Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$51,000Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$38,000Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 ExpressToll Lanes AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$66,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$111,893,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Consistent with existing protocol and practices, for any negotiations that could result in a settlement of a claim against the state for the department that exceeds $5,000,000, the department, in conjunction with the attorney general and the department of enterprise services, shall notify the director of the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature.(2) On August 1, 2025, and semiannually thereafter, the department, in conjunction with the attorney general and the department of enterprise services, shall provide a report with judgments and settlements dealing with the Washington state ferry system to the director of the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature. The report must include information on: (a) The number of claims and settlements by type; (b) the average claim and settlement by type; (c) defense costs associated with those claims and settlements; and (d) information on the impacts of moving legal costs associated with the Washington state ferry system into the statewide self-insurance pool.(3) On August 1, 2025, and semiannually thereafter, the department, in conjunction with the attorney general and the department of enterprise services, shall provide a report with judgments and settlements dealing with the nonferry operations of the department to the director of the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature. The report must include information on: (a) The number of claims and settlements by type; (b) the average claim and settlement by type; and (c) defense costs associated with those claims and settlements.(4) When the department identifies significant legal issues that have potential transportation budget implications, the department must initiate a briefing for appropriate legislative members or staff through the office of the attorney general and its legislative briefing protocol.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 221. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâPUBLIC TRANSPORTATIONâPROGRAM VCarbon Emissions Reduction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$275,545,000State Vehicle Parking AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$784,000Rural Mobility Grant Program AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$32,223,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$101,683,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâFederalAppropriation. . . .$4,459,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâPrivate/LocalAppropriation. . . .$100,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$414,794,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) $62,698,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation and $78,525,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for a grant program for special needs transportation distributed in accordance with RCW 47.66.150. Fuel type may not be a factor in the grant selection process. For grant awards not yet under contract, as a condition of special needs transportation grants provided pursuant to this subsection, public transportation agencies may not delay, divert, supplant, or suspend the collection of approved local sales and use taxes for the purpose of public transportation during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.(b) $425,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the reappropriation of amounts provided for this purpose in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium.(2) The department shall not require more than a 10 percent match from nonprofit transportation providers for state grants.(3) $1,124,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide a statewide vanpool benefit for all state employees. For department employees working in remote job sites, such as mountain passes, the department must ensure employees are able to access job sites via a subsidized vanpool or provide a modal alternative for the "last mile" to ensure employees can access the job site without additional charge.(4) $500,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for an interagency transfer to the Washington State University extension energy program to administer a technical assistance and education program for public agencies on the use of alternative fuel vehicles. The Washington State University extension energy program shall prepare a report regarding the utilization of the program and submit this report to the transportation committees of the legislature by November 15, 2025.(5) $32,223,000 of the rural mobility grant program accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for grants to aid small cities in rural areas as prescribed in RCW 47.66.100. Fuel type may not be a factor in the grant selection process. For grant awards not yet under contract, as a condition of rural mobility transportation grants provided pursuant to this subsection, public transportation agencies may not delay, divert, supplant, or suspend the collection of approved local sales and use taxes for the purpose of public transportation during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.(6) $3,300,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation, $5,700,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation, and $784,000 of the state vehicle parking accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for CTR grants and activities. Fuel type may not be a factor in the grant selection process. For grant awards not yet under contract, as a condition of CTR grants provided pursuant to this subsection, public transportation agencies may not delay, divert, supplant, or suspend the collection of approved local sales and use taxes for the purpose of public transportation during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.(7) $188,900,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for transit support grants. The department must confirm zero-fare policies are in effect at transit agencies to be eligible for biennial distributions. For grant awards not yet under contract, as a condition of transit support grants provided pursuant to this subsection, public transportation agencies may not delay, divert, supplant, or suspend the collection of approved local sales and use taxes for the purpose of public transportation during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.(8) $3,400,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely for the pilot program established under RCW 47.04.355 to provide clean alternative fuel vehicle use opportunities to underserved communities and low to moderate-income members of the workforce not readily served by transit or located in transportation corridors with emissions that exceed federal or state emissions standards.(9) $900,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to implement certain recommendations from the 2023 frequent transit service study. The department shall define levels and types of demand-response service and measure access to these services within Washington for the purpose of gaining a fuller picture of transit access. The department must collect ongoing transportation data and develop systems to allow for analysis of disparities in access to existing fixed route transit. The data collection should prioritize collecting information on accessibility and inclusion of people with disabilities, vulnerable populations in overburdened communities, and other underserved communities. The department shall submit a report on data collection efforts to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management by June 30, 2026.(10) $9,000,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for grants to transit agencies for enhanced services between June 1, 2026, and July 30, 2026.(a) Enhanced services consist of:(i) Increased frequency on regular routes, creating temporary shuttle services, enhancing on-demand services, increasing frequency of water taxi services, and supporting incentives to encourage transit use; and(ii) Enhancing customer experience by temporarily increasing operations, cleanliness, rider communications, wayfinding, and safety and security.(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, the department must distribute:(i) Forty percent to King County metro;(ii) Twenty percent to public transportation benefit areas and regional transit authorities operating in the four counties making up the largest regional transportation planning organization in the state, distributed proportionally based on agency service hours; and(iii) Twenty percent to other public transit agencies operating in cities named by a World Cup organizing committee to host fan zones, excluding agencies already included in (b)(ii) of this subsection, distributed proportionally based on agency service hours.(c) Agencies must submit their planned expenditures to the department and the Washington state transit association for review by December 1, 2025. If any agency does not submit a plan to enhance services consistent with (a) of this subsection, the department must redistribute funding to other transit agencies using the distribution in (b) of this subsection.(11) $10,000,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for King county metro as part of a federal funds exchange pilot. Amounts provided in this subsection must be held in unallotted status until notification has been received by the department's public transportation division from Washington state ferries that the conditions outlined in section 222(13) of this act have been met. The pilot must be conducted in coordination with the Puget Sound regional council, who has programming authority for the federal funds to be exchanged. By January 15, 2026, King county metro must report to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature a summary of projects funded or planned to be funded, and recommendations for continuation of the federal funds exchange pilot through the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, including additional amounts eligible to be exchanged.(12) $350,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for Pierce county to support public transportation services on the Key Peninsula.(13) $950,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for RiverCities Transit to operate weekday transit service from Longview to Vancouver.(14) $5,000,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for intercity bus expansion in preparation for the 2026 World Cup. The department must report to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management annually on each January 15th with expansion status and performance updates.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 222. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâMARINEâPROGRAM XPuget Sound Ferry Operations AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$643,803,000Puget Sound Ferry Operations AccountâFederalAppropriation. . . .$126,642,000Puget Sound Ferry Operations AccountâPrivate/LocalAppropriation. . . .$121,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$770,566,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The office of financial management budget instructions require agencies to recast enacted budgets into activities. The Washington state ferries shall include a greater level of detail in its 2025-2027 supplemental and 2027-2029 omnibus transportation appropriations act requests, as determined jointly by the office of financial management, the Washington state ferries, and the transportation committees of the legislature. This level of detail must include the administrative functions in the operating as well as capital programs. The data in the tables in the report must be supplied in a digital file format.(2)(a) $74,374,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâfederal appropriation and $45,523,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for auto ferry vessel operating fuel in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium. The amount provided in this subsection represents the fuel budget for the purposes of calculating any ferry fare fuel surcharge.(b) The Washington state ferries must develop a renewable diesel demonstration project for a representative group of diesel vessels. By September 15, 2026, Washington state ferries must submit findings and recommendations to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of legislature that includes, but is not limited to, performance results of the demonstration project, recommendations for renewable diesel usage across the fleet, and possible procurement options for renewable diesel.(3) During negotiations of the 2027-2029 collective bargaining agreements, (a) the department must identify provisions that create barriers for, or contribute to creating a disparate impact on, newly hired ferry employees, including those who are women, people of color, veterans, and other employees belonging to communities that have historically been underrepresented in the workforce; (b) and the department must create a forum for direct discussion between the governor, labor leadership, the office of financial management and the Washington state ferries to collaboratively identify and resolve compensation and staffing issues, with the goal of service improvements for ferry riders. By January 1, 2027, the department must report to the transportation committees of the legislature on progress in incorporating the finding and recommendations from the December 2022 joint transportation committee study on the Washington state ferries' workforce.(4) $50,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to conduct an actuarial evaluation to determine the amount of funds needed in reserve to provide an acceptable amount of self-insurance coverage as compared to the commercial insurance option for the ferry system. The evaluation must also include an analysis of the short and long-term costs and benefits of self-insurance. By December 15, 2026, the department shall report evaluation results to the transportation committees of the legislature.(5) Within existing resources, the department must deploy a pilot program for offering customers wifi on vessels and in terminals. By January 1, 2026, the department must report on the viability of the program to the transportation committees of the legislature, including implementation recommendations and cost estimates. The department must prioritize routes or terminals with wifi coverage issues and consider fee-for-service options.(6) $500,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for operating costs related to moving vessels for emergency capital repairs. Funds may only be spent after approval by the office of financial management.(7) $11,962,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Washington state ferries workforce development activities.(8) $6,950,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for overtime and familiarization expenses incurred by engine, deck, and terminal staff. The department must provide updated staffing cost estimates for fiscal years 2026 and 2027 with its annual budget submittal and updated estimates by January 1, 2026.(9) $2,548,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for security services at Colman Dock.(10) $600,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for traffic control at ferry terminals at Seattle, Fauntleroy, Kingston, Edmonds, Mukilteo, and Bainbridge Island, during peak ferry travel times, with a particular focus on Sundays and holiday weekends. If local law enforcement entities are available, the Washington state ferries may contract with local agencies for traffic control services.(11) By December 31st of each year, as part of the annual ferries division performance report, the department must report on the status of efforts to increase the staff available for maintaining the customary level of ferry service, including staff for deck, engine, and terminals. The report must include data for a 12-month period up to the most recent data available, by staff group, showing the number of employees at the beginning of the 12-month period, the number of new employees hired, the number of employees separating from service, and the number of employees at the end of the 12-month period. The department report on additional performance measures must include:(a) Numbers of trip cancellations due to crew availability or vessel mechanical issues;(b) Current average monthly level of service compared to the average monthly full-service schedules in effect in 2019; and(c) Retention rates of employees who have completed on the job workforce development programs and overall employee retention rates.(12) $75,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with the Evans School of Public Policy at the University of Washington to conduct a study and develop recommendations to design a modernized and more inclusive Washington state ferries' customer advisory process. The study must prioritize ease of customer feedback, inclusion of groups that have been historically underrepresented in customer feedback and engagement processes, and capturing input from passengers using the system for varying purposes. The study must also look at customer engagement models developed by other comparable ferry systems, both domestic and international, for best practices. A report with findings and recommendations is due to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 15, 2026.(13) $12,000,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâfederal appropriation is provided solely for a federal fund exchange pilot with King county metro. The pilot must be conducted in coordination with the Puget Sound regional council, who has programming authority for the federal funds to be exchanged. Washington state ferries must work with the Puget Sound regional council to identify eligible projects for the exchanged federal funds and amend the statewide transportation improvement program (STIP). Upon approval of the amended plan and confirmation of distribution of federal funds from the Puget Sound regional council, Washington state ferries must notify the department's public transportation division for release of state funds to King county metro in section 221(11) of this act. By January 15, 2026, Washington state ferries must report to the office of financial management and transportation committees of the legislature recommendations for expanding the exchange in current and future biennia.(14) The department must work to increase its outreach and recruitment of populations underrepresented in maritime careers and continue working to expand apprenticeship and internship programs, with an emphasis on programs that are shown to improve recruitment for positions with the state ferry system.(15) $2,600,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for winter service enhancements in the San Juan Islands. By December 1, 2026, the department must report to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management impacts of the service increase including, but not limited to, ridership impacts, service reliability, and whether service changes have induced permanent relocation of workforce serving San Juan Island routes.(16) $855,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a workforce development pilot at the Seattle maritime academy for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium. Amounts provided in this subsection must be utilized for programs that are a benefit to the Washington state ferries or the prospective workforce pipeline of the Washington state ferries. Funding may not be expended until Washington state ferries certifies to the office of financial management that a memorandum of agreement with Seattle central community college has been executed.(a) The memorandum of agreement with Seattle central community college must address:(i) Prioritized use of training and other facilities and implementation of joint training opportunities for Washington state ferries' employees and trainees;(ii) Development of a joint recruitment plan with Seattle central community college aimed at increasing enrollment of women and people of color, with specific strategies to recruit existing community and technical college students, maritime skills center students, high school students from maritime programs, including maritime skills center students, foster care graduates, and former juvenile rehabilitation and adult incarcerated individuals; and(iii) Consultation between the parties on the development of the training program, recruitment plan and operational plan, with an emphasis on increasing enrollment of women and people of color.(b) Washington state ferries must submit the joint training and recruitment plan to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature and the office of financial management by December 1, 2025. The Washington state ferries must submit findings of program effectiveness and recommendations for continuation of the pilot, to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the office of financial management by December 1, 2025.(17) $375,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . ., Laws of 2025 (Substitute House Bill No. 1264) (ferry system salaries). If chapter . . ., Laws of 2025 (Substitute House Bill No. 1264) is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(18) $19,700,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to increase deck and engine positions across the system, prioritizing positions that will mitigate crew related cancellations and reduce overtime expenditures. The department must consider data related to staffing cancellations, as well as current and forecasted staffing levels of deck and engine positions, and mitigation for job classes with the highest overtime costs when adding positions. Funds provided in this subsection are eligible to be used for all deck or engine job classes. The department must include an update on the number of positions hired by job class as part of the annual performance report.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 223. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâRAILâPROGRAM YâOPERATINGCarbon Emissions Reduction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,000,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$81,085,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâPrivate/LocalAppropriation. . . .$46,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$83,131,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 224. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâLOCAL PROGRAMSâPROGRAM ZâOPERATINGCarbon Emissions Reduction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$274,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$15,164,000Motor Vehicle AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$2,644,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,780,000Multiuse Roadway Safety AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,800,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$21,662,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $500,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for administration, program management, and evaluation of the federal fund exchange pilot program.(2) $750,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to continue the civilian intervention grant program in accordance with program requirements under section 224(7), chapter 472, Laws of 2023.(3) For its 2027-2029 biennial agency budget request, the department shall create a distinct subprogram within local programs for all expenditures and activities for the active transportation division.(4) $930,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department, from amounts set aside out of statewide fuel taxes distributed to counties according to RCW 46.68.120(3), to contract with the Washington state association of counties to:(a) Continue contracting with the Washington state department of fish and wildlife to identify, inventory, and prioritize county-owned fish passage barriers;(b) Partner with the county road administration board to update the road cost factor unit costs used in the calculation of the allocation factor for the county's portion of the motor vehicle fuel tax;(c) Create specific guidance and training for county public works departments developing community engagement plans to mitigate project and program harms and maximize community benefits by expanding upon the freight mobility strategic investment board's "Toolkit and Best Practices for Integrating Community Considerations in Infrastructure Investments;" and(d) Continue partnering with the board of registration for professional engineers and land surveyors and contract with the Washington state transportation center at the University of Washington to identify best practices within public works for the recruitment and retention of employees, including recommendations for improving outreach and recruitment to underrepresented populations, methods to partner with local community colleges and universities, ways to expand apprenticeship and internship programs, strategies to increase training and development opportunities, and recommendations for career advancement programs and better work life balance outcomes.(5) The city of Seattle must provide a report on any findings and recommendations of the digital conflict area awareness management program, for which state funding was provided in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, and any implementation needs and process mapping for use by other jurisdictions, to the department and the transportation committees of the legislature by June 30, 2026.(6) $60,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for support of a United States Coast Guard-compliant basic safety program with Crawford nautical training.(7) $309,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to fund one full-time equivalent liaison position within the local program multiagency permit program. The department shall provide a report with an update on activities in the program to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2026.(8) $70,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with the Puget Sound harbor committee to support the development of the Puget Sound harbor safety plan.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 225. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâCLEAN FUELS CREDIT PROGRAMThe department of transportation, with the assistance of designated staff in the department, must register for the clean fuels credit program and start tracking revenue generation pursuant to chapter 70A.535 RCW for investments funded in an omnibus transportation appropriations act. The omnibus transportation appropriations act anticipates credits for ferry electrification for new hybrid electric vessels, active transportation, transit programs and projects, alternative fuel infrastructure, connecting communities, and multimodal investments.(End of part)TRANSPORTATION AGENCIESâCAPITALNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 301. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROLState Patrol Highway AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$3,195,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $3,195,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the following projects:(a) $500,000 is for emergency repairs;(b) $800,000 is for roof replacements;(c) $1,300,000 is for generator and electrical replacement, including reappropriations;(d) $175,000 is for pavement surface improvements, including reappropriations;(e) $120,000 is for vehicle identification number inspection shelters; and(f) $300,000 is for an exterior preservation reappropriation.(2) The Washington state patrol may transfer funds between projects specified in subsection (1) of this section to address cash flow requirements.(3) If a project specified in subsection (1) of this section is completed for less than the amount provided, the remainder may be transferred to another project specified in subsection (1) of this section not to exceed the total appropriation provided in subsection (1) of this section after notifying the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature at least 20 days before any transfer.(4) By December 1, 2025, the Washington state patrol shall provide its capital improvement and preservation plan for agency facilities to the appropriate committees of the legislature.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 302. FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARDMove Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$9,333,000Rural Arterial Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$51,573,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$2,103,000County Arterial Preservation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$30,242,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$93,251,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: It is the intent of the legislature to provide $21,028,000 for a new county local road grant program for the preservation and improvement of county local roads that are not currently eligible under existing funding programs starting in the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 303. FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARDCarbon Emissions Reduction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$21,600,000Small City Pavement and Sidewalk AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$3,953,000Transportation Improvement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$251,289,000Complete Streets Grant Program AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$24,670,000Move Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$9,333,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$310,845,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: It is the intent of the legislature to provide a $21,028,000 increase in funding starting in the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium for additional complete streets program grant awards to cities and counties for planning, design, and infrastructure related to making roadways accessible for driving, walking, cycling, transit, and aesthetic qualities.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 304. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâFACILITIESâPROGRAM Dâ(DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS)âCAPITALMotor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$20,158,000Move Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$21,487,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$41,645,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) $9,487,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to improve its ability to keep facility assets in a state of good repair. In using the funds appropriated in this subsection, the department, with periodic reporting to the joint transportation committee, must continue to develop and implement a prioritization of facility capital preservation needs and repair projects. The legislature intends these to be reasonable, forward-thinking investments that consider potential future space efficiency measures and consolidations, including those assessed as having high commercial value and potential returns to state transportation funds associated with the sale of the property. Prioritization must be based on, but not limited to, the following criteria: (i) Employee safety and facility security; (ii) state and federal regulatory and statutory requirements and compliance issues, including clean buildings requirements; (iii) quality of work issues; (iv) facility condition assessment evaluations and scoring; (v) asset preservation; and (vi) amount of operational support provided by the facility to the achievement of the department's performance measures and outcomes, including facility utilization based on field operations work supported at the location. "Field operations" includes maintenance, transportation operations, materials testing, and construction.(b) In using the funds appropriated in this subsection, the department must utilize the prioritization of facility capital preservation needs and repair projects used in developing the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium agency budget submittal.(c) By September 1, 2025, and September 1, 2026, the department must provide a report based on the prioritization of facility preservation needs and repair projects developed pursuant to (a) of this subsection to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature. The report must include: (i) A by-facility ranking based on the criteria implemented; (ii) detailed information on the actions taken in the previous year to address the identified issues and deficiencies; and (iii) the plan, by facility, to address issues and deficiencies for the remainder of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium and the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium.(2) Within existing resources, in consultation with the office of financial management, the department must continue to use the criteria developed for the preservation and improvement minor works list during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.(3) Within existing resources, in consultation with the office of financial management, the department must continue to use criteria for providing building-related capital requests in a comparable format, adjusted where appropriate, to provisions already in use in the omnibus capital appropriations act for building projects, including the C-100 capital request form and other detail requirements for omnibus capital appropriations act building submissions.(4) $3,000,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to conduct master planning on highest and best use of the Corson Avenue regional headquarters property, including options to reduce space and footprint on the property, examining the commercial value of the property if converted to other use or sale of a portion of the property, and reviewing alternative financing methods to fund improvements.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 305. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâIMPROVEMENTSâPROGRAM IAlaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$7,406,000Carbon Emissions Reduction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$13,331,000Move Ahead WA AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$367,916,000Puget Sound Gateway Facility AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$88,200,000Transportation Partnership AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$8,948,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$271,567,000Motor Vehicle AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$487,331,000Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery FundâFederalAppropriation. . . .$54,334,000Motor Vehicle AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$53,581,000Connecting Washington AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,710,931,000Special Category C AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$114,708,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$7,557,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâFederalAppropriation. . . .$1,842,000State Route Number 520 Corridor AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,100,000Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 ExpressToll Lanes AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$547,950,000Move Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,161,189,000Move Ahead WA AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$467,532,000Model Toxics Control Stormwater AccountâState. . . .$10,563,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$5,375,986,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire connecting Washington accountâstate appropriation, the entire move ahead WA accountâfederal appropriation, the entire move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation, and the entire transportation partnership accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by fund, project, and amount in LEAP Transportation Document 2025-1 as developed April 26, 2025, Program - Highway Improvements Program (I). However, limited transfers of specific line-item project appropriations may occur between projects for those amounts listed subject to the conditions and limitations in section 601 of this act.(2) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation and motor vehicle accountâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities listed in LEAP Transportation Document 2025-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed April 26, 2025, Program - Highway Improvements Program (I). Any federal funds gained through efficiencies, adjustments to the federal funds forecast, or the federal funds redistribution process must then be applied to highway and bridge preservation activities.(3) Within the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation and motor vehicle accountâfederal appropriation, the department may transfer appropriation authority between programs I and P, except for appropriation authority that is otherwise restricted in this act, as follows:(a) Ten days prior to any transfer, the department must submit its request to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature and consider any concerns raised.(b) The director of the office of financial management must first provide written authorization for such transfer to the department and the transportation committees of the legislature.(c) The department shall submit a report on appropriation authority transferred in the prior fiscal year using this subsection as part of the department's annual budget submittal.(4) The connecting Washington accountâstate appropriation includes up to $1,422,447,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.889.(5) The special category C accountâstate appropriation includes up to $101,986,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.812.(6) The Puget Sound gateway facility accountâstate appropriation includes up to $88,200,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.896.(7) The motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation includes up to $30,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.843.(8) The Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 express toll lanes accountâstate appropriation includes up to $375,311,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.896.(9) The move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation includes up to $879,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.873.(10) The move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation includes up to $164,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.889.(11) The move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation includes up to $212,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.861.(12) The department shall itemize all future requests for the construction of buildings on a project list and submit them through the transportation executive information system as part of the department's annual budget submittal. It is the intent of the legislature that new facility construction must be transparent and not appropriated within larger highway construction projects.(13) The legislature continues to prioritize the replacement of the state's aging infrastructure and recognizes the importance of reusing and recycling construction aggregate and recycled concrete materials in our transportation system. To accomplish Washington state's sustainability goals in transportation and in accordance with RCW 70A.205.700, the legislature reaffirms its determination that recycled concrete aggregate and other transportation building materials are natural resource construction materials that are too valuable to be wasted and landfilled, and are a commodity as defined in WAC 173-350-100.(14)(a) $54,334,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fundâfederal appropriation, $118,178,000 of the motor vehicle accountâfederal appropriation, $796,352,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation, $112,263,000 of the connecting Washington accountâstate appropriation, $2,698,000 of the motor vehicle accountâprivate/local appropriation, and $8,621,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the Fish Passage Barrier Removal project (0BI4001) with the intent of fully complying with the federal U.S. v. Washington court injunction by 2030.(b) Appropriations within this subsection may be used to jointly leverage state and local funds for match requirements in applying for competitive federal aid grants provided in the infrastructure investment and jobs act for removals of fish passage barriers under the national culvert removal, replacement, and restoration program. State funds used for the purpose described in this subsection must not compromise full compliance with the court injunction by 2030.(c) The department shall coordinate with the Brian Abbott fish passage barrier removal board to use a watershed approach by replacing both state and local culverts guided by the principle of providing the greatest fish habitat gain at the earliest time. The department shall deliver high habitat value fish passage barrier corrections that it has identified, guided by the following factors: Opportunity to bundle projects, tribal priorities, ability to leverage investments by others, presence of other barriers, project readiness, culvert conditions, other transportation projects in the area, and transportation impacts. The department and Brian Abbott fish barrier removal board must provide updates on the implementation of the statewide culvert remediation plan to the legislature by November 1, 2025, and June 1, 2026.(d) The department must keep track of, for each barrier removed: (i) The location; (ii) the amount of fish habitat gain; and (iii) the amount spent to comply with the injunction.(e) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the department shall semi-annually provide reports of the amounts of federal funding received for this project to the governor and transportation committees of the legislature.(15)(a) $368,461,000 of the move ahead WA accountâfederal appropriation, $127,504,000 of the move ahead WA accountâprivate/local appropriation, and $84,223,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the I-5 Columbia river bridge project (L4000054). The legislature finds that the replacement of the I-5 Columbia river bridge is a project of national significance and is critical for the movement of freight. One span is now more than a century old, at risk for collapse in the event of a major earthquake, and no longer satisfies the needs of commerce and travel. Replacing the aging interstate bridge with a modern, seismically resilient, multimodal structure that provides improved mobility for people, goods, and services is a high priority. Therefore, the legislature intends to support the replacement of the I-5 Columbia river bridge with an investment of $1,000,000,000.(b) The department shall provide regular updates on the status of ongoing coordination with the state of Oregon on any bistate agreements regarding sharing of revenues, use of revenues, and fiscal responsibilities of each state. Prior to finalizing any such agreement, the department shall provide a draft of the agreement to the transportation committees of the legislature for review and input. Additionally, the department shall continue to advise quarterly on the status of any bistate agreements to the joint transportation committee until any agreements are finalized.(16)(a) $37,322,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the SR 3 Freight Corridor (T30400R) project. The legislature intends to provide a total of $78,910,000 for this project, including an increase of $12,000,000 in future biennia to safeguard against inflation and supply/labor interruptions and ensure that:(i) The northern terminus remains at Lake Flora Road and the southern terminus at the intersection of state route number 3 and state route number 302; and(ii) Multimodal safety improvements at the southern terminus remain in the project to provide connections to North Mason school district and provide safe routes to schools.(b) With respect to right-of-way acquisition and the construction of the SR 3 Freight Corridor project (T30400R), tribal consultation with the Suquamish tribe must begin at the earliest stage of planning, including, without limitation, on all funding decisions and funding programs, to provide a government-to-government mechanism for the tribe to evaluate, identify, and expressly notify governmental entities of any potential impacts to tribal cultural resources, archaeological sites, sacred sites, fisheries, or other rights and interests in tribal lands and lands within which the tribe possesses rights reserved or protected by federal treaty, statute, or executive order. The consultation is independent of, and in addition to, any public participation process required under state law, or by a state agency, including the requirements of Executive Order 21-02 related to archaeological and cultural resources, and regardless of whether the agency receives a request for consultation from the Suquamish tribe. Regularly scheduled tribal consultation meetings with the Suquamish tribe shall continue throughout the duration of any funding or program decisions and proposed project approval.(17) $8,500,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation and $5,000,000 of the move ahead WA accountâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the SR 3/Gorst Area - Widening project (L4000017).(a) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $7,500,000 is for low-cost enhancements that complement the long-term improvement alternatives identified through planning work on the corridor.(b) Tribal consultation with the Suquamish tribe must begin at the earliest stage of planning, including, without limitation, all funding decisions and funding programs, to provide a government-to-government mechanism for the tribe to evaluate, identify, and expressly notify governmental entities of any potential impacts to tribal cultural resources, archaeological sites, sacred sites, fisheries, or other rights and interests in tribal lands and lands within which the tribe possesses rights reserved or protected by federal treaty, statute, or executive order. The consultation is independent of, and in addition to, any public participation process required under state law, or by a state agency, including the requirements of Executive Order 21-02 related to archaeological and cultural resources, and regardless of whether the agency receives a request for consultation from the Suquamish tribe. Regularly scheduled tribal consultation meetings with the Suquamish tribe must continue throughout the duration of any funding program and proposed project approval.(18) $23,000,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation, $10,000,000 of the move ahead WA accountâprivate/local appropriation, and $6,387,000 of the connecting Washington accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the US-12/Walla Walla Corridor Improvements project (T20900R). The legislature recognizes the importance of this project and intends to provide additional matching funds if additional competitive federal funding is awarded for the final remaining four-lane section between Wallula and Nine Mile Hill and the Port of Walla Walla provides right-of-way at no cost to the state for this project. The department, in consultation with local governments in the vicinity, must pursue any federal funding available.(19) $12,571,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation and $2,429,000 of the special category C accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the SR 18 Widening - Issaquah/Hobart Rd to Raging River - Phase I project (L1000199). The legislature recognizes the importance of this project and the cost uncertainties associated with this project, and is committed to its completion. The legislature intends to monitor the project's budget and schedule and make adjustments as appropriate.(20) $136,984,000 of the connecting Washington accountâstate appropriation, $1,527,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation, $28,103,000 of the motor vehicle accountâprivate/local appropriation, $324,483,000 of the move ahead WA accountâfederal appropriation, $110,723,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation, $88,200,000 of the Puget Sound gateway facility accountâstate appropriation, and $212,157,000 of the motor vehicle accountâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the SR 167/SR 509 Puget Sound Gateway project (M00600R).(a) Any savings on the project must stay on the Puget Sound Gateway corridor until the project is complete.(b) In making budget allocations to the Puget Sound Gateway project, the department shall implement the project's construction as a single corridor investment. The department shall continue to collaborate with the affected stakeholders as it implements the corridor construction and implementation plan for state route number 167 and state route number 509. Specific funding allocations must be based on where and when specific project segments are ready for construction to move forward and investments can be best optimized for timely project completion. Emphasis must be placed on avoiding gaps in fund expenditures for either project.(c) The entire multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation in this subsection is for:(i) The design phase of the Puyallup to Tacoma multiuse trail along the state route number 167 right-of-way acquired for the project to connect a network of new and existing trails from Mount Rainier to Point Defiance Park; and(ii) Segment 2 of the state route number 167 completion project shared-use path to provide connections to the interchange of state route number 167 at 54th to the intersection of state route number 509 and Taylor Way in Tacoma.(21) $15,988,000 of the connecting Washington accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the SR 224/Red Mountain Vicinity Improvement project (L1000291). The department shall provide funding to the city of West Richland to complete the project within the project scope identified by the legislature and within the total amount provided by the legislature. The department shall not amend the project's scope of work to add pavement preservation on state route number 224 from the West Richland city limits to Antinori Road.(22) $100,000,000 of the special category C accountâstate appropriation, $272,820,000 of the connecting Washington accountâstate appropriation, and $71,000 of the motor vehicle accountâprivate/local appropriation are provided solely for the US 395 North Spokane Corridor project (M00800R). Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $300,000 is for an environmental justice assessment to determine if traffic noise abatement will reduce environmental harm to the East Central Neighborhood as a result of this project.(23) $578,139,000 of the connecting Washington accountâstate appropriation, $1,100,000 of the state route number 520 corridor accountâstate appropriation, and $7,278,000 of the motor vehicle accountâprivate/local appropriation are provided solely for the SR 520 Seattle Corridor Improvements - West End project (M00400R) and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(a) Upon completion of the Montlake Phase of the West End project, the department shall sell or transfer that portion of the property not necessary for transportation purposes, and shall initiate a process to convey or transfer such portion of the surplus property to a subsequent owner.(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,100,000 of the state route number 520 corridor accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for noise mitigation activities.(24) $10,416,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation, $5,229,000 of the connecting Washington accountâstate appropriation, and $1,548,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the SR 522/Paradise Lk Rd Interchange & Widening on SR 522 (Design/Engineering) project (NPARADI), specifically for design of, preliminary engineering, and right-of-way acquisition for the interchange and widening as a single project. The department must consider reserving portions of state route number 522, including designated lanes or ramps, for the exclusive or preferential use of public transportation vehicles, privately owned buses, motorcycles, private motor vehicles carrying not less than a specified number of passengers, or private transportation provider vehicles pursuant to RCW 47.52.025.(25) $24,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation and $304,000 of the motor vehicle accountâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the SR 900 Safety Improvements project (L2021118). The department must: (a) Work in collaboration with King county and the Skyway coalition to align community assets, transportation infrastructure needs, and initial design for safety improvements along state route number 900; and (b) work with the Skyway coalition to lead community planning engagement and active transportation activities.(26) $17,500,000 of the motor vehicle accountâfederal appropriation is provided solely for a federal fund exchange pilot program. The pilot program must allow exchanges of federal surface transportation block grant population funding and state funds at an exchange rate of 95 cents in state funds per $1.00 in federal funds. The projects receiving the exchanged federal funds must adhere to all federal requirements, including the applicable disadvantaged business enterprise goals. The entirety of the appropriation in this subsection must be held in unallotted status until surface transportation block grant population funding has been offered to the state, and the department determines that a federalized project or projects funded in this section is eligible to spend the surface transportation block grant population funding. $16,625,000 from existing state appropriations identified elsewhere within this section are available to be used as part of the exchange. Upon determination that a project or projects funded in this section is eligible to spend the offered surface transportation block grant population funding, state funds appropriated in this section for the eligible state project or projects in an amount equal to 100 percent of the offered surface transportation block grant population funding must be placed in unallotted status. The legislature intends to evaluate utilization and efficacy of this program, and if underutilized, the program is intended to not continue into future biennia.(27) $5,030,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation and $1,842,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the department to develop and implement a technology-based truck parking availability system along the Interstate 5 corridor in partnership with Oregon state and California state to maximize utilization of existing truck parking capacity and deliver real-time parking availability information to truck drivers (L1000375). The department may use a portion of the appropriation in this subsection for grant proposal development and as state match funding for technology-based truck parking availability system federal grant applications. The department must update the transportation committees of the legislature on agency activities and their status by December 1, 2026.(28) $57,593,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the payment of deferred sales and use taxes on activities related to the state route number 16 corridor improvements project pursuant to RCW 47.46.060. It is the intent of the legislature that any nontoll accounts used to pay the deferred sales and use taxes will be reimbursed by toll revenues no later than December 31, 2032, which reflects prior legislative intent regarding the use of toll revenues for this purpose.(29) $159,480,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the payment of deferred sales and use taxes on the state route number 520 bridge replacement and HOV project pursuant to RCW 47.01.412. It is the intent of the legislature that any nontoll accounts used to pay the deferred sales and use taxes will be reimbursed by toll revenues no later than December 31, 2050, which reflects prior legislative intent regarding the use of toll revenues for this purpose.(30) $1,000,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for matching funds for the department to apply to the federal highway administration's wildlife crossings pilot program for wildlife crossing underpasses on U.S. 97 between Tonasket and Riverside (L1000373).(31) The legislature intends to evaluate the state's approach to estimating capital project costs and risks, and to explore pooling risk. The department must present to the joint transportation committee on its cost estimating policies and considerations for creating a project risk pool before the 2026 legislative session.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 306. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâPRESERVATIONâPROGRAM PMove Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$154,883,000Recreational Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$751,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$62,975,000Motor Vehicle AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$600,864,000Motor Vehicle AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$7,935,000Connecting Washington AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$41,159,000State Route Number 520 Corridor AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$7,924,000Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,871,000Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$5,376,000Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 ExpressToll Lanes AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$9,648,000Transportation Partnership AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$10,000,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$903,386,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation and motor vehicle accountâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities listed in LEAP Transportation Document 2025-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed April 26, 2025, Program - Highway Preservation Program (P). Any federal funds gained through efficiencies, adjustments to the federal funds forecast, or the federal funds redistribution process must then be applied to highway and bridge preservation activities.(2) Within the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation and motor vehicle accountâfederal appropriation, the department may transfer appropriation authority between programs I and P, except for appropriation authority that is otherwise restricted in this act, as follows:(a) Ten days prior to any transfer, the department must submit its request to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature and consider any concerns raised.(b) The director of the office of financial management must first provide written authorization for such transfer to the department and the transportation committees of the legislature.(c) The department shall submit a report on appropriation authority transferred in the prior fiscal year using this subsection as part of the department's annual budget submittal.(3) $6,000,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for extraordinary costs incurred from litigation awards, settlements, or dispute mitigation activities not eligible for funding from the self-insurance fund (L2000290). The amount provided in this subsection must be held in unallotted status until the department submits a request to the office of financial management that includes documentation detailing litigation-related expenses. The office of financial management may release the funds only when it determines that all other funds designated for litigation awards, settlements, and dispute mitigation activities have been exhausted.(4) Within the connecting Washington accountâstate appropriation, the department may transfer funds from Highway System Preservation (L1100071) to other preservation projects listed in the LEAP transportation document identified in subsection (1) of this section, if it is determined necessary for completion of these high priority preservation projects. The department's next budget submittal after using this subsection must appropriately reflect the transfer.(5) The legislature continues to prioritize the replacement of the state's aging infrastructure and recognizes the importance of reusing and recycling construction aggregate and recycled concrete materials in our transportation system. To accomplish Washington state's sustainability goals in transportation and in accordance with RCW 70A.205.700, the legislature reaffirms its determination that recycled concrete aggregate and other transportation building materials are natural resource construction materials that are too valuable to be wasted and landfilled, and are a commodity as defined in WAC 173-350-100.(6) The appropriations in this section include funding for starting planning, engineering, and construction of the Elwha River bridge replacement. To the greatest extent practicable, the department shall maintain public access on the existing route.(7) $17,500,000 of the motor vehicle accountâfederal appropriation is provided solely for a federal fund exchange pilot program. The pilot program must allow exchanges of federal surface transportation block grant population funding and state funds at an exchange rate of 95 cents in state funds per $1.00 in federal funds. The projects receiving the exchanged federal funds must adhere to all federal requirements, including the applicable disadvantaged business enterprise goals. The entirety of the appropriation in this subsection must be held in unallotted status until surface transportation block grant population funding has been offered to the state and the department determines that a federalized project or projects funded in this section is eligible to spend the surface transportation block grant population funding. $16,625,000 from existing state appropriations identified elsewhere within this section are available to be used as part of the exchange. Upon determination that a project or projects funded in this section is eligible to spend the offered surface transportation block grant population funding, state funds appropriated in this section for the eligible state project or projects in an amount equal to 100 percent of the offered surface transportation block grant population funding must be placed in unallotted status. The legislature intends to evaluate utilization and efficacy of this program, and if underutilized, the program is intended to not continue into future biennia.(8) The appropriations in this section include funding for the following projects:(a) SR 525 Bridge Replacement - Mukilteo;(b) SR 4/Abernathy Creek Br - Replace Bridge;(c) SR 155/Omak Bridge Rehabilitation;(d) SR 243 Pavement Preservation and Shoulder Rebuild; and(e) SR 104/Port Angeles Graving Dock Settlement and Remediation.(9) As part of its 2026 supplemental budget submittal, the department must provide a map of preservation projects that it expects to fund over the following six fiscal years based on the funding levels shown in this act and based on the funding levels requested in its 2026 supplemental budget submittal.(10) The department may not proceed with construction of the US 195/Colfax North Fork Palouse River - Replace Bridges project during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium. The legislature intends for the project to be delayed until the 2029-2031 fiscal biennium.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 307. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâTRANSPORTATION OPERATIONSâPROGRAM QâCAPITALMotor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$5,845,000Motor Vehicle AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$8,374,000Motor Vehicle AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$635,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$14,854,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $5,621,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation, $6,500,000 of the motor vehicle accountâfederal appropriation, and $635,000 of the motor vehicle accountâprivate/local appropriation are provided solely for Programmatic Investment for Traffic Operations Capital projects (000005Q). By December 15th of each odd-numbered year, the department shall provide a report to the legislature listing all traffic operations capital project investments completed in the prior fiscal biennium.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 308. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâPUBLIC TRANSPORTATIONâPROGRAM VâCAPITALCarbon Emissions Reduction AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$183,467,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$19,511,000Regional Mobility Grant Program AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$135,229,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$338,207,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by project and amount in LEAP Transportation Document 2025-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed April 26, 2025, Program - Public Transportation Program (V).(2)(a) $135,229,000 of the regional mobility grant program accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for regional mobility grant projects. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $58,447,000 is for the reappropriation of amounts provided for this purpose in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium. The department shall review all projects receiving grant awards under this program at least semiannually to determine whether the projects are making satisfactory progress. Any project that has been awarded funds, but does not report activity on the project within one year of the grant award, must be reviewed by the department to determine whether the grant should be terminated. The department shall promptly close out grants when projects have been completed, and any remaining funds must be used only to fund projects identified in the LEAP transportation document referenced in this section. The department shall provide annual status reports on December 15, 2025, and December 15, 2026, to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature regarding the projects receiving the grants. A grantee may not receive more than 25 percent of the amount appropriated in this subsection unless all other funding is awarded. Additionally, when allocating funding for the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium, no more than 30 percent of the total grant program may directly benefit or support one grantee unless all other funding is awarded.(b) To be eligible to receive a grant under (a) of this subsection during the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium, a transit agency must establish a process for private transportation providers to apply for the use of park and ride facilities.(c) For purposes of this subsection:(i) "Private transportation provider" means an auto transportation company regulated under chapter 81.68 RCW; a passenger charter carrier regulated under chapter 81.70 RCW, except marked or unmarked stretch limousines and stretch sport utility vehicles as defined under department of licensing rules; a private nonprofit transportation provider regulated under chapter 81.66 RCW; or a private employer transportation service provider; and(ii) "Private employer transportation service" means regularly scheduled, fixed-route transportation service that is offered by an employer for the benefit of its employees.(d) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the department shall consider applications submitted by regional transportation planning organizations and metropolitan planning organizations for the regional mobility grant program funding in the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium.(e) If savings are realized from the underspending or cancellation of projects appropriated in this section, the department may advance any project or projects listed in the "2025-2027 Regional Mobility Grant Program Prioritized Project" list. The funding of any project or projects chosen to be advanced is subject to approval by the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature.(3) $11,636,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for move ahead WA tribal transit grant projects. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,635,000 is for the reappropriation of amounts provided for this purpose in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium. $100,000 of the amount provided in this subsection may be used for program administration and staffing. Grants to federally recognized tribes may be for any transit purpose, including planning, operating costs, maintenance, and capital costs. By December 15, 2026, the department must submit a prioritized list to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature of new projects totaling no more than $5,762,000.(4) $6,291,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely for additional bus and bus facility projects. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,891,000 is for Twin Transit for zero-emission vehicle acquisition (BU232505) and $4,400,000 is for C-TRAN for Highway 99 BRT hydrogen fuel cell buses (BU232507).(5) $11,800,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely for the following projects:(a) Base Refurbish & Expansion for Growth/Columbia County Public Transportation (L4000182);(b) Kitsap Transit: Design & Shore Power (G2000115);(c) Pierce Transit - Meridian (L2021197); and(d) King County Metro South Annex Base - Electrification Elements (L4000174).(6) $6,673,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a public transit ride share grant program. For grant awards not yet under contract, as a condition of public transit ride share grants provided pursuant to this subsection, public transportation agencies may not delay, divert, supplant, or suspend the collection of approved local sales and use taxes for the purpose of public transportation during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,673,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is for the reappropriation of amounts provided for a public transit ride share grant program in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium.(7) $11,189,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for connecting Washington transit projects. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $3,407,000 is for the reappropriation of amounts provided for this purpose in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium. Entities identified to receive funding in the LEAP document referenced in this section receive the amounts specified in the time frame specified in that LEAP document. If an entity has already completed a project in the LEAP document referenced in this section before the time frame identified, the entity may substitute another transit project or projects that cost a similar or lesser amount.(8) $1,649,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation and $50,799,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for green transportation capital projects identified in LEAP Transportation Document 2025-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed April 26, 2025, Program - Public Transportation Program (V). Of the amounts provided in this subsection, the entire multimodal transportation accountâstate amount and $18,536,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate amount are for the reappropriation of amounts provided for this purpose in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium. Of the amount of carbon emissions reduction accountâstate funds appropriated in this subsection, $938,000 may be used for program administration and staffing. For grant awards not yet under contract, as a condition of green transportation capital grants provided pursuant to this subsection, public transportation agencies may not delay, divert, supplant, or suspend the collection of approved local sales and use taxes for the purpose of public transportation during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.(9) For grant awards not yet under contract, as a condition of bus and bus facility grants identified in LEAP Transportation Document 2025-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed April 26, 2025, Program - Public Transportation Program (V), public transportation agencies may not delay, divert, supplant, or suspend the collection of approved local sales and use taxes for the purpose of public transportation during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 309. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâWASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTIONâPROGRAM WCarbon Emissions Reduction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$229,747,000Move Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$109,408,000Puget Sound Capital Construction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$385,229,000Puget Sound Capital Construction AccountâFederalAppropriation. . . .$31,830,000Puget Sound Capital Construction AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$1,679,000Transportation Partnership AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$5,395,000Connecting Washington AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$8,424,000Capital Vessel Replacement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$122,000,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$893,712,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed in LEAP Transportation Document 2025-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed April 26, 2025, Program - Washington State Ferries Capital Program (W).(2) $5,000,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for emergency capital repair costs (999910K). Funds may only be spent after approval by the office of financial management.(3) For the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the marine division shall provide to the office of financial management and the legislative transportation committees the following reports on ferry capital projects: (a) On a semiannual basis, the report must include a status update on projects with funding provided in this section including, but not limited to, the following:(i) Anticipated cost increases and cost savings;(ii) Anticipated cash flow and schedule changes; and(iii) Explanations for the changes.(b) On an annual basis, the report must include a status update on vessel and terminal preservation and improvement plans including, but not limited to, the following: (i) What work has been done; (ii) how have schedules shifted; and (iii) associated changes in funding among projects, accompanied by explanations for the changes.(c) On an annual basis, the report must include an update on the implementation of the maintenance management system with recommendations for using the system to improve the efficiency of project reporting under this subsection.(4) The legislature intends to reassess funding for Bainbridge Island and Kingston terminal electrification projects based on progression of the electrification program and future recommendations of the department.(5) The appropriations in this section include savings assumed under section 719 of this act. By October 15, 2026, Washington state ferries must report to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management any estimated savings, efficiencies realized, and recommendations for further improvements.(6) $6,000,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for modernization of the ticketing and reservation system (990052C). The department must prioritize integration of ORCA payment, Good to Go! payment, and mobile payment platforms into the new system at the earliest possible phase.(7) The legislature intends to consider alternative forms of financing including, but not limited to, certificates of participation (lease-purchase) and leasing for the purpose of securing up to five hybrid electric vessels for the Washington state ferry system.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 310. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâRAILâPROGRAM YâCAPITALCarbon Emissions Reduction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$91,132,000Essential Rail Assistance AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,518,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$316,000Motor Vehicle AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$326,000Move Ahead WA Flexible AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$18,731,000Transportation Infrastructure AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$7,223,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$79,468,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâFederalAppropriation. . . .$113,163,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$311,877,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by project and amount in LEAP Transportation Document 2025-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed April 26, 2025, Program - Rail Program (Y).(2) $1,500,000 of the transportation infrastructure accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for new low-interest loans approved by the department through the freight rail investment bank (FRIB) program identified in the LEAP transportation document referenced in subsection (1) of this section.(3) $6,899,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for new statewide emergent freight rail assistance projects identified in the LEAP transportation document referenced in subsection (1) of this section.(4)(a) $7,500,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation and $25,076,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâfederal appropriation are provided solely to support the department's continued work on a service development plan for a new ultra high-speed ground transportation corridor under the federal corridor identification and development program (L2021074). The department may not move forward with programmatic environmental review unless authorized to do so by the legislature.(b) The department must coordinate with the chairs and ranking members of the transportation committees of the legislature to provide periodic updates and check-in points on progress made over the course of the biennium, with updates available no less frequently than semiannually, and must include written status updates to be provided with sufficient time for review prior to any update meetings held. An annual report on ultra high-speed ground transportation corridor identification and development program efforts must be provided to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management by December 1, 2025 and December 1, 2026.(5) $3,600,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Cascades corridor delivery program for advancing the Cascades corridor (R00003A), including through planning and project development activities conducted as part of the federal corridor identification and development program. The department must continue to pursue funding opportunities for the Cascades corridor through the corridor identification and development program and the federal-state partnership programs at the federal rail administration. The department must notify the office of the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature of funding opportunities from the programs and any corresponding state match needs.(6) $18,731,000 of the move ahead WA flexible accountâstate appropriation, $54,785,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâfederal appropriation, and $326,000 of the motor vehicle accountâlocal appropriation are provided solely for rehabilitation of the Palouse River and Coulee City Railroad (L4000079).(7) $5,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to fund the replacement of two Tacoma rail diesel-electric switcher locomotives with zero emission battery-electric switcher locomotives and to install on-site charging equipment at a Tacoma rail facility (L1000327). Local funds sufficient to fully fund this project must be contributed to the project, and any agreements required for the project must be secured.(8) $26,200,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for port electrification competitive grants (L2021182). All public ports are eligible to receive funds under this subsection. A port seeking to use funds under this subsection to install shore power must adopt a policy that requires vessels that dock at the port facility to use shore power if such vessel is capable of using such power and when such power is available at the port facility.(9) $1,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for port electrification at the port of Bremerton (L1000337), which may include the purchase and installation of zero emission port shore power systems and other zero emission infrastructure, equipment, and technology.(10) $1,855,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for port electrification at the port of Anacortes (L1000338), which may include the purchase and installation of zero emission port shore power systems and other zero emission infrastructure, equipment, and technology.(11) $24,800,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to fund a zero emission shore power infrastructure demonstration project at Northwest seaport alliance facilities (L1000325). Local funds sufficient to fully fund this project must be contributed to the project, and any agreements required for the project must be secured.(12) $5,277,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to fund a zero emission drayage truck demonstration project (L1000324) at Northwest seaport alliance facilities.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 311. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâLOCAL PROGRAMSâPROGRAM ZâCAPITALCarbon Emissions Reduction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$281,202,000Freight Mobility Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$19,335,000Freight Mobility Multimodal AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$24,952,000Highway Infrastructure AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$1,500,000Move Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$170,384,000Move Ahead WA Flexible AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$37,500,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$31,840,000Motor Vehicle AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$106,461,000Motor Vehicle AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$75,000,000Connecting Washington AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$99,002,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$115,518,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$962,694,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by project and amount in LEAP Transportation Document 2025-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed April 26, 2025, Program - Local Programs Program (Z).(2) The amounts identified in the LEAP transportation document referenced under subsection (1) of this section for pedestrian safety/safe routes to school are as follows:(a) $38,380,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation and $43,372,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for pedestrian and bicycle safety program projects (L2000188 and L1000335). Of the amount of carbon emissions reduction account funds appropriated in this subsection, up to one percent may be used for program administration and staffing.(b) $16,933,000 of the motor vehicle accountâfederal appropriation, $53,139,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation, and $13,321,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for safe routes to school projects (L2000189 and L1000334). Of the amount of carbon emissions reduction account funds appropriated in this subsection, up to one percent may be used for program administration and staffing.(c) For future rounds of grant selection, the department must reevaluate the criteria to increase geographic diversity of jurisdictions consistent with the requirements of the healthy environment for all (HEAL) act.(3) $35,528,000 of the motor vehicle accountâfederal appropriation is provided solely for acceleration of local preservation projects that ensure the reliable movement of freight on the national highway freight system (G2000100). The department will select projects as part of its update of the state freight plan, in consultation with the freight mobility strategic investment board and other stakeholders.(4) The department shall submit a report to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2025, and December 1, 2026, on the status of projects funded as part of the pedestrian safety/safe routes to school grant program and the Sandy Williams connecting communities grant program.(5) $27,200,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the statewide school-based bicycle education grant program (L1000309). The department may partner with a statewide nonprofit to deliver programs. Of the amounts appropriated in this subsection, up to one percent may be used for program support.(6) $22,000,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a federal fund exchange pilot program. The pilot program will allow exchanges of federal surface transportation block grant population funding and state funds at an exchange rate of 95 cents in state funds per $1.00 in federal funds. The entirety of the appropriation in this subsection must be held in unallotted status until: Surface transportation block grant population funding has been offered to the state, the department determines that a federalized project or projects funded in section 305 or 306 of this act, is eligible to spend the surface transportation block grant population funding, and state funds appropriated in section 305 or 306 of this act, for the eligible state project or projects in an amount equal to 100 percent of the offered surface transportation block grant population funding have been placed in unallotted status. A report on the effectiveness of the exchange program, the total estimated cost of program administration, and recommendations for continuing the pilot program is due to the governor and transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2026. The department may issue additional calls for projects with any remaining funds provided in this subsection. The legislature intends to evaluate utilization and efficacy of this program, and if underutilized, the program is intended not to continue into future biennia.(7) $33,200,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Sandy Williams connecting communities pilot program (L1000308) to deliver projects to reconnect communities that have been bifurcated by state highways. Priority must be given to historically marginalized or overburdened communities. The department may consult with the Cooper Jones active transportation safety council to identify geographic locations where there are high incidences of serious injuries and fatalities of active transportation users among vulnerable populations. Of the amounts appropriated in this subsection, up to one percent may be used for program support.(8) $500,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to award grants to local jurisdictions to implement network-wide traffic conflict screening programs using video analytics in controlled intersections with a disproportionate number of traffic violations and injuries to active transportation users (L2021149). Grants must be awarded proportionally across the state and include controlled intersections in both urban and rural environments and along state highways and county roads. Grant recipients must report back to the department all traffic violation and active transportation facility data acquired during the grant period and provide the department with appropriate next steps for the state and the local jurisdiction to improve traffic safety for active transportation users in such intersections. The department must report such findings and recommendations to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2026.(9)(a) $7,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to continue providing rebates to qualifying persons who purchase e-bikes and qualifying equipment and services from a qualifying retailer in accordance with rebate program qualification, application, retailer, and reimbursement requirements under section 310(16)(a), chapter 472, Laws of 2023. Of this amount, $4,000,000 is for rebate amounts as described under (a)(i) of this subsection and $3,000,000 is for rebate amounts as described under (a)(ii) of this subsection.(i) For persons who are at least 16 years of age and reside in households with incomes at or below 80 percent of the county area median income, the amount of the rebate is up to $1,200 on the sale of an e-bike and any qualifying equipment and services.(ii) For all other persons who are at least 16 years of age, the amount of the rebate is up to $300 on the sale of an e-bike and any qualifying equipment and services.(b) $3,568,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to continue its e-bike lending library and ownership grant program in accordance with program requirements under section 310(16)(b), chapter 472, Laws of 2023.(c) The department may not collect more than five percent of appropriated amounts to administer the programs under (a) and (b) of this subsection.(10) $19,335,000 of the freight mobility investment accountâstate appropriation and $24,952,000 of the freight mobility multimodal accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for freight mobility strategic investment board projects listed in the LEAP transportation document referenced in subsection (1) of this section.(11) $170,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Seattle office of planning and community development to finish updating the 2020 I-5 Lid Feasibility Study (L2021140).(12) The legislature intends to fund the Ballard and Magnolia Bridge project (L4000123), as described in section 911(18), chapter 472, Laws of 2023.(13) $5,100,000 of the move ahead WA flexible accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for development of an applied sustainable aviation evaluation center (L2021135). Snohomish county, in partnership with Washington State University, shall plan and establish facilities to evaluate, qualify or certify, and research technologies that can minimize the impact of aviation on human health and the environment. Funds may be used for, but are not limited to, planning, construction, and land acquisition for sustainable aviation fuel (SAF) qualification testing (ASTM D4054), research on the impact of SAF on the environment and human health, and SAF storage for the purpose of advancing sustainable aviation. At a minimum, three sustainable aviation platforms must be considered:(a) Sustainable aviation fuel;(b) Hydrogen; and(c) Battery electric energy storage mechanisms.(14) $5,000,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to assist local jurisdictions in addressing emergent issues related to safety for pedestrians and bicyclists (LXXXPBF). Funds may only be spent after approval from the office of financial management. By December 15th of each odd-numbered year, the department shall provide a report to the legislature listing all emergent issues addressed in the prior fiscal biennium. Reporting may be done in conjunction with the transportation operations division.(15) $45,000,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Confluence Parkway Infra Match project (L2021180). The legislature intends that in the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium, $35,000,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate account funds will be provided for the project only if federal project funding for Phase 2 of the Confluence Parkway project is secured.(16) $40,000,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for Columbia River Bridge Replacement/Hood River to White Salmon (L4000046). The legislature intends that in the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium and future biennia, $30,000,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate account funds will be provided for the project only if federal project funding and a match from the state of Oregon are secured for construction.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 312. ANNUAL REPORTING REQUIREMENTS FOR CAPITAL PROGRAMAs part of its annual budget submittal, the department of transportation shall provide an update to the report provided to the legislature in the prior fiscal year in a manner consistent with past practices as specified in section 312, chapter 333, Laws of 2021.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 313. QUARTERLY REPORTING REQUIREMENTS FOR CAPITAL PROGRAMOn a quarterly basis, the department of transportation shall provide to the office of financial management and the legislative transportation committees a report for all capital projects in a manner consistent with past practices as specified in section 313, chapter 186, Laws of 2022.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 314. NOTIFICATION REQUIREMENTS FOR PAUSES AND CANCELLATIONS(1) The department of transportation shall notify the transportation committees of the legislature when it intends to pause for a significant length of time or not proceed with operating items or capital projects included as budget provisos or on project lists. When feasible, this notification shall be provided prior to the pause or cancellation and at least seven days in advance of any public announcement related to such a pause or cancellation.(2) At the time of notification, the department shall provide an explanation for the reason or reasons for the pause or cancellation for each operating budget item and capital project. The explanation shall include specific reasons for each pause or cancellation, in addition to a statement of the broad rationale for the pause or cancellation.(3) When feasible, the department shall make best efforts to keep the transportation committees of the legislature informed of an evaluation process underway for selecting operating budget items and capital projects to be paused or canceled, providing updates as its selection efforts proceed.(4) When exigent circumstances prevent prior notice of a pause or cancellation from being provided to the transportation committees of the legislature, the department shall provide the information required under this section to the transportation committees of the legislature as soon as is practicable.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 315. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâFUNDS MANAGEMENTAs part of the department's 2026 supplemental and 2027-2029 biennial budget requests, the department shall also report on:(1) The federal grant programs it has applied for; and(2) The federal competitive grant programs it could have applied for but did not and the reason or reasons it did not apply.(End of part)TRANSFERS AND DISTRIBUTIONSNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 401. FOR THE STATE TREASURERâSTATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTIONMotor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation: For motorvehicle fuel tax statutory distributions tocities and counties. . . .$443,860,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation: For distribution to cities andcounties. . . .$26,786,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation: Fordistribution to cities and counties. . . .$23,438,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$494,084,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 402. FOR THE STATE TREASURERâTRANSFERSMotor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation: For motorvehicle fuel tax refunds and statutorytransfers. . . .$1,877,014,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 403. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSINGâTRANSFERSMotor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation: For motorvehicle fuel tax refunds and transfers. . . .$206,302,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 404. FOR THE STATE TREASURERâBOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND DEBT TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE ACCOUNT AND TRANSPORTATION FUND REVENUETransportation Partnership AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$4,061,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$150,000Connecting Washington AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$15,234,000Special Category C AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$510,000Puget Sound Gateway Facility AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$350,000Highway Bond Retirement AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,604,659,000Transportation Improvement Board Bond RetirementAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$5,619,000Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$28,212,000Toll Facility Bond Retirement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$90,015,000Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)âStateAppropriation. . . .$934,000Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 ExpressToll Lanes AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,877,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,751,621,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The toll facility bond retirement accountâstate appropriation includes up to $5,500,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.896.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 405. FOR THE STATE TREASURERâBOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR DEBT TO BE PAID BY STATUTORILY PRESCRIBED REVENUEToll Facility Bond Retirement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$39,742,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 406. FOR THE STATE TREASURERâBOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES AND FISCAL AGENT CHARGESTransportation Partnership AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$812,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$30,000Connecting Washington AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$3,046,000Special Category C AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$230,000Puget Sound Gateway Facility AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$450,000Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)âStateAppropriation. . . .$187,000Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 ExpressToll Lanes AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$375,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$5,130,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 407. FOR THE STATE TREASURERâADMINISTRATIVE TRANSFERS(1)(a) Transportation Partnership AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Move Ahead WAAccountâState. . . .$879,000,000(b) The amount authorized in this subsection is a maximum amount allowed and represents proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.873. Transfers under this subsection are deemed for projects or improvements identified as transportation partnership projects or improvements for purposes of RCW 47.10.873. Appropriations in the amount of this transfer are made in this act to reflect proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.873.(2) Transportation PartnershipAccountâState Appropriation: For transfer to theTacoma Narrows Toll Bridge AccountâState. . . .$4,436,000(3)(a) Connecting Washington AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Move Ahead WAAccountâState. . . .$164,000,000(b) The amount authorized in this subsection is a maximum amount allowed and represents proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.889. Transfers under this subsection are deemed for projects or improvements identified as connecting Washington projects or improvements for purposes of RCW 47.10.889. Appropriations in the amount of this transfer are made in this act to reflect proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.889.(4)(a) Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)âStateAppropriation: For transfer to theMove Ahead WA AccountâState. . . .$212,000,000(b) The amount authorized in this subsection is a maximum amount allowed and represents proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.861. Transfers under this subsection are deemed for projects or improvements identified as transportation 2003 (nickel) projects or improvements for purposes of RCW 47.10.861. Appropriations in the amount of this transfer are made in this act to reflect proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.861.(5) Move Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation:For transfer to the Puget Sound Capital ConstructionAccountâState. . . .$40,000,000(6) Move Ahead WA AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Puget Sound FerryOperations AccountâState. . . .$172,000,000(7) Move Ahead WA AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the TransportationPartnership AccountâState. . . .$40,000,000(8) Move Ahead WA Flexible AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Move AheadWA AccountâState. . . .$192,000,000(9) Pilotage AccountâState Appropriation:For transfer to the Multimodal TransportationAccountâState. . . .$320,000(10) Transportation Infrastructure AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to theMultimodal Transportation AccountâState. . . ..$9,000,000(11) Regional Mobility Grant Program AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the MultimodalTransportation AccountâState. . . .$9,000,000(12) Electric Vehicle AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to Move Ahead WAFlexible AccountâState. . . .$3,600,000(13)(a) Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement ProjectAccountâState Appropriation: For transfer to theTransportation Partnership AccountâState. . . .$22,896,000(b) The amount transferred in this subsection represents repayment of debt service incurred for the construction of the SR 99/Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement project (809936Z).(14) Highway Safety AccountâState Appropriation:For transfer to the State Patrol HighwayAccountâState. . . .$88,000,000(15) Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation:For transfer to the County Arterial PreservationAccountâState. . . .$4,844,000(16) Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation:For transfer to the Freight Mobility InvestmentAccountâState. . . .$8,511,000(17) Motor Vehicle AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Rural ArterialTrust AccountâState. . . .$4,844,000(18) Motor Vehicle AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the TransportationImprovement AccountâState. . . .$9,688,000(19) Motor Vehicle AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the State PatrolHighway AccountâState. . . .$130,000,000(20) Motor Vehicle AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Capital VesselReplacement AccountâState. . . .$5,000,000(21) Motor Vehicle AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Puget SoundCapital Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,500,000(22) Motor Vehicle AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Puget SoundFerry Operations AccountâState. . . .$15,000,000(23) Puget Sound Ferry Operations AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Puget Sound CapitalConstruction AccountâState. . . .$115,315,000(24) State Route Number 520 Civil PenaltiesAccountâState Appropriation: For transfer to the MotorVehicle AccountâState. . . .$3,000,000(25) State Route Number 520 Civil PenaltiesAccountâState Appropriation: For transfer to theState Route Number 520 Corridor AccountâState. . . .$1,752,000(26) Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Move Ahead WAFlexible AccountâState. . . .$18,770,000(27) Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Puget SoundFerry Operations AccountâState. . . .$64,000,000(28) Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Complete StreetsGrant Program AccountâState. . . .$14,670,000(29) Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Freight MobilityMultimodal AccountâState. . . .$8,511,000(30) Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Puget Sound CapitalConstruction AccountâState. . . .$105,000,000(31) Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Regional MobilityGrant Program AccountâState. . . .$27,679,000(32) Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Rural MobilityGrant Program AccountâState. . . .$12,223,000(33) Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the TransportationPartnership AccountâState. . . .$25,000,000(34) Carbon Emissions Reduction AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Puget Sound FerryOperations AccountâState. . . .$4,200,000(35)(a) General Fund AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the State Patrol HighwayAccountâState. . . .$625,000(b) The state treasurer shall transfer the funds under this subsection only after receiving notification from the Washington state patrol under section 207 of this act.(36)(a) Highway Safety AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Driver EducationSafety Improvement AccountâState for fiscalyear 2026. . . .$2,000,000(b) Driver Education Safety ImprovementAccountâState Appropriation: For transfer tothe Highway Safety AccountâState for fiscal year 2027. . . .$2,000,000(End of part)COMPENSATIONNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 501. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS NOT IMPAIREDNothing in this act prohibits the expenditure of any funds by an agency or institution of the state for benefits guaranteed by any collective bargaining agreement in effect on the effective date of this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 502. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS(1) In accordance with chapters 41.80, 41.56, and 47.64 RCW, agreements have been reached between the governor and employee organizations representing state employee bargaining units for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium and funding is provided in this act for agreement with the following organizations:(a) Washington federation of state employees, general government;(b) Professional and technical engineers, local 17;(c) The coalition of unions;(d) Washington state patrol troopers association;(e) Washington state patrol lieutenants and captains association;(f) Office and professional employees international union local 8;(g) Ferry agents, supervisors, and project administrators association;(h) Service employees international union local 6;(i) Pacific Northwest regional council of carpenters;(j) Puget Sound metal trades council;(k) Marine engineers' beneficial association unlicensed engine room employees;(l) Marine engineers' beneficial association licensed engineer officers;(m) Marine engineers' beneficial association port engineers;(n) Masters, mates, and pilots - mates;(o) Masters, mates, and pilots - masters;(p) Masters, mates, and pilots â watch center supervisors; and(q) Inlandboatmen's union of the Pacific;(2) Expenditures for agreements in this section may also be funded from nonappropriated accounts. If positions are funded with lidded grants or dedicated fund sources with insufficient revenue, additional funding from other sources is not provided.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 503. COMPENSATIONâINSURANCE BENEFITS(1)(a) An agreement was reached for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium between the governor and the health care coalition under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW. Appropriations in this act for state agencies are sufficient to implement the provisions of the 2025-2027 collective bargaining agreement.(b) Appropriations for state agencies in this act are sufficient for represented employees outside the coalition and for nonrepresented state employee health benefits.(2) The appropriations for state agencies in this act for benefits provided by the public employees' benefits board are subject to conditions and limitations as provided in the omnibus operating appropriations act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 504. GENERAL WAGE INCREASESAppropriations for state agency employee compensation in this act are sufficient to provide general wage increases to state agency employees and employees of institutions of higher education, who are not represented or who bargain under statutory authority other than chapter 41.80 or 47.64 RCW or RCW 41.56.473 or 41.56.475, as described in the omnibus operating appropriations act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 505. COMPENSATIONâPENSION CONTRIBUTIONSAppropriations in this act for state agencies are adjusted to reflect pension contribution rates adopted by the pension funding council and the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 board and as otherwise provided in the omnibus operating appropriations act.(End of part)IMPLEMENTING PROVISIONSNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 601. MANAGEMENT OF TRANSPORTATION FUNDS WHEN THE LEGISLATURE IS NOT IN SESSION(1) The 2005 transportation partnership projects or improvements, 2015 connecting Washington projects or improvements, and move ahead WA projects or improvements are listed in the LEAP Transportation Document 2025-1 as developed April 26, 2025, which consists of a list of specific projects by fund source and amount over multiple biennia. Current fiscal biennium funding for each project is a line-item appropriation, while the outer year funding allocations represent a six-year plan. The department of transportation is expected to use the flexibility provided in this section to assist in the delivery and completion of all transportation partnership account, connecting Washington account, and move ahead WA account projects on the LEAP transportation document referenced in this subsection. For the 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 project appropriations, unless otherwise provided in this act, the director of the office of financial management may provide written authorization for a transfer of appropriation authority between projects funded with transportation partnership account appropriations, connecting Washington account appropriations, or move ahead WA account appropriations to manage project spending and efficiently deliver all projects in the respective program under the following conditions and limitations:(a) Transfers may only be made within each specific fund source referenced on the respective project list;(b) Transfers from a project may not be made as a result of the reduction of the scope of a project or be made to support increases in the scope of a project;(c) Transfers from a project may be made if the funds appropriated to the project are in excess of the amount needed in the current fiscal biennium;(d) Transfers may not occur for projects not identified on the applicable project list;(e) Transfers to a project may not occur if that project is a programmatic funding item described in broad general terms on the applicable project list without referencing a specific state route number;(f) Transfers may not be made while the legislature is in session;(g) Transfers to a project may not be made with funds designated as attributable to practical design savings as described in RCW 47.01.480;(h) The total amount of transfers under this section may not exceed $100,000,000;(i) Except as otherwise provided in (k) of this subsection, transfers made to a single project may not cumulatively total more than $50,000,000 per fiscal biennium, and may not total more than the amount identified for a project within the six-year plan;(j) Each transfer between projects may only occur if the director of the office of financial management finds that any resulting change will not hinder the completion of the projects as approved by the legislature; and(k) Transfers between projects may be made by the department of transportation without the formal written approval provided under this subsection (1), provided that the transfer amount to a single project does not exceed $250,000 or 10 percent of the total project per fiscal biennium, whichever is less. These transfers must be reported quarterly to the director of the office of financial management and the chairs of the house of representatives and senate transportation committees.(2) The department of transportation must submit quarterly all transfers authorized under this section in the transportation executive information system. The office of financial management must maintain a legislative baseline project list identified in the LEAP transportation documents referenced in this act, and update that project list with all authorized transfers under this section, including any effects to the total project budgets and schedules beyond the current fiscal biennium.(3) At the time the department submits a request to transfer funds under this section, a copy of the request must be submitted to the chairs and ranking members of the transportation committees of the legislature.(4) Before approval, the office of financial management shall work with legislative staff of the house of representatives and senate transportation committees to review the requested transfers in a timely manner and address any concerns raised by the chairs and ranking members of the transportation committees.(5) No fewer than 10 days after the receipt of a project transfer request, the director of the office of financial management must provide written notification to the department of any decision regarding project transfers, with copies submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature.(6) The department must submit annually as part of its budget submittal a report detailing all transfers made pursuant to this section, including any effects to the total project budgets and schedules beyond the current fiscal biennium.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 602. BOND REIMBURSEMENTTo the extent that any appropriation authorizes expenditures of state funds from the motor vehicle account, special category C account, Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, transportation 2003 account (nickel account), transportation partnership account, transportation improvement account, Puget Sound capital construction account, multimodal transportation account, state route number 520 corridor account, connecting Washington account, or other transportation capital project account in the state treasury for a state transportation program that is specified to be funded with proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in chapter 47.10 RCW, the legislature declares that any such expenditures made before the issue date of the applicable transportation bonds for that state transportation program are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of those transportation bonds in a maximum amount equal to the amount of such appropriation.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 603. BELATED CLAIMSThe agencies and institutions of the state may expend moneys appropriated in this act, upon approval of the office of financial management, for the payment of supplies and services furnished to the agency or institution in prior fiscal biennia.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 604. REAPPROPRIATIONS REPORTING(1) As part of its 2026 supplemental budget submittal, the department of transportation shall provide a report to the legislature and the office of financial management that:(a) Identifies, by capital project, the amount of state funding that has been reappropriated from the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium into the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium; and(b) Identifies, for each project, the amount of cost savings or increases in funding that have been identified as compared to the 2023 enacted omnibus transportation appropriations act.(2) As part of the agency request for capital programs, the department shall load reappropriations separately from funds that were assumed to be required for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium into budgeting systems.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 605. WEBSITE REPORTING REQUIREMENTSThe department of transportation shall post on its website every report that is due from the department to the legislature during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium on one web page in a manner consistent with past practices as specified in section 605, chapter 333, Laws of 2021.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 606. TRANSIT, BICYCLE, AND PEDESTRIAN ELEMENTS REPORTINGBy November 15th of each year, the department of transportation must report on amounts expended to benefit transit, bicycle, or pedestrian elements within all connecting Washington projects in programs I, P, and Z identified in LEAP Transportation Document 2025-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed April 26, 2025, in a manner consistent with past practices as specified in section 602, chapter 186, Laws of 2022.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 607. PROJECT SCOPE CHANGES(1) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, while the legislature is not in session, the director of the office of financial management may approve project scope change requests to connecting Washington projects and move ahead WA projects in the highway improvements program, provided that the requests meet the criteria outlined in RCW 47.01.480 if a connecting Washington project, and are subject to the limitations in this section.(2) At the time the department of transportation submits a request for a project scope change under this section, a copy of the request must be submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature.(3) Before approval, the office of financial management shall work with legislative staff of the house of representatives and senate transportation committees to review the requested project scope changes.(4) No fewer than 10 days after the receipt of a scope change request, the director of the office of financial management must provide written notification to the department of any decision regarding project scope changes, with copies submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature.(5) As part of its annual budget submittal, the department of transportation must report on all approved scope change requests from the prior year, including a comparison of the scope before and after the requested change.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 608. TOLL CREDITS(1) The department of transportation, and any local partner on a project that may receive state funds, must indicate on any application for federal grants for eligible transportation projects, if and when possible, that toll credits may be used to fulfill state and local match requirements for any federal grant award amount.(2) The department of transportation may provide up to $5,000,000 in toll credits to Kitsap transit for its role in delivering capital projects related to Kitsap transit public transportation services including, but not limited to, ferry service. The number of toll credits provided must be equal to, but no more than, the number sufficient to meet federal match requirements for grant funding for passenger-only ferry service, but must not exceed the amount authorized in this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 609. LOCAL PARTNER COOPERATIVE AGREEMENTS(1) If a transportation project, where the Washington state department of transportation is the lead and the project is scheduled to be delivered or completed in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium as shown on the LEAP Transportation Document 2025-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed April 26, 2025, is in jeopardy of being delayed because the department is unable to deliver or complete the project within the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium and other local jurisdictions are able to deliver or complete the work, the department must coordinate with the appropriate local jurisdictions to determine if a potential local partner is ready, willing, and able to execute delivery and completion of the project within the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.(2) The department must compile a list of projects under this section, including the timing under which the local partner agency can deliver or complete the projects within the 2025-2027 and 2027-2029 fiscal biennia. The department must submit the compiled list of projects to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by November 1, 2025.(End of part)MISCELLANEOUS 2025-2027 FISCAL BIENNIUMNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 701. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY OVERSIGHTThe following transportation projects are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 (2) through (12), chapter . . ., Laws of 2025 (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5167) (omnibus operating appropriations act): For the department of transportation: Washington state ferries dispatch system replacement and Washington state ferries ticketing and reservations modernization.Sec. 702. RCW 36.79.020 and 1997 c 81 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:There is created in the motor vehicle fund the rural arterial trust account. All moneys deposited in the motor vehicle fund to be credited to the rural arterial trust account shall be expended for (1) the construction and improvement of county rural arterials and collectors, (2) the construction of replacement bridges funded by the federal bridge replacement program on access roads in rural areas, and (3) those expenses of the board associated with the administration of the rural arterial program. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the rural arterial trust account may also be used for staffing-related expenses of the board, contracting costs, and grants associated with bridge ratings.Sec. 703. RCW 46.09.540 and 2021 c 333 s 720 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The multiuse roadway safety account is created in the motor vehicle fund. All receipts from vehicle license fees under RCW 46.17.350(1)(r) must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. ((Expenditures))Except as provided in (e) of this subsection and subsection (3) of this section, expenditures from the account may be used only for grants administered by the department of transportation to: (a) Counties to perform safety engineering analysis of mixed vehicle use on any road within a county; (b) local governments to provide funding to erect signs providing notice to the motoring public that (i) wheeled all-terrain vehicles are present or (ii) wheeled all-terrain vehicles may be crossing; (c) the state patrol or local law enforcement for purposes of defraying the costs of enforcement of chapter 23, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.; (d) law enforcement to investigate accidents involving wheeled all-terrain vehicles; and (e) during the ((2021-2023))2025-2027 biennium grants may be made to counties and cities to (i) enhance or maintain any segment of a road within the ((county))jurisdiction in which the segment has been designated as part of a travel or tourism route for use by wheeled all-terrain vehicles; and (ii) purchase, print, develop, or use educational brochures or mapping technology that aids in the safety and direction of users of wheeled all-terrain vehicle routes.(2) The department of transportation must prioritize grant awards in the following priority order:(a) For the purpose of marking highway crossings with signs warning motorists that wheeled all-terrain vehicles may be crossing when an ORV recreation facility parking lot is on the other side of a public roadway from the actual ORV recreation facility; and(b) For the purpose of marking intersections with signs where a wheeled all-terrain vehicle may cross a public road to advise motorists of the upcoming intersection. Such signs must conform to the manual on uniform traffic control devices.(3)(a) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, expenditures from the account may be used for interagency transfers to the departments of natural resources and fish and wildlife, during the second year of the fiscal biennium, with respect to roads that are comanaged by the agencies and which are open for use by wheeled all-terrain vehicles, for the purposes of:(i) Mitigating impacts to road surfaces caused by wheeled all-terrain vehicles on public roadways authorized for wheeled all-terrain vehicle travel;(ii) Erecting signage to identify the designation of public roadways as either open or closed to wheeled all-terrain vehicles, depending on whether the roadway has been authorized for wheeled all-terrain vehicle travel; or(iii) Purchasing, printing, developing, or using educational brochures or mapping technology that aids in the safety and direction of users of wheeled all-terrain vehicle routes.(b) The department of transportation must limit the interagency transfers to the departments of natural resources and fish and wildlife under this subsection (3) such that a minimum of $80,000 is available to be allocated for grants to eligible local governments during the biennium.(c) Prior to an interagency transfer to either the department of natural resources or the department of fish and wildlife under this subsection (3), the county or counties in which the proposed project will take place must first submit a letter of support to the implementing department and to the department of transportation.Sec. 704. RCW 46.20.745 and 2023 c 472 s 704 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The ignition interlock device revolving account program is created within the department to assist in covering the monetary costs of installing, removing, and leasing an ignition interlock device, and applicable licensing, for indigent persons who are required under RCW 46.20.385, 46.20.720, and 46.61.5055 to install an ignition interlock device in all vehicles owned or operated by the person. For purposes of this subsection, "indigent" has the same meaning as in RCW 10.101.010, as determined by the department. During the ((2021-2023 and)) 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 fiscal biennia, the ignition interlock device revolving account program also includes ignition interlock enforcement work conducted by the Washington state patrol.(2) A pilot program is created within the ignition interlock device revolving account program for the purpose of monitoring compliance by persons required to use ignition interlock devices and by ignition interlock companies and vendors.(3) The department, the state patrol, and the Washington traffic safety commission shall coordinate to establish a compliance pilot program that will target at least one county from eastern Washington and one county from western Washington, as determined by the department, state patrol, and Washington traffic safety commission.(4) At a minimum, the compliance pilot program shall:(a) Review the number of ignition interlock devices that are required to be installed in the targeted county and the number of ignition interlock devices actually installed;(b) Work to identify those persons who are not complying with ignition interlock requirements or are repeatedly violating ignition interlock requirements; and(c) Identify ways to track compliance and reduce noncompliance.(5) As part of monitoring compliance, the Washington traffic safety commission shall also track recidivism for violations of RCW 46.61.502 and 46.61.504 by persons required to have an ignition interlock driver's license under RCW 46.20.385 and 46.20.720.Sec. 705. RCW 46.68.063 and 2023 c 472 s 706 are each amended to read as follows:The department of licensing technology improvement and data management account is created in the highway safety account. All receipts from fees collected under RCW 46.12.630(5) must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for investments in technology and data management at the department. During the ((2021-2023 and)) 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 fiscal biennia, the account may also be used for responding to public records requests. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.Sec. 706. RCW 46.68.090 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 44 s 105 are each amended to read as follows:(1) All moneys that have accrued or may accrue to the motor vehicle fund from the fuel tax must be first expended for purposes enumerated in (a) and (b) of this subsection. The remaining net tax amount must be distributed monthly by the state treasurer in accordance with subsections (2) through (8) of this section.(a) For payment of refunds of fuel tax that has been paid and is refundable as provided by law;(b) For payment of amounts to be expended pursuant to appropriations for the administrative expenses of the offices of state treasurer, state auditor, and the department of licensing of the state of Washington in the administration of the fuel tax, which sums must be distributed monthly.(2) All of the remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.38.030(1) must be distributed as set forth in (a) through (j) of this subsection.(a) For distribution to the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 44.387 percent to be expended for highway purposes of the state as defined in RCW 46.68.130;(b)(i) For distribution to the special category C account, hereby created in the motor vehicle fund, an amount equal to 3.2609 percent to be expended for special category C projects. Special category C projects are category C projects that, due to high cost only, will require bond financing to complete construction.(ii) The following criteria, listed in order of priority, must be used in determining which special category C projects have the highest priority:(A) Accident experience;(B) Fatal accident experience;(C) Capacity to move people and goods safely and at reasonable speeds without undue congestion; and(D) Continuity of development of the highway transportation network.(iii) Moneys deposited in the special category C account in the motor vehicle fund may be used for payment of debt service on bonds the proceeds of which are used to finance special category C projects under this subsection (2)(b);(c) For distribution to the Puget Sound ferry operations account in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.3283 percent;(d) For distribution to the Puget Sound capital construction account in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.3726 percent;(e) For distribution to the transportation improvement account in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 7.5597 percent;(f) For distribution to the transportation improvement account in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 5.6739 percent and expended in accordance with RCW 47.26.086;(g) For distribution to the cities and towns from the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 10.6961 percent in accordance with RCW 46.68.110;(h) For distribution to the counties from the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 19.2287 percent: (i) Out of which there must be distributed from time to time, as directed by the department of transportation, those sums as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of RCW 47.56.725; and (ii) less any amounts appropriated to the county road administration board to implement the provisions of RCW 47.56.725(4), with the balance of such county share to be distributed monthly as the same accrues for distribution in accordance with RCW 46.68.120;(i) For distribution to the county arterial preservation account, hereby created in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 1.9565 percent. These funds must be distributed by the county road administration board to counties in proportions corresponding to the number of paved arterial lane miles in the unincorporated area of each county and must be used for improvements to sustain the structural, safety, and operational integrity of county arterials. The county road administration board must adopt reasonable rules and develop policies to implement this program and to assure that a pavement management system is used. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the county arterial preservation account may also be used for staffing-related expenses of the board, contracting costs, and grants associated with bridge ratings;(j) For distribution to the rural arterial trust account in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.5363 percent and expended in accordance with RCW 36.79.020.(3) The remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.38.030(2) must be distributed to the transportation 2003 account (nickel account).(4) The remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.38.030(3) must be distributed as follows:(a) 8.3333 percent must be distributed to the incorporated cities and towns of the state in accordance with RCW 46.68.110;(b) 8.3333 percent must be distributed to counties of the state in accordance with RCW 46.68.120; and(c) The remainder must be distributed to the transportation partnership account created in RCW 46.68.290.(5) The remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.38.030(4) must be distributed as follows:(a) 8.3333 percent must be distributed to the incorporated cities and towns of the state in accordance with RCW 46.68.110;(b) 8.3333 percent must be distributed to counties of the state in accordance with RCW 46.68.120; and(c) The remainder must be distributed to the transportation partnership account created in RCW 46.68.290.(6) The remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.38.030 (5) and (6) must be distributed to the transportation partnership account created in RCW 46.68.290.(7) The remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.38.030 (7) and (8) must be distributed to the connecting Washington account created in RCW 46.68.395.(8) Nothing in this section or in RCW 46.68.130 may be construed so as to violate any terms or conditions contained in any highway construction bond issues now or hereafter authorized by statute and whose payment is by such statute pledged to be paid from any excise taxes on fuel.Sec. 707. RCW 46.68.280 and 2019 c 416 s 706 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The transportation 2003 account (nickel account) is hereby created in the motor vehicle fund. Money in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account must be used only for projects or improvements identified as transportation 2003 projects or improvements in the omnibus transportation budget and to pay the principal and interest on the bonds authorized for transportation 2003 projects or improvements. Upon completion of the projects or improvements identified as transportation 2003 projects or improvements, moneys deposited in this account must only be used to pay the principal and interest on the bonds authorized for transportation 2003 projects or improvements, and any funds in the account in excess of the amount necessary to make the principal and interest payments may be used for maintenance on the completed projects or improvements.(2) ((During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the transportation 2003 account (nickel account) to the connecting Washington account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the transportation 2003 account (nickel account).(3) During the 2017-2019 and the 2019-2021 fiscal biennia, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the transportation 2003 account (nickel account) to the connecting Washington account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, and the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account.))During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the transportation 2003 account (nickel account) to the move ahead WA account.(((4)))(3) The "nickel account" means the transportation 2003 account.Sec. 708. RCW 46.68.290 and 2023 c 472 s 707 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The transportation partnership account is hereby created in the motor vehicle account. All distributions to the account from RCW 46.68.090 must be deposited into the account. Money in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account must be used only for projects or improvements identified as 2005 transportation partnership projects or improvements in the omnibus transportation appropriations act, including any principal and interest on bonds authorized for the projects or improvements.(2) The legislature finds that:(a) Citizens demand and deserve accountability of transportation-related programs and expenditures. Transportation-related programs must continuously improve in quality, efficiency, and effectiveness in order to increase public trust;(b) Transportation-related agencies that receive tax dollars must continuously improve the way they operate and deliver services so citizens receive maximum value for their tax dollars; and(c) Fair, independent, comprehensive performance audits of transportation-related agencies overseen by the elected state auditor are essential to improving the efficiency, economy, and effectiveness of the state's transportation system.(3) For purposes of chapter 314, Laws of 2005:(a) "Performance audit" means an objective and systematic assessment of a state agency or agencies or any of their programs, functions, or activities by the state auditor or designee in order to help improve agency efficiency, effectiveness, and accountability. Performance audits include economy and efficiency audits and program audits.(b) "Transportation-related agency" means any state agency, board, or commission that receives funding primarily for transportation-related purposes. At a minimum, the department of transportation, the transportation improvement board or its successor entity, the county road administration board or its successor entity, and the traffic safety commission are considered transportation-related agencies. The Washington state patrol and the department of licensing shall not be considered transportation-related agencies under chapter 314, Laws of 2005.(4) Within the authorities and duties under chapter 43.09 RCW, the state auditor shall establish criteria and protocols for performance audits. Transportation-related agencies shall be audited using criteria that include generally accepted government auditing standards as well as legislative mandates and performance objectives established by state agencies. Mandates include, but are not limited to, agency strategies, timelines, program objectives, and mission and goals as required in RCW 43.88.090.(5) Within the authorities and duties under chapter 43.09 RCW, the state auditor may conduct performance audits for transportation-related agencies. The state auditor shall contract with private firms to conduct the performance audits.(6) The audits may include:(a) Identification of programs and services that can be eliminated, reduced, consolidated, or enhanced;(b) Identification of funding sources to the transportation-related agency, to programs, and to services that can be eliminated, reduced, consolidated, or enhanced;(c) Analysis of gaps and overlaps in programs and services and recommendations for improving, dropping, blending, or separating functions to correct gaps or overlaps;(d) Analysis and recommendations for pooling information technology systems used within the transportation-related agency, and evaluation of information processing and telecommunications policy, organization, and management;(e) Analysis of the roles and functions of the transportation-related agency, its programs, and its services and their compliance with statutory authority and recommendations for eliminating or changing those roles and functions and ensuring compliance with statutory authority;(f) Recommendations for eliminating or changing statutes, rules, and policy directives as may be necessary to ensure that the transportation-related agency carry out reasonably and properly those functions vested in the agency by statute;(g) Verification of the reliability and validity of transportation-related agency performance data, self-assessments, and performance measurement systems as required under RCW 43.88.090;(h) Identification of potential cost savings in the transportation-related agency, its programs, and its services;(i) Identification and recognition of best practices;(j) Evaluation of planning, budgeting, and program evaluation policies and practices;(k) Evaluation of personnel systems operation and management;(l) Evaluation of purchasing operations and management policies and practices;(m) Evaluation of organizational structure and staffing levels, particularly in terms of the ratio of managers and supervisors to nonmanagement personnel; and(n) Evaluation of transportation-related project costs, including but not limited to environmental mitigation, competitive bidding practices, permitting processes, and capital project management.(7) Within the authorities and duties under chapter 43.09 RCW, the state auditor must provide the preliminary performance audit reports to the audited state agency for comment. The auditor also may seek input on the preliminary report from other appropriate officials. Comments must be received within 30 days after receipt of the preliminary performance audit report unless a different time period is approved by the state auditor. The final performance audit report shall include the objectives, scope, and methodology; the audit results, including findings and recommendations; the agency's response and conclusions; and identification of best practices.(8) The state auditor shall provide final performance audit reports to the citizens of Washington, the governor, the joint legislative audit and review committee, the appropriate legislative committees, and other appropriate officials. Final performance audit reports shall be posted on the internet.(9) The audited transportation-related agency is responsible for follow-up and corrective action on all performance audit findings and recommendations. The audited agency's plan for addressing each audit finding and recommendation shall be included in the final audit report. The plan shall provide the name of the contact person responsible for each action, the action planned, and the anticipated completion date. If the audited agency does not agree with the audit findings and recommendations or believes action is not required, then the action plan shall include an explanation and specific reasons.The office of financial management shall require periodic progress reports from the audited agency until all resolution has occurred. The office of financial management is responsible for achieving audit resolution. The office of financial management shall annually report by December 31st the status of performance audit resolution to the appropriate legislative committees and the state auditor. The legislature shall consider the performance audit results in connection with the state budget process.The auditor may request status reports on specific audits or findings.(10) For the period from July 1, 2005, until June 30, 2007, the amount of $4,000,000 is appropriated from the transportation partnership account to the state auditors office for the purposes of subsections (2) through (9) of this section.(11) During the ((2021-2023 and)) 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 fiscal biennia, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the transportation partnership account to the motor vehicle account, the move ahead WA account, and the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account.Sec. 709. RCW 46.68.300 and 2024 c 310 s 603 are each amended to read as follows:The freight mobility investment account is hereby created in the state treasury. Money in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for freight mobility projects that have been recommended by the freight mobility strategic investment board in RCW 47.06A.020 and may include any principal and interest on bonds authorized for the projects or improvements. During the ((2021-2023 and)) 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 fiscal biennia, the expenditures from the account may also be used for the administrative expenses of the freight mobility strategic investment board.Sec. 710. RCW 46.68.320 and 2024 c 310 s 604 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The regional mobility grant program account is hereby created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the grants provided under RCW 47.66.030.(2) Beginning with September 2007, by the last day of September, December, March, and June of each year, the state treasurer shall transfer from the multimodal transportation account to the regional mobility grant program account $5,000,000.(3) Beginning with September 2015, by the last day of September, December, March, and June of each year, the state treasurer shall transfer from the multimodal transportation account to the regional mobility grant program account $6,250,000.(4) During the 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys from the regional mobility grant program account to the multimodal transportation account.Sec. 711. RCW 46.68.370 and 2023 c 472 s 709 are each amended to read as follows:The license plate technology account is created in the state treasury. All receipts collected under RCW 46.17.015 must be deposited into this account. Expenditures from this account must support current and future license plate technology and systems integration upgrades for both the department and correctional industries. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Additionally, the moneys in this account may be used to reimburse the motor vehicle ((account [fund]))fund for any appropriation made to implement the digital license plate system. During the 2011-2013 and 2013-2015 fiscal biennia, the legislature may transfer from the license plate technology account to the highway safety fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the license plate technology account. During the ((2021-2023 and)) 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 fiscal biennia, the account may also be used for the maintenance of recently modernized information technology systems for vehicle registrations.Sec. 712. RCW 46.68.395 and 2023 c 472 s 710 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The connecting Washington account is created in the motor vehicle account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account must be used only for projects or improvements identified as connecting Washington projects or improvements in a transportation appropriations act, including any principal and interest on bonds authorized for the projects or improvements.(2) Moneys in the connecting Washington account may not be expended on the state route number 99 Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project.(3) During the 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the connecting Washington account to the move ahead WA account.Sec. 713. RCW 46.68.510 and 2024 c 310 s 605 are each amended to read as follows:The move ahead WA account is created in the motor vehicle fund. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account must be used only for projects or improvements identified as move ahead WA projects or improvements in an omnibus transportation appropriations act, including any principal and interest on bonds authorized for the projects or improvements. During the 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys from the move ahead WA account to the motor vehicle fund, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), and the transportation partnership account.Sec. 714. RCW 47.56.876 and 2023 c 472 s 713 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A special account to be known as the state route number 520 civil penalties account is created in the state treasury. All state route number 520 bridge replacement and HOV program civil penalties generated from the nonpayment of tolls on the state route number 520 corridor must be deposited into the account, as provided under RCW 47.56.870(4)(b)(vii). Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account must be used to fund legal obligations associated with bonds and loans associated with the construction and operation of state route number 520 under circumstances where the toll revenue collections at the time are not sufficient to fully cover such legal obligations, and then may be used to fund any project within the state route number 520 bridge replacement and HOV program, including mitigation. The legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the state route number 520 civil penalties account to the state route number 520 corridor account. During the ((2021-2023 and)) 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 fiscal biennia, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to transfer moneys in the state route number 520 civil penalties account to the motor vehicle ((account [fund]))fund.(2) For purposes of this section, "legal obligations associated with bonds and loans" includes, but is not limited to, debt service and all other activities necessary to comply with financial covenants associated with state route number 520, costs associated with the civil penalties program, and operation and maintenance costs.Sec. 715. RCW 47.60.315 and 2023 c 472 s 714 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The commission shall adopt fares and pricing policies by rule, under chapter 34.05 RCW, according to the following schedule:(a) Each year the department shall provide the commission a report of its review of fares and pricing policies, with recommendations for the revision of fares and pricing policies for the ensuing year;(b) By September 1st of each year, beginning in 2008, the commission shall adopt by rule fares and pricing policies for the ensuing year.(2) The commission may adopt by rule fares that are effective for more or less than one year for the purposes of transitioning to the fare schedule in subsection (1) of this section.(3) The commission may increase ferry fares included in the schedule of charges adopted under this section by a percentage that exceeds the fiscal growth factor.(4) The chief executive officer of the ferry system may authorize the use of promotional, discounted, and special event fares to the general public and commercial enterprises for the purpose of maximizing capacity use and the revenues collected by the ferry system. The department shall report to the commission a summary of the promotional, discounted, and special event fares offered during each fiscal year and the financial results from these activities.(5) Fare revenues and other revenues deposited in the Puget Sound ferry operations account created in RCW 47.60.530 may not be used to support the Puget Sound capital construction account created in RCW 47.60.505, unless the support for capital is separately identified in the fare or except as provided in ((section 715, chapter 333, Laws of 2021 during the 2021-2023 biennium and)) section 716, chapter 472, Laws of 2023 during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium and section 716, chapter . . ., Laws of 2025 (this act) during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.(6) The commission may not raise fares until the fare rules contain pricing policies developed under RCW 47.60.290, or September 1, 2009, whichever is later.(7) The commission shall impose a vessel replacement surcharge of 25 cents on every one-way and round-trip ferry fare sold, including multiride and monthly pass fares. This surcharge must be clearly indicated to ferry passengers and drivers and, if possible, on the fare media itself.(8) Except as provided in subsection (10) of this section, beginning May 1, 2020, the commission shall impose an additional vessel replacement surcharge in an amount sufficient to fund 25 year debt service on one 144-auto hybrid vessel taking into account funds provided in chapter 417, Laws of 2019 or chapter . . . (SSB 5419), Laws of 2019. The department of transportation shall provide to the commission vessel and debt service cost estimates. Information on vessels constructed or purchased with revenue from the surcharges must be publicly posted including, but not limited to, the commission website.(9) The vessel replacement surcharges imposed in this section may only be used for the construction or purchase of ferry vessels and to pay the principal and interest on bonds authorized for the construction or purchase of new ferry vessels.(10) The commission shall not impose the additional vessel replacement surcharge in subsection (8) of this section if doing so would increase fares by more than 10 percent.(11) For the 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, any ferry fuel surcharge imposed by the commission may not go into effect until after the ensuing regular legislative session. If a fuel surcharge is imposed as provided under this subsection, the commission must reevaluate the need for the surcharge on at least a quarterly basis to determine if the surcharge is still needed to cover increased fuel costs, and revoke the surcharge if the determination is that the surcharge is no longer needed for this purpose.Sec. 716. RCW 47.60.530 and 2023 c 472 s 716 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The Puget Sound ferry operations account is created in the motor vehicle account.(2) The following funds must be deposited into the account:(a) All moneys directed by law;(b) All revenues generated from ferry fares; and(c) All revenues generated from commercial advertising, concessions, parking, and leases as allowed under RCW 47.60.140.(3) Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.(4) Expenditures from the account may be used only for the maintenance, administration, and operation of the Washington state ferry system.(5) During the ((2021-2023 and)) 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 fiscal biennia, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the Puget Sound ferry operations account to the Puget Sound capital construction account.Sec. 717. RCW 47.66.120 and 2024 c 104 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) The department's public transportation division shall establish a green transportation capital grant program. The purpose of the grant program is to aid any transit authority in funding cost-effective capital projects to reduce the carbon intensity of the Washington transportation system, examples of which include: Electrification of vehicle fleets, including battery and fuel cell electric vehicles; modification or replacement of capital facilities in order to facilitate fleet electrification and/or hydrogen refueling; necessary upgrades to electrical transmission and distribution systems; and construction of charging and fueling stations. The department's public transportation division shall identify projects and shall submit a prioritized list of all projects requesting funding to the legislature by December 1st of each even-numbered year.(b) The department's public transportation division shall select projects based on a competitive process that considers the following criteria:(i) The cost-effectiveness of the reductions in carbon emissions provided by the project; and(ii) The benefit provided to transitioning the entire state to a transportation system with lower carbon intensity.(c) During the 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, the department must incorporate principles into the grant selection process with the goal of increasing the distribution of funding to communities based on addressing environmental harms and providing environmental benefits for overburdened communities, as defined in RCW 70A.02.010, and vulnerable populations.(2) The department's public transportation division must establish an advisory committee to assist in identifying projects under subsection (1) of this section. The advisory committee must include representatives from the department of ecology, the department of commerce, the utilities and transportation commission, and at least one transit authority.(3) In order to receive green transportation capital grant program funding for a project, a transit authority must provide matching funding at the level deemed appropriate by the department.(4) The department's public transportation division must report annually to the transportation committees of the legislature on the status of any grant projects funded by the program created under this section.(5) For purposes of this section, "transit authority" means a city transit system under RCW 35.58.2721 or chapter 35.95A RCW, a county public transportation authority under chapter 36.57 RCW, a metropolitan municipal corporation transit system under chapter 36.56 RCW, a public transportation benefit area under chapter 36.57A RCW, an unincorporated transportation benefit area under RCW 36.57.100, a regional transit authority under chapter 81.112 RCW, or any special purpose district formed to operate a public transportation system.(6) During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the department may provide up to 20 percent of the total green transportation capital grant program funding for zero emissions capital transition planning projects. During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the department may provide up to 10 percent of the total green transportation capital grant program funding for zero emissions capital transition planning projects. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the department may provide up to five percent of the total green transportation capital grant program funding for zero emissions capital transition planning projects.Sec. 718. RCW 82.44.200 and 2023 c 472 s 718 are each amended to read as follows:The electric vehicle account is created in the transportation infrastructure account. Proceeds from the principal and interest payments made on loans from the account must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes specified in RCW 47.04.350, 82.08.9999, and 82.12.9999, and the support of other transportation electrification and alternative fuel related purposes, including RCW 47.01.520. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. During the ((2021-2023 and)) 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 fiscal biennia, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the electric vehicle account to the move ahead WA flexible account, the move ahead WA account, and multimodal transportation account.Sec. 719. RCW 47.28.030 and 2015 c 282 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) A state highway shall be constructed, altered, repaired, or improved, and improvements located on property acquired for right-of-way purposes may be repaired or renovated pending the use of such right-of-way for highway purposes, by contract or state forces. The work or portions thereof may be done by state forces when the estimated costs thereof are less than ((fifty thousand dollars))$50,000 and effective July 1, 2005, ((sixty thousand dollars))$60,000.(b) When delay of performance of such work would jeopardize a state highway or constitute a danger to the traveling public, the work may be done by state forces when the estimated cost thereof is less than ((eighty thousand dollars))$80,000 and effective July 1, 2005, ((one hundred thousand dollars))$100,000.(c) When the department of transportation determines to do the work by state forces, it shall enter a statement upon its records to that effect, stating the reasons therefor.(d) To enable a larger number of small businesses and veteran, minority, and women contractors to effectively compete for department of transportation contracts, the department may adopt rules providing for bids and award of contracts for the performance of work, or furnishing equipment, materials, supplies, or operating services whenever any work is to be performed and the engineer's estimate indicates the cost of the work would not exceed ((eighty thousand dollars))$80,000 and effective July 1, 2005, ((one hundred thousand dollars))$100,000.(2) The rules adopted under this section:(a) Shall provide for competitive bids to the extent that competitive sources are available except when delay of performance would jeopardize life or property or inconvenience the traveling public; and(b) Need not require the furnishing of a bid deposit nor a performance bond, but if a performance bond is not required then progress payments to the contractor may be required to be made based on submittal of paid invoices to substantiate proof that disbursements have been made to laborers, material suppliers, mechanics, and subcontractors from the previous partial payment; and(c) May establish prequalification standards and procedures as an alternative to those set forth in RCW 47.28.070, but the prequalification standards and procedures under RCW 47.28.070 shall always be sufficient.(3) The department of transportation shall comply with such goals and rules as may be adopted by the office of minority and women's business enterprises to implement chapter 39.19 RCW with respect to contracts entered into under this chapter. The department may adopt such rules as may be necessary to comply with the rules adopted by the office of minority and women's business enterprises under chapter 39.19 RCW.(4)(a) Work for less than ((one hundred thousand dollars))$100,000 may be performed on ferry vessels and terminals by state forces. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, work for less than $400,000 may be performed on ferry vessels and terminals by state forces.(b) When the estimated cost of work to be performed on ferry vessels and terminals is between ((one hundred thousand dollars))$100,000 and ((two hundred thousand dollars))$200,000, or between $400,000 and $500,000 during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the department shall contact, by mail or ((electronic mail))email, contractors that appear on the department's small works roster as created pursuant to procedures in chapter 39.04 RCW to do specific work the contractors are qualified to do to determine if any contractor is interested and capable of doing the work. If there is a response of interest within ((seventy-two))72 hours, the small works roster procedures commence. If no qualified contractors respond with interest and availability to do the work, the department may use its regular contracting procedures. If the secretary determines that the work to be completed is an emergency, procedures governing emergencies apply.(c) The department shall hire a disinterested, third party to conduct an independent analysis to identify methods of reducing out-of-service times for vessel maintenance, preservation, and improvement projects. The analysis must include options that consider consolidating work while vessels are at shipyards by having state forces perform services traditionally performed at Eagle Harbor at the shipyard and decreasing the allowable time at shipyards. The analysis must also compare the out-of-service vessel times of performing services by state forces versus contracting out those services which in turn must be used to form a recommendation as to what the threshold of work performed on ferry vessels and terminals by state forces should be. This analysis must be presented to the transportation committees of the senate and house of representatives by December 1, 2010.(d) The department shall develop a proposed ferry vessel maintenance, preservation, and improvement program and present it to the transportation committees of the senate and house of representatives by December 1, 2010. The proposed program must:(i) Improve the basis for budgeting vessel maintenance, preservation, and improvement costs and for projecting those costs into a ((sixteen-year))16-year financial plan;(ii) Limit the amount of planned out-of-service time to the greatest extent possible, including options associated with department staff as well as commercial shipyards; and(iii) Be based on the service plan in the capital plan, recognizing that vessel preservation and improvement needs may vary by route.(e) In developing the proposed ferry vessel maintenance, preservation, and improvement program, the department shall consider the following, related to reducing vessel out-of-service time:(i) The costs compared to benefits of Eagle Harbor repair and maintenance facility operations options to include staffing costs and benefits in terms of reduced out-of-service time;(ii) The maintenance requirements for on-vessel staff, including the benefits of a systemwide standard;(iii) The costs compared to benefits of staff performing preservation or maintenance work, or both, while the vessel is underway, tied up between sailings, or not deployed;(iv) A review of the department's vessel maintenance, preservation, and improvement program contracting process and contractual requirements;(v) The costs compared to benefits of allowing for increased costs associated with expedited delivery;(vi) A method for comparing the anticipated out-of-service time of proposed projects and other projects planned during the same construction period;(vii) Coordination with required United States coast guard dry dockings;(viii) A method for comparing how proposed projects relate to the service requirements of the route on which the vessel normally operates; and(ix) A method for evaluating the ongoing maintenance and preservation costs associated with proposed improvement projects.Sec. 720. RCW 88.16.061 and 2018 c 107 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:The pilotage account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes of the board of pilotage commissioners as prescribed under this chapter and by the utilities and transportation commission for purposes related to pilotage tariff rate setting. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the pilotage account to the multimodal transportation account.Sec. 721. RCW 47.66.070 and 2000 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:The multimodal transportation account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for transportation purposes. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the multimodal transportation account to the general fund.Sec. 722. RCW 14.40.020 and 2024 c 310 s 601 are each amended to read as follows:The state commercial aviation work group shall submit a progress report to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, ((2024))2025, December 1, 2026, and annually every July 1st thereafter. The first report of the work group shall include a list of areas that will not have further review as the areas are in conflict with the operations of a military installation. The 2025 report must also identify unsuitable geographies due to either environmental impacts or impacts to overburdened communities. Additionally, during the 2025-2027 biennium, the work group must:(1) Work to understand what studies currently exist on state transportation needs and capacities and identify any gaps of information; and(2) Conduct meaningful community engagement with overburdened and vulnerable populations with a focus on the environmental justice impact of aviation on communities.Sec. 723. RCW 46.20.--- and 2025 c ... (ESHB 1878) s 20 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The driver education safety improvement account is created in the state treasury. The portion of the driver's application fee prescribed under RCW 46.68.041(4)(a), the portion of the driver's instruction permit application fee prescribed under RCW 46.68.041(4)(b), and the portion of the license service fee prescribed under RCW 46.17.025 must be deposited in the account. The account may also receive a portion of the revenue from traffic infraction fines as described under RCW 46.63.200(9). Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may only be used for expanding and improving driver's education programs and activities including, but not limited to, the online work zone and first responder safety course under section 2(3), chapter . . . (ESHB 1878), Laws of 2025, the driver training school instructor education opportunities program established in section 10, chapter . . . (ESHB 1878), Laws of 2025, the driver training education course voucher program established in section 11, chapter . . . (ESHB 1878), Laws of 2025, and the tribal partnership program established in section 13, chapter . . . (ESHB 1878), Laws of 2025.(2) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the driver education safety improvement account to the highway safety fund.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 724. Appropriations in this act from the natural climate solutions account, carbon emissions reduction account, climate transit programs account, and climate active transportation account are subject to the requirements of RCW 70A.65.030.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 725. DEVELOPMENT OF CLIMATE COMMITMENT ACT EVALUATION TOOLSThe department of transportation shall cooperate and provide assistance, as requested, in the joint transportation committee's development of program delivery evaluation tools and methodologies provided under section 204 of this act for programs, projects, and other activities related to emission reductions resulting from fuel conversion activities that receive funding from the carbon emissions reduction account.(End of part)2023-2025 FISCAL BIENNIUMGENERAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIESâOPERATINGSec. 801. 2024 c 310 s 103 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCECarbon Emissions Reduction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($5,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $80,000Electric Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$220,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($5,220,000))Â Â Â Â Â $300,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $220,000 of the electric vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to the department to commission an independent study, based on the findings of the transportation electrification strategy authorized under RCW 43.392.040, of costs of installation, maintenance, and operation of electrical distribution infrastructure on the utility's side of the meter to commercial customers installing electric vehicle supply equipment. The department shall gather data from at least five electric utilities serving retail customers in the state for purposes of completing the study. The department shall submit a report of study findings and an explanation of how those findings will support implementation of the transportation electrification strategy authorized under RCW 43.392.040 to the governor and appropriate legislative committees by November 1, 2024.(2) ((Beginning January 1, 2025, $5,000,000))$80,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a tribal electric boat grant program. Federally recognized tribes, tribal enterprises, and tribal members are eligible to apply for grant funds for the purchase of or conversion to electric motors and engines for fishing vessels.Sec. 802. 2024 c 310 s 105 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONMotor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,000,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($5,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,700,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($6,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,700,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) (($5,000,000))$2,700,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the University of Washington's sidewalk inventory and accessibility mapping project to develop a public dataset under an open license and develop the tools needed to publish that data according to an open data specification. The project must include, but is not limited to, utilization of existing data sources, imagery, detailed surveys, and manually collected, detailed data for city streets, county rural and urban local access roads and collectors/arterials, state roads of all types, and roads owned by other entities. The project may draw on partially developed sidewalk data for all state facilities. To the extent practicable, the final product must be suitable for use by the department of transportation, local and regional agencies, tribal governments, and the general public. For the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the project will produce a base active transportation data layer for all counties, with priority given to counties with high proportions of overburdened communities. A project status report is due to the transportation committees of the legislature on December 1st of each year until the work is completed. The legislature intends that in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, $5,000,000 of multimodal transportation account funds be provided to complete a second phase of work on the active transportation data.(2)(a) $1,000,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Washington state transportation center to fund:(i) Intern programs with the department of transportation;(ii) A road scholars short-term training program; and(iii) Professional master's degree fellowships between the department of transportation and the University of Washington within a program in civil and environmental engineering.(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $81,000 is provided solely for the center to consult with the board of registration for professional engineers and land surveyors to conduct a statewide survey and analysis assessing workforce shortages of civil engineers, civil engineering technicians, land surveyors, land surveyor technicians, and related disciplines. The center shall create a recommended action plan, with input from the legislative transportation committees, to address engineering workforce shortages and to meet the increased demand for services. The analysis and recommended action plan must include, for civil engineers, civil engineering technicians, land surveyors, land surveyor technicians, and related disciplines, at a minimum:(i) Opportunities to create diverse and equitable engineering workforce;(ii) Workforce data and gaps;(iii) Current education pathways and licensure processes;(iv) Current programs focused on workforce development and position skill-up opportunities;(v) Strategies to retain workforce within the state;(vi) Outreach opportunities and interinstitutional partnerships with middle schools, high schools, postsecondary institutions, and postgraduate programs; and(vii) Recommendations for additional scholarships, internship and apprenticeship opportunities, undergraduate and graduate fellowship opportunities, and industry partnership opportunities.(c) The center shall provide a preliminary plan with proposed actions, budgets, and outcomes to the transportation committees of the legislature by November 2024. The center shall provide a final action plan report with relevant recommendations to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 31, 2024.Sec. 803. 2024 c 310 s 106 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESCarbon Emissions Reduction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($18,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,000,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) $6,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation((, and beginning January 1, 2025, $12,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation, are))is provided solely for zero emission electric vehicle supply equipment infrastructure at facilities to accommodate charging station installations. The electric vehicle charging equipment must be coordinated with the state efficiency and environmental performance program. The department must prioritize locations based on state efficiency and environmental performance location priorities and where zero emission fleet vehicles are located or are scheduled to be purchased.(b) The department must report when and where the equipment was installed and the state agencies and facilities that benefit from the installation of the charging station to the fiscal committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025, with an interim report due January 2, 2024. The department shall collaborate with the interagency electric vehicle coordinating council to implement this section and must work to meet benchmarks established in chapter 182, Laws of 2022 (transportation resources).(2) In carrying out this section, the department shall cooperate and provide assistance, as requested, in the joint transportation committee's development of program delivery evaluation tools and methodologies provided under section 204, chapter 472, Laws of 2023 for programs that receive funding from the carbon emissions reduction account.(3) The department, with the assistance of designated staff in the Washington state department of transportation, must register for the clean fuels credit program and start tracking revenue generation pursuant to chapter 70A.535 RCW for investments funded in an omnibus transportation appropriations act.(4) The department must provide a report to the transportation committees of the legislature that estimates current biennial and future carbon reduction impacts resulting from zero-emission electric vehicles and supply equipment infrastructure funded in this section by June 30, 2025.Sec. 804. 2024 c 310 s 110 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGEAeronautics AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($188,000))Â Â Â Â Â $94,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: (($188,000))$94,000 of the aeronautics accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy to:(1) Conduct an independent assessment of the passenger and air cargo forecasts cited in the Puget Sound regional council regional aviation baseline study, including an evaluation of the underlying data, assumptions, methodologies, and calculation of the level of uncertainty around the forecast;(2) Conduct a comprehensive literature review to identify effective national and international strategies to reduce demand for air travel, including diverting such demand to other modes and whether such diversion avoids net environmental impacts to overburdened communities and vulnerable populations;(3) Conduct a review of existing operational and technological enhancements to address environmental impacts from commercial aviation activities, including, but not limited to, climate friendly routing of aircraft, innovations intended to address the climate change effects of noncarbon dioxide emissions from aviation activities, simulation models applied to congested airports, and online tools to track, analyze, and improve carbon footprints related to aviation activities. The review should identify the feasibility of enhancements to be deployed in the state of Washington; and(4) Provide a report to the office of the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 31, 2025.(End of part)TRANSPORTATION AGENCIESâOPERATINGSec. 901. 2024 c 310 s 201 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMISSIONHighway Safety AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$7,842,000Highway Safety AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($35,745,000))Â Â Â Â Â $39,745,000Highway Safety AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$60,000Cooper Jones Active Transportation Safety AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$836,000School Zone Safety AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$850,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($45,333,000))Â Â Â Â Â $49,333,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Within existing resources, the commission must examine national safety reports and recommendations on alcohol and drug impaired driving and report to the transportation committees of the legislature, by December 15, 2023, any recommendations for legislative or policy changes to improve traffic safety in Washington state.(2)(a) $235,500 of the Cooper Jones active transportation safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the commission to conduct research pertaining to the issue of street lighting and safety, including a public input component and learning from counties, cities, the state, and other impacted entities. Research may include the following:(i) Interviewing additional local and regional roads departments, water-sewer districts, and other utility services to gather a holistic data set or further input on which authority assumes primary responsibility for street illumination in various underserved areas throughout the state;(ii) Systematically soliciting information from communities with poor street illumination and lighting to gather input as to whether this is an issue the community would like to see improved;(iii) Conferring with regional and state-level police, fire, and emergency medical services to assess and document potential delays in emergency response times due to poor street illumination;(iv) Further assessing the impact of using LED lights in roadway and pedestrian scale lighting in reducing carbon emissions and light pollution throughout the United States; and(v) Subject to more in-depth findings, convening a meeting with appropriate state, regional, and local stakeholders and community partners.(b) The commission must report research results and provide any recommendations for legislative or policy action to the transportation committees of the legislature by January 1, 2025.(3) Within existing resources, the commission, through the Cooper Jones active transportation safety council, must prioritize the review of pedestrian, bicyclist, or nonmotorist fatality and serious injury review when the victim is a member of a federally recognized tribe. Consistent with RCW 43.59.156(5), the commission may recommend any policy or legislative changes to improve traffic safety for tribes through such review.(4) Within existing resources, the commission must review and report to the transportation committees of the legislature, by December 15, 2023, on strategies and technologies used in other states to prevent and respond to wrong-way driving crashes.(5)(a) The Washington traffic safety commission shall coordinate with each city that implements a pilot program as authorized in RCW 46.63.170(6) to provide the transportation committees of the legislature with the following information by June 30, 2025:(i) The number of warnings and infractions issued to first-time violators under the pilot program;(ii) The number of warnings and infractions issued to the registered owners of vehicles that are not registered with an address located in the city conducting the pilot program; and(iii) The frequency with which warnings and infractions are issued on weekdays versus weekend days.(b) If chapter 307, Laws of 2024 is enacted by June 30, 2024, the requirement in this subsection lapses.(6) $50,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 471, Laws of 2023 (negligent driving). If chapter 471, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(7) The Washington traffic safety commission may oversee a pilot program in up to three cities implementing the use of automated vehicle noise enforcement cameras in zones that have been designated by ordinance as "Stay Out of Areas of Racing."(a) Any programs authorized by the commission must be authorized by December 31, 2024.(b) If a city has established an authorized automated vehicle noise enforcement camera pilot program under this section, the compensation paid to the manufacturer or vendor of the equipment used must be based upon the value of the equipment and services provided or rendered in support of the system.(c) Any city administering a pilot program overseen by the traffic safety commission shall use the following guidelines to administer the program:(i) Automated vehicle noise enforcement camera may record photographs or audio of the vehicle and vehicle license plate only while a violation is occurring. The picture must not reveal the face of the driver or of passengers in the vehicle;(ii) The law enforcement agency of the city or county government shall install two signs facing opposite directions within 200 feet, or otherwise consistent with the uniform manual on traffic control devices, where the automated vehicle noise enforcement camera is used that state "Street Racing Noise Pilot Program in Progress";(iii) Cities testing the use of automated vehicle noise enforcement cameras must post information on the city website and notify local media outlets indicating the zones in which the automated vehicle noise enforcement cameras will be used;(iv) A city may only issue a warning notice with no penalty for a violation detected by automated vehicle noise enforcement cameras in a Stay Out of Areas of Racing zone. Warning notices must be mailed to the registered owner of a vehicle within 14 days of the detected violation;(v) A violation detected through the use of automated vehicle noise enforcement cameras is not part of the registered owner's driving record under RCW 46.52.101 and 46.52.120;(vi) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all photographs, videos, microphotographs, audio recordings, or electronic images prepared under this subsection (7) are for the exclusive use of law enforcement in the discharge of duties under this section and are not open to the public and may not be used in a court in a pending action or proceeding. No photograph, microphotograph, audio recording, or electronic image may be used for any purpose other than the issuance of warnings for violations under this section or retained longer than necessary to issue a warning notice as required under this subsection (7); and(vii) By June 30, 2025, the participating cities shall provide a report to the commission and appropriate committees of the legislature regarding the use, public acceptance, outcomes, warnings issued, data retention and use, and other relevant issues regarding automated vehicle noise enforcement cameras demonstrated by the pilot projects.(8) $200,000 of the Cooper Jones active transportation safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the commission, in consultation with the Cooper Jones active transportation safety council, to research and develop a pilot program for the use of light meters by law enforcement to measure lighting levels at locations where a serious injury or fatality involving a vehicle has occurred. However, the funds must be held in unallotted status until the commission submits a spending plan for the pilot program to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of the governor.(9) $300,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the commission to purchase telematics data from a qualified vendor that provides anonymized information on vehicle speeds and driver behaviors, such as hard braking, on a statewide basis and in selected geographical areas based upon demographic characteristics and crash history. The commission must provide an annual report summarizing findings from the telematics data to the transportation committees of the legislature beginning by June 30, 2025, and until June 30, 2027.(10) $750,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a pilot program for dedicated probation or compliance officers at the local level to improve compliance with ignition interlock device installation requirements associated with impaired driving offenses. The commission must select locations based on an assessment of ignition interlock device compliance rates, and the willingness and ability to have staff dedicated to this activity. ((By June 30, 2025, the commission must provide to the transportation committees of the legislature a status report on the specific locations selected and any outcome information.))(11) $1,000,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to implement a multifaceted approach to supplement existing funding targeted at impaired driving and other enforcement. The areas of emphasis expected to be funded include additional high visibility enforcement and indigenous knowledge-informed tribal traffic safety support. Funding is also provided for the commission to administer and provide oversight of these activities. The commission must provide a preliminary report to the transportation committees of the legislature on these funded activities and any outcome information by December 1, 2025, with a final report due by December 1, 2026.Sec. 902. 2024 c 310 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARDRural Arterial Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,615,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($3,524,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,402,000County Arterial Preservation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,839,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($6,978,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,856,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Within appropriated funds, the county road administration board may opt in as provided under RCW 70A.02.030 to assume all of the substantive and procedural requirements of covered agencies under chapter 70A.02 RCW. The board shall include in its 2023 and 2024 annual reports to the legislature a progress report on opting into the healthy environment for all act and a status report on diversity, equity, and inclusion within the board's jurisdiction. The county road administration board may revise program standards, as needed, with legislative consultation.Sec. 903. 2024 c 310 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE JOINT TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEECarbon Emissions Reduction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($3,477,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,207,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($552,000))Â Â Â Â Â $480,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($5,100,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,028,000((Puget Sound Ferry Operations AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$100,000))TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($9,229,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,715,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) $300,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is for the joint transportation committee, from amounts set aside out of statewide fuel taxes distributed to cities according to RCW 46.68.110(2), to convene a study of a statewide retail delivery fee on orders of taxable retail items delivered by motor vehicles within the state. The study must:(i) Determine the annual revenue generation potential of a range of fee amounts;(ii) Examine options for revenue distributions to state and local governments based upon total deliveries, lane miles, or other factors;(iii) Estimate total implementation costs, including start-up and ongoing administrative costs; and(iv) Evaluate the potential impacts to consumers, including consideration of low-income households and vulnerable populations and potential impacts to businesses.(b) The study should document and evaluate similar programs adopted in other states. The joint transportation committee must submit a report on the study to the transportation committees of the legislature by June 30, 2024.(2)(a) $400,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is for the joint transportation committee, in collaboration with the department of transportation, to convene a work group to study and recommend a new statutory framework for the department's public-private partnership program. The committee may contract with a third-party consultant for work group support and drafting the new statutory framework.(b)(i) The work group must consist of, but is not limited to, the following members:(A) The secretary of transportation or their designee;(B) Joint transportation committee executive committee members or their designees;(C) The state treasurer or the state treasurer's designee;(D) A representative of a national nonprofit organization specializing in public-private partnership program development;(E) A representative of the construction trades; and(F) A representative from an organization representing general contractors.(ii) The work group must also consult with the Washington state transportation commission and the department of commerce.(c)(i) The work group must review the 2012 joint transportation committee's "Evaluation of Public-Private Partnerships" study, consisting of an evaluation of the recommendations for replacing chapter 47.29 RCW and development of a process for implementing public-private partnerships that serve the defined public interest, including, but not limited to:(A) Protecting the state's ability to retain public ownership of assets constructed or managed under a public-private partnership contract;(B) Allowing for the most transparency during the negotiation of terms of a public-private partnership agreement; and(C) Addressing the state's ability to oversee the private entity's management of the asset.(ii)(A) The work group must identify any barriers to the implementation of funding models that best protect the public interest, including statutory and constitutional barriers.(B) The work group may also evaluate public-private partnership opportunities for required fish passage and culvert work on state highways, for the construction of, replacement of, or commercial retail options within Washington state ferries' terminals, and for other projects as determined by the work group.(iii) The work group must update the 2012 recommendations and devise an implementation plan for the state.(d) The work group must submit a preliminary report, including any recommendations or draft legislation, to the office of the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 15, 2023. The work group must submit a final report with draft legislation to the office of the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by July 1, 2024.(3) $300,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is for the joint transportation committee, from amounts set aside out of statewide fuel taxes distributed to cities according to RCW 46.68.110(2), to contract with the municipal research and services center to convene a department of transportation-local government partnership work group to create a procedure in which the department of transportation can partner with a local jurisdiction to perform preservation and maintenance and construct projects on state highways.(a) The work group must consist of, but is not limited to, the following members:(i) One representative from a city with a population of more than 5,000 and fewer than 50,000;(ii) One representative from a city with a population of more than 50,000;(iii) One representative from a county with a population of more than 100,000 and fewer than 400,000;(iv) One representative from a county with a population of more than 400,000;(v) At least one representative of a public port;(vi) A representative from the county road administration board;(vii) A representative of the transportation improvement board;(viii) At least one representative from the department of transportation's local programs division;(ix) At least two representatives from the department of transportation with expertise in procurement and legal services; and(x) At least one member from the house of representatives transportation committee and at least one member from the senate transportation committee.(b) Of the members described in (a) of this subsection, at least one of the city representatives and one of the county representatives must have public works contracting experience, and at least one of the city representatives and one of the county representatives must have public works project management experience.(c) The work group must make recommendations of how the department of transportation could better work in partnership with local jurisdictions to ensure that roadway construction projects can be performed when funds are made available in the omnibus transportation appropriations act even if the department of transportation does not have the capacity to be the project manager on a project and a local jurisdiction is ready, willing, and able to implement the project within the time frames envisioned in the omnibus transportation appropriations act. In developing its recommendations, the work group must consider, at a minimum:(i) Differing roadway and construction standards between state and local agencies;(ii) Revenue, reimbursement, and financial agreements between state and local agencies;(iii) Differing procurement processes between state and local agencies;(iv) Liability; and(v) Other issues as determined by the work group.(d) The work group must submit a preliminary report, including any recommendations, to the office of the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 15, 2023. The work group must submit a final report to the office of the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by July 1, 2024.(4)(a) (($2,000,000))$404,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is for the joint transportation committee to oversee:(i) The design of an infrastructure and incentive strategy to drive the purchase and use of zero emission medium and heavy duty vehicles, as well as cargo handling and off-road equipment, in the state including, but not limited to, programs for tractor trucks, box trucks, drayage trucks, refuse trucks, step and panel vans, heavy and medium-duty buses, school buses, on and off-road terminal tractors, transport refrigeration units, forklifts, container handling equipment, airport cargo loaders, and railcar movers; and(ii) A review of the passenger vehicle tax incentive in current law and evaluation of its utility, to include possible modification of the criteria for eligibility and tax incentive amount maximums, as applicable.(b) Design development must include recommendations for encouraging vehicle conversions for smaller commercial vehicle fleets and owner-operators of commercial vehicles, as well as tools for facilitating carbon emission reductions to benefit vulnerable populations and overburdened communities. Infrastructure and incentive programs recommended may include, but are not limited to, grant, rebate, tax incentive, and financing assistance programs.(c) Consultation with legislative members identified by the chair and ranking members of the transportation committees of the legislature throughout design of the infrastructure and incentive strategy is required. A report is due to the transportation committees of the legislature by January 2, 2024.(5) (($125,000))$53,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation and (($125,000))$53,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation are for the joint transportation committee to evaluate potential options and make recommendations for a statewide household travel survey and additional analytical capacity regarding transportation research.(a) The recommendation on the statewide household travel survey must be based on how well a statewide survey investment would: Address policy questions related to household travel; address gaps between separate regional and local transportation models; and create a dataset to allow both for analysis and response to policymakers' questions relating to household travel and for transportation modeling and development. In evaluating potential survey options, the committee shall consider opportunities for the state to partner and expand on developed established household travel surveys, including surveys conducted at both the Puget Sound regional council and the federal highway administration. In its recommendation, the committee shall outline the process required for a statewide survey, including the costs and timing of each option.(b) The committee shall recommend an agency or agencies to perform ongoing analysis of a statewide household travel survey and other transportation research. The committee shall consider the ability of an agency or agencies to meet shorter timeline policy needs, as well as longer timeline research projects. The recommendation must include the timing and costs associated with the development of such analytical capacity.(6) (($1,000,000))$600,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is for the joint transportation committee to oversee the development of tools and methodologies to assist in program delivery evaluation for programs that receive appropriations from the carbon emissions reduction account. Program delivery evaluation must include carbon emissions reduction estimates by program and by unit of time, program cost per unit of emission reduction, quantified benefits to vulnerable populations and overburdened communities by program cost, any additional appropriate qualitative and quantitative metrics, and actionable recommendations for improvements in program delivery. A report is due to the transportation committees of the legislature by October 1, 2024.(7) $500,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is for the joint transportation committee to engage an independent review team to work in coordination with the Washington state department of transportation's analysis, funded in section 217(10), chapter 472, Laws of 2023, of highway, road, and freight rail transportation needs, options, and impacts from shifting the movement of freight and goods that currently move by barge through the lower Snake river dams to highways, other roads, and rail.(a) The department shall include the independent review team in all phases of the analysis to enable the team to develop an independent assessment of the analysis, assumptions, stakeholder engagement, and cost and impact estimates. Summary findings from the independent assessment must be provided to the department, the governor's office, and the transportation committees of the legislature on a quarterly basis, with an end of biennium report due to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025. The end of biennium report must include a detailed summary of stakeholder views expressed during the independent review process and an analysis of how these views can be addressed in the overall findings of the analysis.(b) The independent review team must conduct an independent stakeholder engagement effort. The river transportation work group must be formed to provide data and guidance to the independent review team for the independent stakeholder engagement effort. The river transportation work group must be made up of stakeholders, including farming and agricultural production, fishing industry, tug and barge operators, shippers and receivers, public ports, railroad operators, cruise lines, the federal highway administration, and the army corps of engineers. Consultations with federally recognized tribes must also occur in coordination with the Washington state department of transportation.(c) The independent review team shall make regular presentations to the joint transportation committee and, by request, to the transportation committees of the legislature.(8) The joint transportation committee shall also convene a work group that includes, but is not limited to, the executive committee of the joint transportation committee, the office of financial management, the Washington state department of transportation, and the Washington state treasurer's office to develop recommendations, by October 15, 2023, to meet the challenge of identifying an achievable delivery schedule for completing transportation projects across the state.(9)(a) $450,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is for the joint transportation committee to conduct a study and make recommendations on alternative project delivery methods that may be used by the Washington state department of transportation in public works contracting. The study must review use of design-build, design-bid-build, progressive design build, general contractor/construction manager, public-private partnerships, and other contracting methods, including the alliance contracting procedure, and how choice of project delivery method impacts cost, contract competition, and project delivery schedule.(b) The study must also evaluate other innovative project delivery practices utilized around the country and Washington state-specific possibilities such as: (i) Increased use of the advanced environmental mitigation revolving account and advance right-of-way revolving fund as cost containment strategies; and (ii) benefits and costs associated with the bundling of bridge, culvert, or other groups of projects into single procurement packages.(c) The study must specifically examine contracting methods, alternative bundling concepts, and other options to manage costs as the Washington state department of transportation continues to make progress on meeting the requirements of the federal U.S. v. Washington court injunction.(d) The study must include recommendations on any changes to current practices and statutory requirements.(e) In developing project delivery method recommendations, the joint transportation committee must engage with industry stakeholders including, but not limited to, engineering, contracting, environmental, and women and minority-owned business communities.(f) A preliminary report is due to the office of the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 15, 2024. A final report is due to the office of the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025.(10)(a) $375,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is for the joint transportation committee to contract with the municipal research and services center to convene a project delivery streamlining work group to review streamlining options and recommend practices that support expedited project delivery.(b) The work group must consist of, but is not limited to, the following members:(i) One representative from a city with a population of more than 5,000 and fewer than 50,000;(ii) One representative from a city with a population of more than 50,000;(iii) One representative from a county with a population of more than 100,000 and fewer than 400,000;(iv) One representative from a county with a population of more than 400,000;(v) At least one representative of a transit agency serving a rural county;(vi) At least one representative of a transit agency serving an urban county;(vii) At least one representative of a regional transit authority;(viii) At least one representative of a public port;(ix) A representative from the county road administration board;(x) A representative of the transportation improvement board;(xi) A representative of the freight mobility strategic investment board;(xii) At least one representative from the department of transportation's local programs division with experience in federal funding oversight; and(xiii) At least two representatives from the department of transportation with expertise in procurement and the multiagency permit program.(c) Of the members described in (b) of this subsection, at least one of the city representatives and one of the county representatives must have public works contracting experience, and at least one of the city representatives and one of the county representatives must have public works project management experience.(d) The work group must review options for project streamlining to expedite project delivery that include, but are not limited to: Preapplication communication; partnership agreements; contracting processes; fund sources; mitigation; land use; rights-of-way; permitting; and shared technology; and must identify opportunities for pilot projects to test some of these recommendations.(e) The work group must submit a preliminary report to the office of the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 15, 2024. The work group must submit a final report to the office of the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025.(11) (($100,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation is for the joint transportation committee to convene a work group in advance of the 75th anniversary of the Washington state ferries on June 1, 2026, to review Washington state ferry funding requirements and options to increase dedicated funding sources for the ferry system. The executive committee of the joint transportation committee may appoint relevant stakeholders as part of the work group. A preliminary report must be submitted to the governor and transportation committees of the legislature by December 15, 2024, and the legislature intends that a final report will be submitted to the governor and transportation committees of the legislature by June 1, 2026.(12) Beginning January 1, 2025, $477,000))$203,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is for the joint transportation committee to conduct a study of the impacts of implementing California's emissions standards for ocean-going vessels at berth in Titles 13 and 17 of the California Code of Regulations in Washington. The study must include estimates of greenhouse gas emissions reductions, criteria air pollutant reductions, potential labor impacts, potential impacts on shipping costs and port competitiveness, and shore power infrastructure needs and costs. The joint transportation committee must, at a minimum, coordinate with the department of ecology, department of transportation, representatives from Washington ports, shippers, utilities, and the trucking industry, impacted labor unions, and environmental organizations. The joint transportation committee must report to the transportation committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025.(((13)))(12)(a) $250,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is for the joint transportation committee to contract with a national expert on developing inclusive, mixed-income, mixed-use transit-oriented housing to complete a review of transit-oriented development conditions in cities in King, Pierce, Spokane, Clark, and Snohomish counties that (i) have populations of more than 12,500; and (ii) have at least one major transit stop, as defined in RCW 36.70A.030. The contracted party must have demonstrated expertise in understanding the impact of housing development on racially diverse communities, as well as expertise in, and existing peer-reviewed research on, developing housing near transit that is inclusive of low-income, workforce, and market rate housing.(b) The review must look at any comprehensive plans, housing-focused local tax and fee programs, and development regulations required to be adopted on or before December 31, 2024. The review must include examples of local and national best practices for developing affordable housing and workforce housing near transit, and allow for comparison on a city-by-city basis. The review must also include a report with recommendations for state-level policy to expand housing and mixed-use transit-oriented development in Washington state, in a manner that minimizes displacement of existing communities and ensures housing near transit remains affordable to low-income Washingtonians. ((The contracted party shall provide its review to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025.))Sec. 904. 2024 c 310 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROLAlaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$43,000State Patrol Highway AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($629,476,000))Â Â Â Â Â $621,421,000State Patrol Highway AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($19,360,000))Â Â Â Â Â $23,360,000State Patrol Highway AccountâPrivate/LocalAppropriation. . . .$4,594,000Highway Safety AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,736,000Ignition Interlock Device Revolving AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,208,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$316,000State Route Number 520 Corridor AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$89,000Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$275,000I-405 and SR 167 Express Toll Lanes AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,895,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($660,992,000))Â Â Â Â Â $656,937,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $580,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the operation of and administrative support to the license investigation unit to enforce vehicle registration laws in southwestern Washington. The Washington state patrol, in consultation with the department of revenue, shall maintain a running estimate of the additional vehicle registration fees, sales and use taxes, and local vehicle fees remitted to the state pursuant to activity conducted by the license investigation unit. Beginning October 1, 2023, and semiannually thereafter, the Washington state patrol shall submit a report detailing the additional revenue amounts generated since July 1, 2023, to the director of the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature. At the end of the fiscal quarter in which it is estimated that more than $625,000 in state sales and use taxes have been remitted to the state since July 1, 2023, the Washington state patrol shall notify the state treasurer and the state treasurer shall transfer funds pursuant to section 406, chapter 472, Laws of 2023.(2) Washington state patrol officers engaged in off-duty uniformed employment providing traffic control services to the department of transportation or other state agencies may use state patrol vehicles for the purpose of that employment, subject to guidelines adopted by the chief of the Washington state patrol. The Washington state patrol must be reimbursed for the use of the vehicle at the prevailing state employee rate for mileage and hours of usage, subject to guidelines developed by the chief of the Washington state patrol.(3)(a) By December 1st of each year during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the Washington state patrol must report to the transportation committees of the legislature on the status of recruitment and retention activities as follows:(i) A summary of recruitment and retention strategies;(ii) The number of transportation funded staff vacancies by major category;(iii) The number of applicants for each of the positions by these categories;(iv) The composition of workforce;(v) Other relevant outcome measures with comparative information with recent comparable months in prior years; and(vi) Activities related to the implementation of the agency's workforce diversity plan, including short-term and long-term, specific comprehensive outreach, and recruitment strategies to increase populations underrepresented within both commissioned and noncommissioned employee groups.(b) During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the office of financial management, with assistance of the Washington state patrol, must conduct two surveys regarding the competitiveness with law enforcement agencies within the boundaries of the state of Washington pursuant to RCW 43.43.380, with the first survey being informational regarding the change since the last survey was conducted and the second survey used as part of the collective bargaining process. Prior to the 2024 legislative session, the office of financial management, with assistance of the Washington state patrol, must also provide comparison information regarding recruitment bonus amounts currently being offered by local law enforcement agencies in the state.(4)(a) $6,575,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the land mobile radio system replacement, upgrade, and other related activities.(b) Beginning January 1, 2024, the Washington state patrol must report semiannually to the office of the chief information officer on the progress related to the projects and activities associated with the land mobile radio system, including the governance structure, outcomes achieved in the prior six-month time period, and how the activities are being managed holistically as recommended by the office of the chief information officer. At the time of submittal to the office of the chief information officer, the report must be transmitted to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature.(5)(a) $2,688,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for enhancing the state patrol's diversity, equity, and inclusion program, a community engagement program to improve relationships with historically underrepresented communities and to recruit and retain a diverse workforce, and contracting with an external psychologist to perform exams. The state patrol will work with the governor's office of equity and meet all reporting requirements and responsibilities pursuant to RCW 43.06D.060. Funds provided for the community engagement program must ensure engagement with communities throughout the state.(b) The state patrol may revise program standards, as needed, with legislative consultation.(6)(a) $10,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Washington state patrol to administer a pilot program that implements a yellow alert system notifying the public when a hit-and-run accident resulting in a fatality or substantial bodily harm has occurred and been reported to the state patrol or other local law enforcement entity. The Washington state patrol must post on traffic message boards or share on public communication systems any identifying information acquired including, but not limited to, a complete or partial license plate number or a description of the vehicle. Each alert must be posted or shared as such for at least 24 hours.(b) The Washington state patrol must report the following to the transportation committees of the legislature annually until June 30, 2025:(i) The number of yellow alerts received;(ii) The number of arrests made from accidents reported on the yellow alert system;(iii) The number of hit-and-run accidents resulting in a fatality or substantial bodily harm statewide;(iv) The number of arrests made from accidents described under (b)(iii) of this subsection; and(v) The number of hit-and-run accidents reported statewide.(c) The Washington state patrol must also report on the efficacy of the program and recommend in its final report if the pilot program should continue or be enacted on a permanent basis and implemented statewide, based on the results of the report.(7)(a) (($2,243,000))$2,918,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for administrative costs, advertising, outreach, and bonus payments associated with developing and implementing a state trooper expedited recruitment incentive program for the purpose of recruiting and filling vacant trooper positions in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium. The legislature is committed to continuing the state trooper expedited recruitment incentive program until the vacancy levels are significantly reduced from current levels. The recruitment, advertising, and outreach associated with this program must continue efforts to create a more diverse workforce and must also provide an accelerated pathway for joining the state patrol for high quality individuals who have previously been employed as a general authority peace officer.(b) The state trooper expedited recruitment incentive program established by the Washington state patrol must include:(i) Thorough hiring procedures to ensure that only the highest quality candidates are selected as cadets and as lateral hires, including extensive review of past law enforcement employment history through extensive reference checks, Brady list identification, and any other issues that may impact the performance, credibility, and integrity of the individual.(ii) An accelerated training program for lateral hires from other agencies that recognizes the knowledge and experience of candidates previously employed in law enforcement; and(iii) A sign-on bonus for each trooper hired through the expedited recruitment incentive program as follows:(A) $5,000 for each cadet after completion of the Washington state patrol academy;(B) $5,000 for each successful graduating cadet after completion of a one-year probation period;(C) $8,000 for each lateral hire after completion of the accelerated training program for lateral hires;(D) $6,000 for each lateral hire after completion of a one-year probation period; and(E) $6,000 for each lateral hire after completion of two years of service.(c) The expenditure on the state trooper expedited recruitment incentive program is contingent upon execution of an appropriate memorandum of understanding between the governor or the governor's designee and the exclusive bargaining representative, consistent with the terms of this section. Expenditures and eligibility for the state trooper expedited recruitment incentive program established in this section are subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose.(d) For the purposes of this subsection:(i) "Cadet" means a person employed for the express purpose of receiving the on-the-job training required for attendance at the Washington state patrol academy and for becoming a commissioned trooper.(ii) "Lateral hire" means an eligible employee previously employed as a general authority peace officer.(8) (($3,896,000))$3,033,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 17, Laws of 2023 (speed safety cameras). If chapter 17, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(9) $500,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for bonuses and other recruitment and retention-related compensation adjustments for communication officers and other noncommissioned staff of the Washington state patrol who are covered by a collective bargaining agreement. Funding in this subsection must first be used for targeted adjustments for communication officers. Remaining amounts may be used for compensation adjustments for other noncommissioned staff. Funding provided in this subsection is contingent upon the governor or the governor's designee reaching an appropriate memorandum of understanding with the exclusive bargaining representative. Agreements reached for compensation adjustments under this section may not exceed the amounts provided. If any agreement or combination of agreements exceed the amount provided in this subsection, all the agreements are subject to the requirements of RCW 41.80.010(3).(10) (($3,226,000))$1,690,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for ((two)) accelerated training programs for lateral hires. It is the intent of the legislature that the ((second)) accelerated training ((program))programs for lateral hires offered in fiscal year 2025 achieves at least 40 qualified graduates based on the Washington state patrol aggressively recruiting, advertising bonus policies, and taking other steps to achieve this outcome.(11) $98,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 26, Laws of 2023 (nonconviction data). If chapter 26, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(12) $76,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 471, Laws of 2023 (negligent driving). If chapter 471, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(13) $107,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 462, Laws of 2023 (domestic violence). If chapter 462, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(14) By December 1, 2024, the Washington state patrol must provide a report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature on the status of McClain v. Washington State Patrol and an update on legal expenses associated with the case.(15) $32,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 283, Laws of 2023 (illegal racing). If chapter 283, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(16) (($5,905,000))$9,563,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a third arming and third trooper basic training class, the initiation of a fourth arming and fourth trooper basic training class, and other additional academy costs. The third cadet class is expected to graduate in June 2025, and the fourth cadet class is expected to graduate in January 2026.(17) (($2,381,000))$1,758,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Washington state patrol to implement the provisions of the settlement agreement under Washington State Patrol Troopers Association v. Washington State Patrol, Public Employment Relations Commission Case No. 134557-U-21.(18) $2,307,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the migration of the agency's active directory into the state enterprise active directory.(19) $250,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to expand the activities of the license investigation unit to King county on a pilot basis beyond the unit's current activities in southwestern Washington. By February 15, 2025, the Washington state patrol must provide a status report on the pilot implementation.(20) (($2,222,000))$2,640,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the first planned replacement of an aging Cessna aircraft, including infrared cameras, and $100,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the downpayment and related costs of the second planned replacement of another aging Cessna aircraft. It is the intent of the legislature to fund the second planned Cessna replacement without financing the acquisition as soon as the aircraft can be received in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, and therefore, the Washington state patrol may take the necessary steps to ensure delivery of the aircraft as soon as possible in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.(21) $300,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for individual gun safes for troopers and other staff to allow the safe storage of firearms used in the performance of their duties.(22) $35,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 207, Laws of 2024 (tribal warrants). If chapter 207, Laws of 2024 is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(23) $250,000 of the ignition interlock device revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to improve compliance with ignition interlock device requirements associated with impaired driving offenses. By June 30, 2025, the Washington state patrol must provide a report detailing the staff hired, the activities undertaken, and outcome information associated with improving ignition interlock device compliance rates.(24) $691,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 237, Laws of 2024 (state patrol longevity bonus). If chapter 237, Laws of 2024 is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(25) $46,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 301, Laws of 2024 (catalytic converters). If chapter 301, Laws of 2024 is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.Sec. 905. 2024 c 310 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSINGDriver Licensing Technology Support AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($1,743,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,740,000Marine Fuel Tax Refund AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$34,000Motorcycle Safety Education AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($5,319,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,292,000Limited Fish and Wildlife AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($768,000))Â Â Â Â Â $632,000Highway Safety AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($283,109,000))Â Â Â Â Â $285,803,000Highway Safety AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$2,371,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($101,823,000))Â Â Â Â Â $100,523,000Motor Vehicle AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$1,336,000Ignition Interlock Device Revolving AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($6,415,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,509,000Department of Licensing Services AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($9,150,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,741,000License Plate Technology AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($4,398,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,369,000Abandoned Recreational Vehicle AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($3,091,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,591,000Limousine Carriers AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($126,000))Â Â Â Â Â $134,000Electric Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$443,000DOL Technology Improvement & Data ManagementAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$943,000Agency Financial Transaction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($16,998,000))Â Â Â Â Â $16,430,000Move Ahead WA Flexible AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($2,096,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,779,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($440,163,000))Â Â Â Â Â $441,670,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $1,100,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation and $1,100,000 of the move ahead WA flexible accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the department to provide an interagency transfer to the department of children, youth, and families for the purpose of providing driver's license support. In addition to support services required under RCW 74.13.338(2), support services may include reimbursement of:(a) The cost for a youth in foster care of any eligible age to complete a driver training education course, as outlined in chapter 46.82 or 28A.220 RCW;(b) The costs incurred by foster youth in foster care for a motor vehicle insurance policy;(c) The costs of roadside assistance, motor vehicle insurance deductibles, motor vehicle registration fees, towing services, car maintenance, comprehensive car insurance, and gas cards; and(d) Any other costs related to obtaining a driver's license and driving legally and safely.(2) $150,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to conduct a study on the feasibility of implementing a mobile application for driver licensing. The department must submit a report of the study findings and any recommendations to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024. The study must:(a) Review the adoption actions in other states, including successes and lessons learned;(b) Examine existing technical infrastructure and potential changes needed to maximize interoperability, utility, and privacy protection;(c) Identify the technical investments and other costs associated with issuing digital drivers' licenses through a mobile application;(d) Identify how the technology may impact and can be used by external stakeholders, such as law enforcement;(e) Recommend any process changes required to implement the program successfully and ensure customer satisfaction; and(f) Recommend any statutory changes required to allow for the usage of digital drivers' licenses, including recognition of interstate travelers.(3)(a) $350,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department, in consultation with the Washington traffic safety commission, the department of health, the elder law section of the Washington state bar association, organizations representing older drivers, and driver rehabilitation specialists, to develop a comprehensive plan aimed at improving older driver safety. The department must submit a report on the comprehensive plan to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024. The plan must include, but is not limited to:(i) A comprehensive review of department policies surrounding older drivers and medically at-risk drivers, including:(A) The medical assessment review process; and(B) The counter assessment process in licensing service offices;(ii) A feasibility analysis of the department establishing a medical advisory board to advise on general policy for at-risk drivers, driving privileges for individual medically at-risk drivers, and an appeals process for drivers whose privileges are revoked or restricted due to medical conditions;(iii) A recommended assessment tool to determine a driver's potential risk to themselves or others when operating a motor vehicle so the department may make informed decisions on appropriate courses of action within the older driver program; and(iv) Detailed information on how each component of the plan improves the safety associated with older drivers, while preserving the maximum level of older driver independence and privacy;(b) The department may also use funds provided in this subsection to implement improvements to older driver traffic safety within existing authority.(4) $5,499,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to upgrade and improve its prorate and fuel tax system, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701, chapter 472, Laws of 2023. In each phase of the project, the department must ensure and document the increase in business capabilities and customer service outcomes, the improvements in fuel tax collection related information designed to resolve historical discrepancies in reporting information, and how the implementation plan mitigates risks associated with the proposed timeline and results in the sustainability of systems and platforms for the future. Before initiating the implementation phase of the project, the department must report to the office of the chief information officer on how the project meets its FAST act modernization roadmap, and vendor management and resource plans.(5) $16,000 of the motorcycle safety education accountâstate appropriation, $2,000 of the limited fish and wildlife accountâstate appropriation, $947,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation, $308,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation, $14,000 of the ignition interlock device revolving accountâstate appropriation, and $14,000 of the department of licensing services accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the department to redesign and improve its online services and website, and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements in section 701, chapter 472, Laws of 2023.(6) The department shall report on a quarterly basis on licensing service office operations, associated workload, and information with comparative information with recent comparable months in prior years. The report must include detailed statewide and by licensing service office information on staffing levels, average monthly wait times, the number of enhanced drivers' licenses and enhanced identicards issued and renewed, and the number of primary drivers' licenses and identicards issued and renewed. By November 1, 2024, the department must prepare a report with recommendations on the future of licensing service office operations based on the recent implementation of efficiency measures designed to reduce the time for licensing transactions and wait times, and the implementation of statutory and policy changes made during the pandemic.(7) For the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the department shall charge $1,336,000 for the administration and collection of a motor vehicle excise tax on behalf of a regional transit authority, as authorized under RCW 82.44.135. The amount in this subsection must be deducted before distributing any revenues to a regional transit authority.(8) $742,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the increased costs associated with improvements desired to resolve delays in the production of license plates, including converting all subagents to the standard ordering process as recommended in the December 2022 plate inventory report, and to provide updated annual reports detailing changes in license plate production, inventory, and other practices taken to guard against plate production delays. The reports must be submitted to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023, and December 1, 2024.(9) $243,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to continue to provide written materials on, place signage in licensing service offices regarding, and include into new driver training curricula, the requirements of RCW 46.61.212, the slow down and move over law.(10) (($3,082,000))$4,591,000 of the abandoned recreational vehicle disposal accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for providing reimbursements in accordance with the department's abandoned recreational vehicle disposal reimbursement program. It is the intent of the legislature that the department prioritize this funding for allowable and approved reimbursements and not to build a reserve of funds within the account. During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the department must report any amounts recovered to the office of financial management and appropriate committees of the legislature on a quarterly basis.(11) $1,077,000 of the highway safety accountâfederal appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 35, Laws of 2023 (CDL drug and alcohol clearinghouse). If chapter 35, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(12) $116,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 57, Laws of 2023 (streamlining CDL issuance). If chapter 57, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(13) $845,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 445, Laws of 2023 (improving young driver safety). If chapter 445, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(14) $180,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 440, Laws of 2023 (open motor vehicle safety recalls). If chapter 440, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(15) $497,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 466, Laws of 2023 (updating processes related to voter registration). If chapter 466, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(16) $29,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 118, Laws of 2023 (driver's abstract changes). If chapter 118, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(17) $47,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 453, Laws of 2023 (competency evaluations). If chapter 453, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(18) $23,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 283, Laws of 2023 (illegal racing). If chapter 283, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(19) $155,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 316, Laws of 2023 (jury diversity). If chapter 316, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(20)(a) $36,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the issuance of nonemergency medical transportation vehicle decals to implement the high occupancy vehicle lane access pilot program established in section 217(2), chapter 472, Laws of 2023. A for hire nonemergency medical transportation vehicle is a vehicle that is a "for hire vehicle" under RCW 46.04.190 that provides nonemergency medical transportation, including for life-sustaining transportation purposes, to meet the medical transportation needs of individuals traveling to medical practices and clinics, cancer centers, dialysis facilities, hospitals, and other care providers.(b) As part of this pilot program, the owner of a for hire nonemergency medical transportation vehicle may apply to the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director, for a high occupancy vehicle exempt decal for a for hire nonemergency medical transportation vehicle. The high occupancy vehicle exempt decal allows the for hire nonemergency medical transportation vehicle to use a high occupancy vehicle lane as specified in RCW 46.61.165 and 47.52.025 during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium.(c) For the exemption in this subsection to apply to a for hire nonemergency medical transportation vehicle, the decal:(i) Must be displayed on the vehicle so that it is clearly visible from outside the vehicle;(ii) Must identify that the vehicle is exempt from the high occupancy vehicle requirements; and(iii) Must be visible from the rear of the vehicle.(d) The owner of a for hire nonemergency medical transportation vehicle or the owner's representative must apply for a high occupancy vehicle exempt decal on a form provided or approved by the department. The application must include:(i) The name and address of the person who is the owner of the vehicle;(ii) A full description of the vehicle, including its make, model, year, and the vehicle identification number;(iii) The purpose for which the vehicle is principally used;(iv) An attestation signed by the vehicle's owner or the owner's representative that the vehicle's owner has a minimum of one contract or service agreement to provide for hire transportation services for medical purposes with one or more of the following entities: A health insurance company; a hospital, clinic, dialysis center, or other medical institution; a day care center, retirement home, or group home; a federal, state, or local agency or jurisdiction; or a broker who negotiates these services on behalf of one or more of these entities; and(v) Other information as required by the department upon application.(e) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall collect the fee required under (f) of this subsection when issuing or renewing a high occupancy vehicle exempt decal.(f) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent must collect a $5 fee when issuing or renewing a decal under this subsection, in addition to any other fees and taxes required by law.(g) A high occupancy vehicle exempt decal expires June 30, 2025, and must be marked to indicate its expiration date. The decal may be renewed if the pilot program is continued past the date of a decal's expiration. The status as an exempt vehicle continues until the high occupancy vehicle exempt decal is suspended or revoked for misuse, the vehicle is no longer used as a for hire nonemergency medical transportation vehicle, or the pilot program established in section 217(2), chapter 472, Laws of 2023 is terminated.(h) The department may adopt rules to implement this subsection.(21)(a) $265,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide an interagency transfer to the Washington center for deaf and hard of hearing youth, in consultation with the department and the office of the superintendent of public instruction, to fund the cost of interpreters for driver training education for deaf and hard of hearing youth to enable them to access driver training education at the same cost as their peers, and to pilot a sustainable driver training education program to determine how best to meet the driver training education needs of deaf and hard of hearing youth in the state in the future. The pilot must include:(i) Determination of an appropriate number of instructors and an appropriate method of certification for instructors who are fluent in American Sign Language (ASL);(ii) Determination of how best to provide driver training education statewide to deaf and hard of hearing novice drivers;(iii) Development of a program to offer the required curriculum under RCW 28A.220.035 to deaf and hard of hearing novice drivers; and(iv) Capped course instruction costs for deaf and hard of hearing students at the average rate of their hearing peers.(b) The department shall submit a report to the transportation committees of the legislature developed by the Washington center for deaf and hard of hearing youth by March 1, 2024, that provides recommendations for a permanent program to make driver education equitably accessible for deaf and hard of hearing students.(22) $350,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to improve the process for commercial driver's license (CDL) holders to submit medical certification documents and update self-certification status to the department. The department shall:(a) Update license express to improve the process and make it more user friendly;(b) Add options for the driver to renew or replace the driver's CDL credentials as part of the medical or self-certification process;(c) Add a customer verification step confirming the requested changes and clearly stating how this change will impact the driver's CDL; and(d) Add improved messaging throughout the process.In addition, the department shall make available on the driving record abstract a complete medical certificate downgrade history, and provide a one-time mailing to all current CDL holders explaining the process to update their medical certificate documents and self-certification.(23) $1,962,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the establishment of a pilot mobile licensing unit to provide licensing and identicard services. By December 1, 2024, the department must submit a report to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature detailing the locations served, the number and type of documents issued, and other outcome measures associated with the mobile licensing unit. The report must include consideration of the facility needs of licensing service offices in the context of flexible mobile licensing services.(24) $2,750,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for organizations providing driver's license assistance and support services. Of this amount:(a) $2,000,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for driver's license assistance and support services in King county with an existing provider that is already providing these services to low-income immigrant and refugee women; and(b) $750,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for additional contracts in fiscal year 2025 with organizations providing driver's license assistance and other related support services in other parts of the state. (c) By December 1st of each year, the department must submit information on the contracted providers, including: The annual budget of the contracted providers in the preceding year; information regarding private and other governmental support for the activities of the providers; and a description of the number of people served, services delivered, and outcome measures. In developing its 2025-2027 biennial budget submittal, the department, after consulting with the existing organization in King county and organizations receiving funds with the fiscal year 2025 expansion, must develop a statewide delivery plan that maximizes the number of people served, promotes efficiency in service delivery, and recognizes different models based on needs in particular areas of the state.(25) $8,000 of the motorcycle safety education accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 137, Laws of 2023 (motorcycle safety board). If chapter 137, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(26) $29,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 431, Laws of 2023 (transportation resources). If chapter 431, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(27) $282,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 471, Laws of 2023 (negligent driving). If chapter 471, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(28) $4,464,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for costs associated with relocating licensing service offices during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium. This includes $2,790,000 provided for relocations in the 2023-2025 omnibus transportation appropriations act. By June 30th of each year, the department must submit a status report on licensing service offices planned for relocation during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium.(29) $1,395,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 1, Laws of 2024 (enhancing prorate and fuel tax collections). If chapter 1, Laws of 2024 is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(30) (($100,000))$65,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 162, Laws of 2024 (improving access to department of licensing issued documents). If chapter 162, Laws of 2024 is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(31) $150,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to conduct a study on the feasibility of implementing a process for the electronic submittal of title and registration documents for motor vehicles, within the current vehicle licensing model. The department must submit a report of the study findings and any recommendations to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by September 1, 2025. The study must: (a) Review the current processes in Washington and other states, including how such processes addressed fraud prevention and document security; (b) examine existing technical infrastructure and potential changes needed to allow for completion and submittal of lien and titling documents by financial institutions and vehicle dealers to subagents, county auditors, and the department of licensing, while maximizing interoperability, utility, data security, and customer privacy; (c) identify the technical investments and other costs associated with the submission of electronic documents by financial institutions and vehicle dealers to subagents, county auditors, and the department of licensing; (d) recommend any statutory changes required to allow for the submission of electronic documentation to subagents, county auditors, and the department of licensing; and (e) examine the impact of these technology changes on external stakeholders including, but not limited to, subagents, county auditors, financial institutions, vehicle dealers, and insurance companies.(32) $6,000 of the motorcycle safety education accountâstate appropriation, $1,000 of the limited fish and wildlife accountâstate appropriation, $406,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation, $137,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation, $5,000 of the ignition interlock device revolving accountâstate appropriation, and $6,000 of the department of licensing services accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the department of licensing for additional finance and budget staff. By December 1, 2024, the department shall submit a report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature on the specific steps the department has taken to address the findings of the State Auditor's Office FY2022 Accountability Audit Report No. 1032793.(33) $225,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department, for incorporation into its comprehensive implementation plan required under chapter 445, Laws of 2023 (improving young driver safety), to expand driver training education requirements for driver's license purposes to persons age 18 through 24 to include: (a) An assessment of opportunities to close availability and accessibility gaps in rural and underserved areas, as specified in section 612 of this act; and (b) an analysis of the potential inclusion of a mandatory driver's education refresher course requirement consisting of in-person or virtual classroom-based instruction on risk management and hazard protections one year after licensure, as specified in section 612 of this act.(34) $38,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 308, Laws of 2024 (speed safety cameras). If chapter 308, Laws of 2024 is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(35) $34,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 146, Laws of 2024 (definition of veteran). If chapter 146, Laws of 2024 is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(36) $159,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 306, Laws of 2024 (impaired driving). If chapter 306, Laws of 2024 is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(37) $300,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 315, Laws of 2024 (state custody/ID cards). If chapter 315, Laws of 2024 is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(38) $50,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to conduct a study on the feasibility of implementing and administering a per mile fee program. The study must identify the staffing and resources needed to implement and administer the program, including possible technical investments, leveraging existing technology platforms. A preliminary report of the study findings relating to internal costs to administer the program is due to the governor and transportation committees of the legislature by December 31, 2024. The legislature intends to require a final report that includes potential third-party costs and options to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 31, 2025.(39) $2,100,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to increase public awareness of REAL ID. Of the amounts appropriated in this subsection, $1,000,000 is for the department to directly contract with a communications group with experience spreading awareness about REAL ID to community-based organizations and ethnic media outlets.(40)(a) $10,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to enter into an interagency agreement with the commission on Asian Pacific American Affairs to contract with one or more private nonprofit organizations with appropriate expertise and experience to provide REAL ID compliance support to residents of the state who are compact of free association citizens, comprised of citizens of the Federated States of Micronesia, the Republic of the Marshall Islands, and the Republic of Palau, by providing the following assistance using a culturally and linguistically appropriate approach:(i) Communication and community outreach activities to inform compact of free association citizens of federally acceptable identification options that will be required and for which they are eligible for the purposes of domestic air travel once the REAL ID Act policy takes effect;(ii) Case management assistance through the use of community navigators who can provide assistance in the process to obtain federally acceptable identification documents that will be required for the purposes of domestic air travel when the REAL ID Act policy is in effect, including in obtaining any documentation necessary for the application process; and(iii) For those who meet the requirements of (b) of this subsection, financial assistance to obtain federally acceptable identification documents that will be required for the purposes of domestic air travel when the REAL ID Act policy is in effect, including financial assistance to obtain a foreign passport.(b) To qualify for assistance under (a)(ii) of this subsection (40), a compact of free association citizen who resides in the state of Washington must be:(i) A recipient of, or eligible for, public assistance under Title 74 RCW; or(ii) A participant in, or eligible for, the Washington women, infants, and children program.Sec. 906. 2024 c 310 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâTOLL OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCEâPROGRAM BState Route Number 520 Corridor AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($67,199,000))Â Â Â Â Â $55,639,000State Route Number 520 Civil Penalties AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($4,178,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,378,000Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($34,398,000))Â Â Â Â Â $36,510,000Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($22,541,000))Â Â Â Â Â $24,614,000Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 ExpressToll Lanes AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($25,523,000))Â Â Â Â Â $25,764,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($153,839,000))Â Â Â Â Â $144,905,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $1,300,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge accountâstate appropriation and $12,820,000 of the state route number 520 corridor accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the purposes of addressing unforeseen operations and maintenance costs on the Tacoma Narrows bridge and the state route number 520 bridge, respectively. The office of financial management shall place the amounts provided in this subsection, which represent a portion of the required minimum fund balance under the policy of the state treasurer, in unallotted status. The office may release the funds only when it determines that all other funds designated for operations and maintenance purposes have been exhausted.(2) As long as the facility is tolled, the department must provide annual reports to the transportation committees of the legislature on the Interstate 405 express toll lane project performance measures listed in RCW 47.56.880(4). These reports must include:(a) Information on the travel times and travel time reliability (at a minimum, average and 90th percentile travel times) maintained during peak and nonpeak periods in the express toll lanes and general purpose lanes for both the entire corridor and commonly made trips in the corridor including, but not limited to, northbound from Bellevue to Rose Hill, state route number 520 at NE 148th to Interstate 405 at state route number 522, Bellevue to Bothell (both NE 8th to state route number 522 and NE 8th to state route number 527), and a trip internal to the corridor (such as NE 85th to NE 160th) and similar southbound trips; and(b) Underlying congestion measurements, that is, speeds, that are being used to generate the summary graphs provided, to be made available in a digital file format.(3) $535,000 of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes accountâstate appropriation, $1,245,000 of the state route number 520 corridor accountâstate appropriation, $535,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge accountâstate appropriation, and $702,000 of the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the reappropriation of unspent funds on the new tolling back office system from the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.(4) The department shall make detailed annual reports to the transportation committees of the legislature and the public on the department's website in a manner consistent with past practices as specified in section 209(5), chapter 186, Laws of 2022.(5) As part of the department's 2025-2027 biennial budget request, the department shall update the cost allocation recommendations that assign appropriate costs to each of the toll funds for services provided by relevant Washington state department of transportation programs, the Washington state patrol, and the transportation commission. The recommendations shall be based on updated traffic and toll transaction patterns and other relevant factors.(6) Up to $16,648,000 of the amounts provided for operations and maintenance expenses on the state route number 520 facility from the state route number 520 corridor account during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium in this act are derived from the receipt of federal American rescue plan act of 2021 funds and not toll revenues.(7) $500,000 of the state route number 520 corridor accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to begin a traffic and revenue study of tolling on the state route number 520 corridor. The department, in consultation with the transportation commission, shall initiate planning work regarding updated tolling on the state route number 520 corridor.(8) (($19,248,000))$10,188,000 of the state route number 520 corridor accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the costs of insurance for the state route number 520 floating bridge.(9) $75,000 of the state route number 520 corridor accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to (a) conduct an actuarial analysis of the short and long-term costs and benefits, including risk mitigation of self-insurance as compared to the commercial insurance option for the state route number 520 floating bridge, as allowed under the terms of the state route number 520 master bond resolution, and (b) develop a plan to implement a self-insurance program for the state route number 520 floating bridge. By December 15, 2024, the department shall report to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature on the results of the actuarial analysis and the self-insurance program. It is the intent of the legislature to implement a self-insurance program for the state route number 520 floating bridge by July 1, 2025.Sec. 907. 2024 c 310 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâINFORMATION TECHNOLOGYâPROGRAM CTransportation Partnership AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,494,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($122,732,000))Â Â Â Â Â $122,714,000Puget Sound Ferry Operations AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$307,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,988,000Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)âStateAppropriation. . . .$1,488,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($129,009,000))Â Â Â Â Â $128,991,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $2,006,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for hardware cost increases. Before any hardware replacement, the department, in consultation with WaTech, must further review leasing options.Sec. 908. 2024 c 310 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâFACILITY MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS, AND CONSTRUCTIONâPROGRAM DâOPERATINGMotor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($40,362,000))Â Â Â Â Â $40,320,000Move Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$2,532,000State Route Number 520 Corridor AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$34,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($42,928,000))Â Â Â Â Â $42,886,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $500,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to conduct a detailed space study and develop an implementation plan that builds off the findings and recommendations of the department's "Telework Impact Study" completed in September 2022. Such efforts must also incorporate office space use reduction requirements for the department in this act as well as current and planned telework levels. The detailed space study and development of the implementation plan must be conducted in consultation with the office of financial management and the department of enterprise services, and must focus on office and administrative space efficiency, providing specific recommendations, cost estimates, and cost savings. While focused on office and administrative space, the department is encouraged to review other types of facilities where efficiencies can be achieved. The final study report must include:(a) The development of low, medium, and high scenarios based on reducing space use, with the high space reduction scenario being based on a minimum of a 30 percent reduction by 2030;(b) Detailed information on any increased capital and other implementation costs under each scenario;(c) Detailed information on reduced costs, such as leases, facility maintenance, and utilities, under each scenario;(d) An analysis of opportunities to collocate with other state, local, and other public agencies to reduce costs and improve cost-efficiency while meeting utilization standards; and(e) An assessment of the commercial value and return to the state transportation funds associated with the sale of the property from consolidation and other space efficiency measures.(2)(a) The department must submit the implementation plan and final report from the detailed space study to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature by October 1, 2024.(b) Conducting the detailed space study under subsection (1) of this section must not prevent or delay the department from meeting other space use and related requirements, or where warranted by current information or opportunities.(c) In addition to the reporting requirement under subsection (1) of this section, the department must provide information to the office of financial management in its comparative analysis of office space, leases, and relocation costs required by the omnibus operating appropriations act.Sec. 909. 2024 c 310 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâTRANSPORTATION EQUIPMENT FUNDâPROGRAM EMotor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$700,000Move Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$20,000,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$433,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$21,133,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The entire move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department's costs related to replacing obsolete transportation equipment and replacing fuel sites. Beginning December 1, 2024, and annually thereafter, the department must provide a report to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature detailing the current progress on replacing obsolete equipment, progress towards reaching a level purchasing state, and the status of a fuel site replacement prioritization plan. The report must also include:(a) A list of department owned and managed fuel sites prioritized by urgency of replacement;(b) A discussion of department practices that would create a sustained revenue source for capital repair and replacement of fuel sites; and(c) A discussion of to what extent the fuel site infrastructure can support zero emissions vehicles.(2)(a) $100,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to administer a pilot program to install and test intelligent speed monitoring technology in a portion of the department's fleet of vehicles while using global positioning system technology and other mapping tools to monitor vehicle location and corresponding speed limits on traveled roadways.(b) The pilot program must begin by January 1, 2024, for a 12-month period. By June 30, 2025, the department must report to the transportation committees of the legislature the results of the pilot program and provide any legislative or policy recommendations, including information on the potential impact of lawsuits related to vehicle operations.Sec. 910. 2024 c 310 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâAVIATIONâPROGRAM FAeronautics AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($17,448,000))Â Â Â Â Â $17,134,000Aeronautics AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($5,579,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,129,000Aeronautics AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$60,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($23,087,000))Â Â Â Â Â $22,323,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) (($2,000,000))$1,900,000 of the aeronautics accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the move ahead WA aviation grants. The department shall prioritize projects eligible for federal funding.(2) (($1,476,000))$1,376,000 of the aeronautics accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for sustainable aviation grants recommended by the department under the sustainable aviation grants program. The department shall submit a report to the transportation committees of the legislature by October 1, 2024, identifying a selection of sustainable aviation projects for funding by the legislature. In considering projects to recommend to fund, the department shall only consider projects that advance the state of sustainable aviation technology and lead to future innovation. Innovative sustainable aviation projects may include, but are not limited to, pilot projects demonstrating the use of:(a) Mobile battery charging technology;(b) Hydrogen electrolyzers and storage;(c) Electric ground equipment; and (d) Hanger charging technology.(3) $300,000 of the aeronautics accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to develop a statewide advanced air mobility aircraft plan to develop and integrate advanced air mobility aircraft into current modal systems. The department shall submit a report by June 1, 2025, to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature including, but not limited to:(a) Near, medium, and long-term recommendations for land use planning for advanced and urban air mobility vertiports and vertistops;(b) An inventory of infrastructure needs to support a statewide vertiport network and a recommended program to deploy funds to local governments to share costs;(c) Proposed state governance structures and regulatory mechanisms to adequately complement federal aviation administration oversight;(d) Recommended policies to foster vertiport and vertistop infrastructure development that ensure open public access, efficiency in land use siting, and equitable distribution across the state; and(e) In consultation with local jurisdictions, planning organizations, and other modal managers, recommendations on advanced air mobility aircraft integration into statewide transportation plans.(4) $1,931,000 of the aeronautics accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 463, Laws of 2023 (commercial aviation services). Funding is provided for the activities of the work group and for support of the work group by the department. The activities of the work group include the issuance of the initial progress report, required in section 4, chapter 463, Laws of 2023, which requires the listing of areas that will not have further review as the areas are in conflict with the operations of a military installation. The report must also identify unsuitable geographies due to either environmental impacts or impacts to overburdened communities. Additionally, within the funding provided, the work group must:(a) Work to understand what studies currently exist on state transportation needs and capacities and identify any gaps of information; and(b) Conduct meaningful community engagement with overburdened and vulnerable populations with a focus on the environmental justice impact of aviation on communities.(5) $300,000 of the aeronautics accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Port of Bremerton to conduct a study on the feasibility of offering commercial service at the Port of Bremerton airport. Pursuant to RCW 47.68.090(2)(c), the department may not require a match for this project.(6) $2,575,000 of the aeronautics accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Pullman-Moscow regional airport. Pursuant to RCW 47.68.090(2)(c), the department may not require a match for this project.Sec. 911. 2024 c 310 s 214 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâPROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORTâPROGRAM HMotor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($65,161,000))Â Â Â Â Â $63,536,000Motor Vehicle AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$500,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($1,351,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,001,000Move Ahead WA Flexible AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$572,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($67,584,000))Â Â Â Â Â $65,609,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, if the department takes possession of the property situated in the city of Edmonds for which a purchase agreement was executed between Unocal and the department in 2005 (Tax Parcel Number 262703-2-003-0009), and if the department confirms that the property is still no longer needed for transportation purposes, the department shall provide the city of Edmonds with the first right of purchase at fair market value in accordance with RCW 47.12.063(3) for the city's intended use of the property to rehabilitate near-shore habitat for salmon and related species.(2) $469,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely for the implementation of chapter 217, Laws of 2021 (noxious weeds).(3) The department shall determine the fair market value of the northern parcel of site 14 on the Puget Sound Gateway Program SR 509 Completion Project Surplus Property list, located immediately south of S. 216th Street and adjacent to the Barnes Creek Nature Trail in Des Moines, to be submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 15, 2023, for an evaluation of possible next steps for use of the property that is in the public interest.(4)(a) $572,000 of the move ahead WA flexible accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to track and maximize clean fuels credits and revenue generated by state agencies pursuant to chapter 70A.535 RCW.(b) The LEAP Transportation Document ((2024-2))2025-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((March 6, 2024))April 26, 2025, anticipates fulfillment of the requirements under chapter 70A.535 RCW of generating credits and revenue for transportation investments funded in an omnibus transportation appropriations act, including the move ahead WA transportation package. The omnibus transportation appropriations act anticipates credits for ferry electrification for new hybrid electric vessels, active transportation, transit programs and projects, alternative fuel infrastructure, connecting communities, and multimodal investments.(c) Pursuant to the reporting requirements of RCW 70A.535.050(5), the department must present a detailed projection of the credit revenues generated and achieved directly as a result of the funding and activities in this subsection.(5) $93,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 169, Laws of 2023 (climate resilience strategy).(((7)))(6)(a) (($500,000))$150,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to explore alternative uses of the state's highway rights-of-way to address pressing public needs relating to climate change, equitable communications, renewable energy generation, electrical transmission and distribution projects, broadband projects, vegetation management, inductive charging in travel lanes, alternative fueling facilities, and other appropriate uses. In exploring alternative uses of the state's highway rights-of-way, the department shall:(i) Review the utility accommodation policy and make recommendations to update the policy to include clean energy and connectivity projects under 23 C.F.R. Part 645. At a minimum, the recommendations for updated clean energy and connectivity projects must include renewable energy and electrical transmission and distribution;(ii) Review and update the department's integrated roadside vegetation management plans to maximize carbon sequestration and develop habitat and forage for native pollinators, Monarch butterflies, and honeybees through plantings of native noninvasive flowering plants and grasses on the state highways rights-of-way and at safety rest areas;(iii) Assess the state highways rights-of-way land areas most suitable for solar development by considering slope, elevation, vegetative cover, and solar radiation; and(iv) Identify existing highway rights-of-way suitable as designated energy corridors for electric transmission and distribution and other energy infrastructure.(b) In carrying out the requirements in (a) of this subsection, the department may consult with an organization that uses an advanced rights-of-way solar mapping tool that uses ArcGIS Pro software for faster and more precise analysis of rights-of-way solar using the state's full spatial rights-of-way data sets.(c) The department must report its findings, recommendations, and status of its updates to the transportation committees of the legislature by January 15, 2025.(((8)))(7) To assist the department as it continues to make progress on meeting the requirements of the federal U.S. v. Washington court injunction and to address estimated programmatic cost increases, within the funding provided in this section, the department shall analyze contracting methods, alternative bundling concepts, and other options to manage costs. The department shall provide a report outlining recommendations to the governor and transportation committees of the legislature by December 15, 2024.Sec. 912. 2024 c 310 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâPUBLIC-PRIVATE PARTNERSHIPSâPROGRAM KMotor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$703,000Electric Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$4,746,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$4,400,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâFederalAppropriation. . . .(($25,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $26,770,000Carbon Emissions Reduction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($195,025,000))Â Â Â Â Â $39,323,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($229,874,000))Â Â Â Â Â $75,942,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $3,746,000 of the electric vehicle accountâstate appropriation((,))and $30,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation((, and beginning January 1, 2025, $15,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation)) are provided solely for the clean alternative fuel vehicle charging and refueling infrastructure program in ((chapter 287, Laws of 2019 (advancing green transportation adoption)))RCW 47.04.350.(2) $1,000,000 of the electric vehicle accountâstate appropriation and $500,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for a colocated DC fast charging and hydrogen fueling station near the Wenatchee or East Wenatchee area near a state route or near or on a publicly owned facility to service passenger, light-duty and heavy-duty vehicles. The hydrogen fueling station must include a DC fast charging station colocated at the hydrogen fueling station site. Funds may be used for one or more fuel cell electric vehicles that would utilize the fueling stations. The department must contract with a public utility district that produces hydrogen in the area to own and/or manage and provide technical assistance for the design, planning, permitting, construction, maintenance and operation of the hydrogen fueling station. The department and public utility district are encouraged to collaborate with and seek contributions from additional public and private partners for the fueling station.(3) The public-private partnerships program must continue to explore retail partnerships at state-owned park and ride facilities, as authorized in RCW 47.04.295.(4) $1,200,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation((,))and $2,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation((, and beginning January 1, 2025, $3,400,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation,)) are provided solely for the pilot program established under ((chapter 287, Laws of 2019 (advancing green transportation adoption)))RCW 47.04.355 to provide clean alternative fuel vehicle use opportunities to underserved communities and low to moderate income members of the workforce not readily served by transit or located in transportation corridors with emissions that exceed federal or state emissions standards. Consistent with the geographical diversity element described in RCW 47.04.355(4), the legislature strongly encourages the department to consider implementing the pilot in both urban and rural communities if possible, to obtain valuable information on the needs of underserved communities located in different geographical locations in Washington.(5) (($120,000,000))$7,849,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation((, and beginning January 1, 2025, $10,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation, are))is provided solely for implementation of zero-emission medium and heavy-duty vehicle and equipment infrastructure and incentive programs and for the replacement of school buses powered by fossil fuels with zero-emission school buses, including the purchase and installation of zero-emission school bus refueling infrastructure.(a) Of this amount, (($20,000,000))$660,000 is for the department to administer an early action grant program to provide expedited funding for the replacement of school buses powered by fossil fuels with zero-emission school buses, including the purchase and installation of zero-emission school bus refueling infrastructure. The department must contract with the department of ecology to implement the early action grant program.(b)(i) The remaining (($110,000,000))$4,149,000, inclusive of costs for program administration and staffing, is for a point-of-sale voucher incentive program to encourage the faster adoption of zero-emission medium and heavy-duty vehicles to further state climate goals under RCW 70A.45.020 and state equity goals under chapter 70A.02 RCW. The voucher incentive program must be administered by a third-party administrator that has experience administering voucher incentive programs, with oversight conducted by the department.(ii) The voucher program is required to be designed based on the recommendations of the Joint Transportation Committee report Washington State Infrastructure and Incentive Program Design for MHD ZEVs, and to include:(A) Simplified zero-emission vehicle eligibility requirements;(B) Vehicle and infrastructure incentives aligned with programs in other jurisdictions, where appropriate, to streamline user planning;(C) Financial enhancements for select populations based on equity considerations, including for vehicles in disadvantaged communities and vehicles to be purchased by small, minority-owned businesses, with consideration for support of the secondary vehicle market;(D) A centralized user and manufacturer portal for information, application, and assistance;(E) A fleet assistance and qualification program to assist in zero-emission vehicle and infrastructure planning, to be administered by the Washington State University extension energy program in coordination with the department and the voucher program's third-party administrator; and(F) A voucher preapproval process to evaluate participant eligibility, readiness for fleet deployment, and infrastructure preparedness.(iii) The following battery electric and hydrogen fuel cell electric vehicle categories and associated charging, as well as refueling infrastructure for these categories, are eligible for the voucher program, subject to additional qualification criteria to be determined by the department and the voucher program third-party administrator:(A) On-road vehicles from class 2b, heavy work pickups and vans, through class 8, heavy tractor-trailer units and refuse trucks; and(B) Cargo handling and off-road equipment.(iv) School buses and transit vehicles eligible for state grant programs for the purchase of zero-emission vehicles are not eligible for vouchers under this program, but are eligible for fleet assistance provided in association with the voucher program, which must include assistance in determining state and federal grant eligibility for these vehicles.(v) The voucher amounts selected by the department and voucher program third-party administrator must further the policy goals of the program cited in (b)(i) of this subsection by offsetting investments required for medium and heavy-duty vehicle and equipment owners to transition to zero-emission vehicles and equipment. The department and voucher program third-party administrator must condition vehicle and infrastructure voucher funding to ensure these program policy goals are furthered through the voucher funding provided.(vi) Consistent with voucher program design, the department is required to distribute funds to the voucher program third-party administrator sufficiently in advance of final requirements for voucher distribution being met to facilitate the voucher's timely distribution by the third-party administrator to sellers of zero-emission vehicles and infrastructure.(6) $2,100,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to fund electric vehicle charging infrastructure for the electric charging megasite project at Mount Vernon library commons.(7) $2,500,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to coordinate with cities, counties, ports, and private entities to develop actionable recommendations for state assistance in the development of specific candidate truck parking sites to be developed with amenities, identified by location. The department shall identify private land parcels for potential development of sites, which may include, but should not be limited to, a feasibility analysis of sites adjacent to Interstate 90 near North Bend for a 400 to 600 space truck parking site. The public benefit of each potential truck parking site must be included in this assessment. The department shall consider opportunities for the state to provide assistance in the development of truck parking sites, including possible opportunities to provide assistance in land acquisition and evaluating land use requirements. The department must update the transportation committees of the legislature on agency activities and their status by December 1, 2023, and to provide a final report to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.(8) ((Beginning January 1, 2025, $10,000,000))$14,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for grants, and to serve as a state match for secured federal funds, to finance hydrogen refueling infrastructure for medium and heavy-duty vehicles ((with a focus on locations in disadvantaged and overburdened communities, where possible)). The department, in consultation with the interagency electric vehicle coordinating council, should pursue any federal funding available through the charging and fueling infrastructure discretionary grant program and any other sources under the federal infrastructure investment and jobs act (P.L. 29 117-58).(9) ((Beginning January 1, 2025, $800,000))$400,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the cities of Bellevue and Redmond to each purchase an electric fire engine.(10) Beginning January 1, 2025, $1,725,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a Tacoma Public Utilities medium-duty zero-emission utility service vehicle pilot project that includes charging infrastructure and mobile battery units.))Sec. 913. 2024 c 310 s 216 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâHIGHWAY MAINTENANCEâPROGRAM MMotor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($545,500,000))Â Â Â Â Â $557,197,000Motor Vehicle AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$7,000,000Move Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$50,000,000RV AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,100,000State Route Number 520 Corridor AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$4,841,000Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,585,000Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$8,752,000Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 ExpressToll Lanes AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$2,624,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($621,402,000))Â Â Â Â Â $633,099,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $5,000,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a contingency pool for snow and ice removal. The department must notify the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature when they have spent the base budget for snow and ice removal and will begin using the contingency pool funding.(2)(a) $115,000 of the state route number 520 corridor accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to enter into a dispute resolution process with local jurisdictions to produce interagency agreements to address the ongoing facility and landscape maintenance of the three state route number 520 eastside lids and surrounding areas at the Evergreen Point Road, 84th Avenue NE, and 92nd Avenue NE.(b) The agreements pursuant to (a) of this subsection must be executed by June 30, 2024.(3)(a) $9,000,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to address the risks to safety and public health associated with homeless encampments on department owned rights-of-way. The department must coordinate and work with local government officials and social service organizations who provide services and direct people to housing alternatives that are not in highway rights-of-way to help prevent future encampments from forming on highway rights-of-way and may reimburse the organizations doing this outreach assistance who transition people into treatment or housing or for debris clean up on highway rights-of-way. A minimum of $2,000,000 of this appropriation must be used to deliver more frequent removal of litter on the highway rights-of-way that is generated by unsheltered people and may be used to hire crews specializing in collecting and disposing of garbage, clearing debris or hazardous material, and implementing safety improvements where hazards exist to the traveling public and department employees. The department may use these funds to either reimburse local law enforcement costs or the Washington state patrol if they are providing enhanced safety to department staff during debris cleanup or during efforts to prevent future encampments from forming on highway rights-of-way.(b) Beginning November 1, 2023, and semiannually thereafter, the Washington state patrol and the department of transportation must jointly submit a report to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature on the status of these efforts, including:(i) A summary of the activities related to addressing encampments, including information on arrangements with local governments or other entities related to these activities;(ii) A description of the planned activities in the ensuing two quarters to further address the emergency hazards and risks along state highway rights-of-way; and(iii) Recommendations for executive branch or legislative action to achieve the desired outcome of reduced emergency hazards and risks along state highway rights-of-way.(4) $1,000,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a partnership program between the department and the city of Spokane, to be administered in conjunction with subsection (3) of this section. The program must address the safety and public health problems created by homeless encampments on the department's property along state highways within the city limits. $555,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is for dedicated department maintenance staff and associated clean-up costs. The department and the city of Spokane shall enter into a reimbursable agreement to cover up to $445,000 of the city's expenses for clean-up crews and landfill costs.(5) $1,025,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to implement safety improvements and debris clean up on department-owned rights-of-way in the city of Seattle at levels above that being implemented as of January 1, 2019, to be administered in conjunction with subsection (3) of this section. The department must maintain a crew dedicated solely to collecting and disposing of garbage, clearing debris or hazardous material, and implementing safety improvements where hazards exist to the traveling public, department employees, or people encamped upon department-owned rights-of-way. The department may request assistance from the Washington state patrol as necessary in order for both agencies to provide enhanced safety-related activities regarding the emergency hazards along state highway rights-of-way in the Seattle area.(6) $1,015,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a partnership program between the department and the city of Tacoma, to be administered in conjunction with subsection (3) of this section. The program must address the safety and public health problems created by homeless encampments on the department's property along state highways within the city limits. $570,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is for dedicated department maintenance staff and associated clean-up costs. The department and the city of Tacoma shall enter into a reimbursable agreement to cover up to $445,000 of the city's expenses for clean-up crews and landfill costs.(7) (($1,500,000))$1,300,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with the city of Fife to address the risks to safety and public health associated with homeless encampments on department-owned rights-of-way along the SR 167/SR 509 Puget Sound Gateway project corridor in and adjacent to the city limits pursuant to section 216(10), chapter 186, Laws of 2022. However, the amount provided in this subsection must be placed in unallotted status and may not be spent prior to November 1, 2023. If, after November 1, 2023, the department, in consultation with the office of financial management, determines that the department fully spent the $2,000,000 appropriated in section 216(10), chapter 186, Laws of 2022, within the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium for this purpose, the amount provided in this subsection must remain in unallotted status and unspent. If the department did not fully spend the $2,000,000 within the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the department may only spend from the appropriation in this subsection an amount not in excess of the amount unspent from the $2,000,000 within the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, with any remaining amount to remain in unallotted status and unspent. In no event may the department spend more than $2,000,000 within the 2021-2023 and 2023-2025 fiscal biennia for this purpose.(8) To the greatest extent practicable, the department shall schedule mowing along state highways to occur after litter pickup has been performed in the area to be mowed. This subsection is not intended to prevent mowing or other similar maintenance activities from being undertaken in the event litter pickup has not been performed.Sec. 914. 2024 c 310 s 217 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâTRANSPORTATION OPERATIONSâPROGRAM QâOPERATINGHighway Safety FundâState Appropriation. . . .(($5,529,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,897,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($88,566,000))Â Â Â Â Â $86,574,000Motor Vehicle AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$2,050,000Motor Vehicle AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$294,000Move Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$3,090,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$5,000,000State Route Number 520 Corridor AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$247,000Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$44,000Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,122,000Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 ExpressToll Lanes AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$37,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($105,979,000))Â Â Â Â Â $103,355,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $6,000,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for low-cost enhancements. The department shall give priority to low-cost enhancement projects that improve safety or provide congestion relief. By December 15th of each odd-numbered year, the department shall provide a report to the legislature listing all low-cost enhancement projects completed in the prior fiscal biennium.(2)(a) During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the department shall continue a pilot program that expands private transportation providers' access to high occupancy vehicle lanes. Under the pilot program, when the department reserves a portion of a highway based on the number of passengers in a vehicle, the following vehicles must be authorized to use the reserved portion of the highway if the vehicle has the capacity to carry eight or more passengers, regardless of the number of passengers in the vehicle: (i) Auto transportation company vehicles regulated under chapter 81.68 RCW; (ii) passenger charter carrier vehicles regulated under chapter 81.70 RCW, except marked or unmarked stretch limousines and stretch sport utility vehicles as defined under department of licensing rules; (iii) private nonprofit transportation provider vehicles regulated under chapter 81.66 RCW; and (iv) private employer transportation service vehicles. For purposes of this subsection, "private employer transportation service" means regularly scheduled, fixed-route transportation service that is offered by an employer for the benefit of its employees. Nothing in this subsection is intended to authorize the conversion of public infrastructure to private, for-profit purposes or to otherwise create an entitlement or other claim by private users to public infrastructure.(b) The department shall expand the high occupancy vehicle lane access pilot program to vehicles that deliver or collect blood, tissue, or blood components for a blood-collecting or distributing establishment regulated under chapter 70.335 RCW. Under the pilot program, when the department reserves a portion of a highway based on the number of passengers in a vehicle, blood-collecting or distributing establishment vehicles that are clearly and identifiably marked as such on all sides of the vehicle are considered emergency vehicles and must be authorized to use the reserved portion of the highway.(c) The department shall expand the high occupancy vehicle lane access pilot program to for hire nonemergency medical transportation vehicles, when in use for medical purposes, as described in section 208(20), chapter 472, Laws of 2023. Under the pilot program, when the department reserves a portion of a highway based on the number of passengers in a vehicle, nonemergency medical transportation vehicles that meet the requirements identified in section 208(20), chapter 472, Laws of 2023 must be authorized to use the reserved portion of the highway.(d) Nothing in this subsection is intended to exempt these vehicles from paying tolls when they do not meet the occupancy requirements established by the department for express toll lanes.(3) The appropriations in this section assume implementation of additional cost recovery mechanisms to recoup at least $100,000 in credit card and other financial transaction costs related to the collection of fees imposed under RCW 46.17.400, 46.44.090, and 46.44.0941 for driver and vehicle fee transactions beginning January 1, 2023. The department may recover transaction fees incurred through credit card transactions.(4) The department shall promote safety messages encouraging drivers to slow down and move over and pay attention when emergency lights are flashing on the side of the road and other suitable safety messages on electronic message boards the department operates across the state. The messages must be promoted through June 30, 2025. The department may coordinate such messaging with any statewide public awareness campaigns being developed by the department of licensing or the Washington state traffic safety commission, or both.(5) $5,000,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to address emergent issues related to safety for pedestrians and bicyclists. Funds may only be spent after approval from the office of financial management. By December 15th of each odd-numbered year, the department shall provide a report to the legislature listing all emergent issues addressed in the prior fiscal biennium.(6) (($3,529,000))$2,897,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 17, Laws of 2023 (speed safety cameras).(7) $1,279,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for maintenance and operations of the virtual coordination center. The department is encouraged to apply for federal grant funds for the virtual coordination center and may use state funds as a match. By December 1, 2023, the department shall report to the transportation committees of the legislature: (a) Recommendations to expand the center's operations, including specific additional jurisdictions and corridors across the state; and (b) amounts received and dates of receipt of any new cash and in-kind matches from virtual coordination center partners including, but not limited to, the city of Seattle, King county, other state and local jurisdictions, and private sector partners.(8) $100,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to prepare and submit a report to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024, with a prioritized list of recommendations for improving safety and mobility on Interstate 90 between North Bend and Cle Elum during winter weather events, including estimated costs. The recommendations must include, but are not limited to, options to improve compliance with traction tire and chain requirements and reduce snow-related closures.(9)(a) (($5,000,000))$3,100,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department, in coordination with the independent review team of the joint transportation committee, to conduct an analysis of highway, road, and freight rail transportation needs, options, and impacts from shifting the movement of freight and goods that currently move by barge through the lower Snake river dams to highways, other roads, and rail. The study should generate volume estimates and evaluate scenarios for changes in infrastructure and operations that would be necessary to address those additional volumes. The assessment must include quantitative analysis based on available data in terms of both financial and carbon emission costs; and qualitative input gathered from tribal governments, local governments, freight interests, and other key stakeholders, including impacts on disadvantaged/underserved communities. The analysis must include a robust public engagement process to solicit feedback from interested stakeholders including but not limited to: Residents and officials in affected cities and counties; stakeholders involved in railroad, agriculture, fishing, trucking, shipping and other related industries; appropriate Native American tribes; representatives of advocacy and community organizations; and transportation, public works, and economic development organizations in the affected areas, federal highway administration and army corps of engineers. The analysis must be informed by the work of the joint transportation committee's independent review team, and must include the following:(i) Existing volumes and traffic patterns;(ii) Potential changes in volumes and traffic patterns immediately following the loss of freight movement by barge and over the following 20 years, including the carbon emissions impact of this mode shift;(iii) Identification of whether regional geography, land availability, and state and federal regulatory processes would allow for rail and road expansions and increased capacity;(iv) Identification of potential infrastructure and operational improvements to existing highways, other roads, and rail, including additional access to facilities, needed to accommodate the higher freight volumes and impacts and potential opportunities to mitigate impacts on shipping rates;(v) Identification of rail line development options, including impacts and potential opportunities to mitigate impacts on grain storage and handling facilities at regional unit train yards and port export facilities;(vi) An assessment of costs associated with mitigating potential slope failure and stabilization necessitated by the drawdown of the river. An assessment of impacts and potential opportunities to mitigate impacts on adjacent roads, bridges, railroads, and utility corridors shall be included;(vii) Both financial and carbon cost estimates for development and implementation of identified needs and options, including planning, design, and construction;(viii) Analysis of the impacts and potential opportunities to mitigate impacts of these infrastructure changes on environmental justice and disadvantaged/underserved communities during construction, as well as from future operations;(ix) Analysis of safety impacts and potential opportunities to mitigate impacts for a shift from barge transportation to rail or truck, including increases in rural community traffic and consistency with the Washington State Strategic Highway Safety Plan: Target Zero;(x) Impacts and potential opportunities to mitigate impacts on highly affected commodities, including agriculture, petroleum, project cargo, and wind energy components;(xi) Analysis of the impacts and potential opportunities to mitigate impacts that reduced competition resulting from removing barging of agricultural products on the Snake river would have on Washington's agricultural industry along with impacts modal shifts would have on the entire supply chain, including export facilities and ports on the Lower Columbia River; and(xii) Determination of the feasibility that additional east-west freight rail capacity can be achieved, particularly through Columbia River Gorge, and the alternative routes that exist in the event that adding more infrastructure on these routes is not feasible.(b) The department shall provide status updates on a quarterly basis in coordination with the joint transportation committee. The legislature intends to require a final report to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 31, 2026.(10) $2,000,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department, in consultation with the Washington traffic safety commission, to evaluate and identify geographical locations in both urban and rural highway settings to install and implement wrong-way driving prevention strategies. Such prevention strategies may include improved signage and pavement markings as recommended by the traffic safety commission's report on wrong-way driving, "Strategies and Technologies to Prevent and Respond to Wrong-Way Driving Crashes." The department must report to the legislature any crash data or wrong-way violations that occur at the selected locations by June 30, 2025.(11) $1,000,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to develop an automated highway speed safety camera pilot program to test two to three automated traffic safety cameras on state highways. The goals of the automated highway speed safety camera pilot program are to test speed camera technology, determine the impact on speeding behavior in areas of testing, and compile public response to the use of traffic safety cameras on highways.(a) The department must work with the Washington state patrol and the traffic safety commission to develop the pilot program to include, but not be limited to, the following program elements:(i) Selection of technology;(ii) Placement of cameras in high speed, collision, or fatality locations;(iii) Establishment of public notification and warning signs prior to entering into an area with a speed safety camera;(iv) Outreach and public engagement about the program and site selection process; and(v) Development and implementation of a process to collect and report relevant pilot program data, including rates of speed prior to, during, and after the use of pilot program cameras, and public response to pilot program cameras.(b) Automated traffic safety cameras may only take pictures of the vehicle and the vehicle license plates.(c) Ticketing of violators using vehicle speed information captured by automated traffic safety cameras authorized under the pilot program is prohibited during the pilot program.(d) As part of the pilot program, the department may inform registered vehicle owners of a vehicle's rate of speed exceeding the posted speed limit and the amount of the fine the law would have allowed to be imposed by providing notification by mail.(e) The department is required to provide a program progress report to the governor and transportation committees of the legislature by ((September 30, 2024))June 30, 2025, to include a summary of public input on the use of safety cameras, including objections, evaluation of technologies used, and changes in speeding behavior.(f) Photographs, microphotographs, electronic images, and other personally identifying data captured and collected for the purposes of the pilot program are for the exclusive use of the Washington state patrol and department of transportation in carrying out the pilot program, are not open to the public, and may not be used in court in a pending action or proceeding.(12) $1,000,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 111, Laws of 2024 (graffiti abatement and reduction pilot). If chapter 111, Laws of 2024 is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.Sec. 915. 2024 c 310 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâTRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORTâPROGRAM SMotor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($63,497,000))Â Â Â Â Â $63,497,000Motor Vehicle AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$780,000Motor Vehicle AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$500,000Move Ahead WA Flexible AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$5,400,000Puget Sound Ferry Operations AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$509,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($22,723,000))Â Â Â Â Â $15,932,000State Route Number 520 Corridor AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$220,000Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$136,000Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$127,000Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 ExpressToll Lanes AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$114,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($94,006,000))Â Â Â Â Â $87,215,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) $2,000,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation and $5,400,000 of the move ahead WA flexible accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for efforts to increase diversity in the transportation construction workforce through:(i) The preapprenticeship support services (PASS) and career opportunity maritime preapprenticeship support services (COMPASS) programs, which aim to increase diversity in the highway construction and maritime workforces and prepare individuals interested in entering the highway construction and maritime workforces. In addition to the services allowed under RCW 47.01.435, the PASS and COMPASS programs may provide housing assistance for youth aging out of the foster care and juvenile rehabilitation systems to support their participation in a transportation-related preapprenticeship program and support services to obtain necessary maritime documents and coast guard certification; and(ii) Assisting minority and women-owned businesses to perform work in the highway construction industry.(b) The department shall report annually to the transportation committees of the legislature on efforts to increase diversity in the transportation construction workforce.(c) The office of equity and civil rights may revise program standards, as needed, with legislative consultation.(2) $1,512,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation and $488,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the department to develop, track, and monitor the progress of community workforce agreements, and to assist with the development and implementation of internal diversity, equity, and inclusion efforts and serve as subject matter experts on federal and state civil rights provisions. The department shall engage with relevant stakeholders, and provide a progress report on the implementation of efforts under this subsection to the transportation committees of the legislature and the governor by December 1, 2024.(3) For Washington state department of transportation small works roster projects under RCW 39.04.155, the department may only allow firms certified as small business enterprises, under 49 C.F.R. 26.39, to bid on the contract, unless the department determines there would be insufficient bidders for a particular project. The department shall report on the effectiveness of this policy to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.(4) $21,195,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation and (($21,194,000))$14,403,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the department to upgrade the transportation reporting and accounting information system to the current cloud version of the software, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701, chapter 472, Laws of 2023.(5) $56,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 230, Laws of 2023 (clean energy siting).Sec. 916. 2024 c 310 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâTRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND RESEARCHâPROGRAM TCarbon Emissions Reduction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$4,000,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($32,044,000))Â Â Â Â Â $30,459,000Motor Vehicle AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($31,527,000))Â Â Â Â Â $31,527,000Motor Vehicle AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$400,000Move Ahead WA Flexible AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$11,922,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($2,714,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,574,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâFederalAppropriation. . . .$2,809,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâPrivate/LocalAppropriation. . . .$100,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($85,516,000))Â Â Â Â Â $83,791,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $750,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to partner with the department of commerce and regional transportation planning organizations in implementing vehicle miles traveled targets and supporting actions. As part of target setting, important factors that must be considered include land use patterns, safety, and vulnerable populations. The department shall provide an interim report by June 30, 2024, and a final report by June 30, 2025.(2) $150,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to continue implementation of a performance-based project evaluation model. The department must issue a report by September 1, 2024.(3)(a) $180,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for Thurston regional planning council (TRPC) to conduct a study examining options for multimodal high capacity transportation (HCT) to serve travelers on the Interstate 5 corridor between central Thurston county (Olympia area) and Pierce county.(b) The study will include an assessment of travelsheds and ridership potential and identify and provide an evaluation of options to enhance connectivity and accessibility for the greater south Puget Sound region with an emphasis on linking to planned or existing commuter or regional light rail. The study must account for previous and ongoing efforts by transit agencies and the department. The study will emphasize collaboration with a diverse community of interests, including but not limited to transit, business, public agencies, tribes, and providers and users of transportation who because of age, income, or ability may face barriers and challenges.(c) The study is due to the governor and transportation committees of the legislature by September 1, 2024.(4) (($700,000))$560,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the city of Seattle's office of planning and community development to support an equitable development initiative to reconnect the South Park neighborhood, currently divided by state route number 99.(a) The support work must include:(i) A public engagement and visioning process led by a neighborhood-based, community organization; and(ii) A feasibility study of decommissioning state route number 99 in the South Park neighborhood to include, but not be limited to, traffic studies, environmental impact analysis, and development of alternatives, including the transfer of the land to a neighborhood-led community land trust.(b) The support work must be conducted in coordination and partnership with neighborhood residents, neighborhood industrial and commercial representatives, the state department of transportation, and other entities and neighborhoods potentially impacted by changes to the operation of state route number 99.(c) The city must provide ((a report on the plan that includes recommendations))an interim report on progress to date to the Seattle city council, state department of transportation, and the transportation committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025.(5) (($2,557,000))$1,000,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to upgrade the department's linear referencing system (LRS) and highway performance monitoring system (HPMS)((, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements in section 701, chapter 472, Laws of 2023)).(6) $306,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to appoint or designate a liaison to serve as a point of contact and resource for the department, local governments, and project proponents regarding land use decisions and processing development permit applications. The liaison must, as a priority, facilitate and expedite any department decisions required for project approval.(7) $742,000 of the motor vehicle accountâfederal appropriation is provided solely for remaining work on the "Forward Drive" road usage charge research project overseen by the transportation commission using the remaining amounts of the federal grant award. The remaining work of this project includes:(a) Analysis of road usage charge simulation and participant surveys;(b) Follow up on road usage charge experiences related to payment installments, mileage exemptions, and vehicle-based mileage reporting;(c) Completion of technology research; and(d) Development of the final "Forward Drive" research program report.(8)(a) $11,922,000 of the move ahead WA flexible accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for an Interstate 5 planning and environmental linkage study and a statewide Interstate 5 master plan, building upon existing work under way in the corridor. It is the intent of the legislature to provide a total of $40,000,000 for this work by 2029.(b) The work under (a) of this subsection must include, but is not limited to, the following:(i) Seismic resiliency planning to refine the level of effort and develop informed cost estimates for the seismic vulnerability analysis;(ii) HOV lane system-wide performance planning and initial steps to launch a pilot project that progresses innovative and emerging technologies;(iii) Interstate 5 corridor planning work, including development of a framework, coordination of corridor needs, development of core evaluation criteria and a prioritization process, and identification of early action priority projects that address safety or resiliency, or both, along the corridor; and(iv) A report to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024, with recommendations for future phases and a detailed funding request for work planned through 2029.(c) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $300,000 is provided solely for the department to conduct a Seattle Interstate 5 ramp reconfiguration study. The study must be conducted in coordination and partnership with the city of Seattle's department of transportation, informed by the input of Interstate 5 lid stakeholders, and coordinated with work under (a) and (b) of this subsection. The department must provide a study report, including recommendations, to the city of Seattle's department of transportation and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024. The study must include an analysis of:(i) Options and opportunities to reconfigure, relocate, or remove Interstate 5 ramps within and between Chinatown-International District and the University District for the purpose of improving through-traffic operations, enhancing multimodal transportation safety, and enabling more efficient air rights development;(ii) Potential mitigation needs and cost estimates of ramp changes and demolitions;(iii) Benefits of ramp changes and demolitions to pedestrian and bicycle travel, transit operations, and future lid design;(iv) Ramps for the mainline, collector-distributor lanes and express lanes including, at a minimum, ramps connecting to and from James Street, Cherry Street, 6th Avenue, Madison Street, Seneca Street, Spring Street, University Street, Union Street, Olive Way, Yale Avenue, NE 45th Street, and NE 50th Street;(v) Removal of the existing ramps at Seneca Street, Spring Street, and University Street; and(vi) Removal and consolidation options of the existing NE 45th Street and NE 50th Street ramps.(d) The department shall work with the emergency management division of the military department to identify strategic transportation corridors, opportunities to improve resilience and reinforce the corridors against natural disasters, and opportunities to secure federal funding for investments in the resilience of the transportation network. The department shall provide a report to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023, on:(i) Strategic transportation corridors and opportunities to improve their resilience;(ii) Federal funding opportunities the state should pursue; and(iii) Recommendations for actions to maximize federal funding for the state of Washington.(9) The department shall continue to coordinate planning work focused on the transportation system in western Washington across modes with the goal of maximizing system performance toward the policy goals in RCW 47.04.280 in the most cost-effective manner. This coordination must include, but is not limited to: The Interstate 5 highway corridor, existing rail infrastructure and future high-speed rail alignment, and commercial aviation capacity. The department must report to the joint transportation committee through existing reporting mechanisms on the status of these planning efforts including, but not limited to, a long-term strategy for addressing resilience of the transportation system in western Washington through consideration of changing demand, modal integration, and preservation needs. The coordinated work must include an analysis of different alternatives to promote system resilience, including performance and cost of each scenario.(10) $3,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department, in coordination with the department's HEAL act team and environmental services office, to develop and implement a community outreach, education, and technical assistance program for overburdened communities and their community partners in order to develop community-centered carbon reduction strategies to make meaningful impacts in a community, and to provide assistance in gaining access to available funding to implement these strategies, where applicable. The department may provide appropriate compensation to members of overburdened communities who provide solicited community participation and input needed by the department to implement and administer the program established in this subsection. By June 1, 2024, and by June 1, 2025, the department must submit a report to the transportation committees of the legislature and to the governor that provides an update on the department's community outreach, education, and technical assistance program development and implementation efforts.(11) $200,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for planning and intersection improvements along state route number 904 and improvements to the local network that would feed intersections with state route number 904. This work must include, but is not limited to, the Medical Lake/Four Lakes Road/West 3rd Ave intersection and feeding local network. The department must collaborate with Spokane county and the city of Cheney on this work and other improvement ideas along the corridor.(12) Beginning January 1, 2025, $1,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with a world cup organizing committee based in Seattle to undertake low carbon transportation planning efforts that will help prepare for the increase in visitors due to the 2026 FIFA world cup soccer matches in Seattle and other venues in the state. The planning, to be developed in coordination with the department and local mobility agencies, must identify critical infrastructure and operational improvements that will support active transportation and reliability of transit, making it easier for the public to choose options other than single-occupancy vehicles. A progress report including best practices for future events must be delivered to the department, office of the governor, and transportation committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025.Sec. 917. 2024 c 310 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâCHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIESâPROGRAM UAeronautics AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,000Transportation Partnership AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$56,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($112,419,000))Â Â Â Â Â $122,169,000Puget Sound Ferry Operations AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$244,000State Route Number 520 Corridor AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$69,000Connecting Washington AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$452,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($6,335,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,335,000Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$43,000Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$38,000Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 ExpressToll Lanes AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$43,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($119,700,000))Â Â Â Â Â $129,450,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Consistent with existing protocol and practices, for any negotiated settlement of a claim against the state for the department that exceeds $5,000,000, the department, in conjunction with the attorney general and the department of enterprise services, shall notify the director of the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature.(2) On August 1, 2023, and semiannually thereafter, the department, in conjunction with the attorney general and the department of enterprise services, shall provide a report with judgments and settlements dealing with the Washington state ferry system to the director of the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature. The report must include information on: (a) The number of claims and settlements by type; (b) the average claim and settlement by type; (c) defense costs associated with those claims and settlements; and (d) information on the impacts of moving legal costs associated with the Washington state ferry system into the statewide self-insurance pool.(3) On August 1, 2023, and semiannually thereafter, the department, in conjunction with the attorney general and the department of enterprise services, shall provide a report with judgments and settlements dealing with the nonferry operations of the department to the director of the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature. The report must include information on: (a) The number of claims and settlements by type; (b) the average claim and settlement by type; and (c) defense costs associated with those claims and settlements.(4) When the department identifies significant legal issues that have potential transportation budget implications, the department must initiate a briefing for appropriate legislative members or staff through the office of the attorney general and its legislative briefing protocol.Sec. 918. 2024 c 310 s 221 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâPUBLIC TRANSPORTATIONâPROGRAM VCarbon Emissions Reduction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($30,400,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,257,000Climate Transit Programs AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($410,645,000))Â Â Â Â Â $378,704,000State Vehicle Parking AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$784,000Regional Mobility Grant Program AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($120,177,000))Â Â Â Â Â $61,730,000Rural Mobility Grant Program AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$33,077,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($126,238,000))Â Â Â Â Â $119,509,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâFederalAppropriation. . . .$4,374,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâPrivate/LocalAppropriation. . . .$100,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($725,795,000))Â Â Â Â Â $600,535,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $64,906,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation and (($78,325,000))$77,900,000 of the climate transit programs accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for a grant program for special needs transportation provided by transit agencies and nonprofit providers of transportation. Of this amount:(a) $14,420,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation and (($17,963,000))$17,713,000 of the climate transit programs accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for grants to nonprofit providers of special needs transportation. Grants for nonprofit providers must be based on need, including the availability of other providers of service in the area, efforts to coordinate trips among providers and riders, and the cost effectiveness of trips provided.(b) $48,278,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation and (($60,137,000))$59,962,000 of the climate transit programs accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for grants to transit agencies to transport persons with special transportation needs. To receive a grant, the transit agency must, to the greatest extent practicable, have a maintenance of effort for special needs transportation that is no less than the previous year's maintenance of effort for special needs transportation. Grants for transit agencies must be prorated based on the amount expended for demand response service and route deviated service in calendar year 2021 as reported in the "2021 Summary of Public Transportation" published by the department of transportation. No transit agency may receive more than 30 percent of these distributions. Fuel type may not be a factor in the grant selection process.(c) $2,208,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation and $225,000 of the climate transit programs accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the reappropriation of amounts provided for this purpose in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.(2) $33,077,000 of the rural mobility grant program accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for grants to aid small cities in rural areas as prescribed in RCW 47.66.100. Fuel type may not be a factor in the grant selection process.(3) (($11,598,000))$9,925,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a public transit rideshare grant program for: (a) Public transit agencies to add or replace rideshare vehicles; and (b) incentives and outreach to increase rideshare use. The grant program for public transit agencies may cover capital costs only, and costs for operating vanpools at public transit agencies are not eligible for funding under this grant program. Awards from the grant program must not be used to supplant transit funds currently funding ride share programs, or to hire additional employees. Fuel type may not be a factor in the grant selection process. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,308,000 is for the reappropriation of amounts provided for this purpose in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.(4) $48,597,000 of the regional mobility grant program accountâstate appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely for the regional mobility grant projects identified in LEAP Transportation Document ((2024-2))2025-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((March 6, 2024))April 26, 2025, Program - Public Transportation Program (V).(5)(a) (($71,581,000))$13,133,000 of the regional mobility grant program accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the regional mobility grant projects identified in LEAP Transportation Document ((2024-2))2025-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((March 6, 2024))April 26, 2025, Program - Public Transportation Program (V). The department shall review all projects receiving grant awards under this program at least semiannually to determine whether the projects are making satisfactory progress. Any project that has been awarded funds, but does not report activity on the project within one year of the grant award, must be reviewed by the department to determine whether the grant should be terminated. The department shall promptly close out grants when projects have been completed, and any remaining funds must be used only to fund projects identified in the LEAP transportation document referenced in this subsection. The department shall provide annual status reports on December 15, 2023, and December 15, 2024, to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature regarding the projects receiving the grants. It is the intent of the legislature to appropriate funds through the regional mobility grant program only for projects that will be completed on schedule. A grantee may not receive more than 25 percent of the amount appropriated in this subsection unless all other funding is awarded. Additionally, when allocating funding for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, no more than 30 percent of the total grant program may directly benefit or support one grantee unless all other funding is awarded. Fuel type may not be a factor in the grant selection process.(b) In order to be eligible to receive a grant under (a) of this subsection during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, a transit agency must establish a process for private transportation providers to apply for the use of park and ride facilities. For purposes of this subsection, (i) "private transportation provider" means: An auto transportation company regulated under chapter 81.68 RCW; a passenger charter carrier regulated under chapter 81.70 RCW, except marked or unmarked stretch limousines and stretch sport utility vehicles as defined under department of licensing rules; a private nonprofit transportation provider regulated under chapter 81.66 RCW; or a private employer transportation service provider; and (ii) "private employer transportation service" means regularly scheduled, fixed-route transportation service that is offered by an employer for the benefit of its employees.(c) (($1,500,000))$749,000 of the amount appropriated in this subsection is provided solely for a contingency fund to assist current regional mobility grantees with cost escalations and overages. The department shall create a system for grantees to request funds, and set a cap of contingency funds per grantee to ensure an equitable distribution among requesters.(d) During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the department shall consider applications submitted by regional transportation planning organizations and metropolitan planning organizations for the regional mobility grant program funding in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium. (6) $6,195,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation, $3,300,000 of the climate transit programs accountâstate appropriation, and $784,000 of the state vehicle parking accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for CTR grants and activities. Fuel type may not be a factor in the grant selection process. Of this amount, $495,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely for continuation of previously approved projects under the first mile/last mile connections grant program.(7) (($16,319,000))$12,911,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for connecting Washington transit projects identified in LEAP Transportation Document ((2024-2))2025-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((March 6, 2024))April 26, 2025. It is the intent of the legislature that entities identified to receive funding in the LEAP transportation document referenced in this subsection receive the amounts specified in the time frame specified in that LEAP document. If an entity has already completed a project in the LEAP transportation document referenced in this subsection before the time frame identified, the entity may substitute another transit project or projects that cost a similar or lesser amount.(8) The department shall not require more than a 10 percent match from nonprofit transportation providers for state grants.(9) (($12,000,000))$12,203,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation and (($39,400,000))$28,905,000 of the climate transit programs accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the green transportation capital projects identified in LEAP Transportation Document ((2024-2))2025-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((March 6, 2024))April 26, 2025, Program - Public Transportation Program (V). Of the amount of climate transit program account funds appropriated in this subsection, up to one percent may be used for program administration and staffing.(10) (($5,950,000))$3,864,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation and (($1,249,000))$144,000 of the climate transit programs accountâstate appropriation are reappropriated and provided solely for the green transportation capital grant projects identified in LEAP Transportation Document ((2024-2))2025-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((March 6, 2024))April 26, 2025, Program - Public Transportation Program (V).(11) ((Beginning January 1, 2025, $7,442,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for additional green transportation capital projects identified in LEAP Transportation Document 2024-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed March 6, 2024. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,000,000 is for the Jefferson Transit - Electric Bus Replacement project (GT23250A), $1,023,000 is for the Pacific Transit - Electrification of the Paratransit Fleet project (GT23250C), $3,795,000 is for the C-TRAN - Hydrogen Fueling Station Infrastructure project (GT23250D), and $1,623,000 is for the Island Transit - Fleet Expansion project (GT23250E).(12) $10,267,000))$8,632,000 of the climate transit programs accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for tribal transit grants. Up to one percent of the amount provided in this subsection may be used for program administration and staffing.(a) The department must establish a tribal transit competitive grant program. Grants to federally recognized tribes may be for any transit purpose, including planning, operating costs, maintenance, and capital costs. The department shall report to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management with a list of projects recommended for funding by September 1, 2024, along with recommendations on how to remove barriers for tribes to access grant funds, including removal of grant match requirements, and recommendations for how the department can provide technical assistance.(b) Within the amount provided in this subsection, (($10,167,000))$8,532,000 is provided solely for move ahead Washington tribal transit grant projects as listed in LEAP Transportation Document ((2024-2))2025-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((March 6, 2024))April 26, 2025. Of this amount, $529,000 is for the Sauk-Suiattle Commuter project (L1000318).(((13)))(12) $188,930,000 of the climate transit programs accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for transit support grants for public transit agencies that have adopted a zero-fare policy for youth 18 years of age and under by October 1, 2022. The department must confirm zero-fare policies are in effect at transit agencies to be eligible for biennial distributions.(((14) $38,000,000))(13) $35,723,000 of the climate transit programs accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the bus and bus facility grant program for replacement, rehabilitation, and purchase of transit rolling stock, or construction, modification, or rehabilitation of transit facilities.(((15) Beginning January 1, 2025, $7,758,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for additional bus and bus facility projects. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,467,000 is for Kitsap Transit for inductive charging units for transit centers, $1,891,000 is for Twin Transit for zero-emission vehicle acquisition, $4,400,000 is for C-TRAN for highway 99 BRT hydrogen fuel cell buses.(16)))(14) $2,000,000 of the climate transit programs accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for newly selected transit coordination grants. The department shall prioritize grant proposals that promote the formation of joint partnerships between transit agencies or merge service delivery across entities.(((17) $46,587,000))(15) $31,544,000 of the climate transit programs accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for move ahead Washington transit projects as listed in LEAP Transportation Document ((2024-2))2025-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((March 6, 2024))April 26, 2025, Move Ahead WA - Transit Projects.(a) For projects funded as part of this subsection, if the department expects to have substantial reappropriations for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the department may, on a pilot basis, apply funding from a project with an appropriation that is unable to be used within the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium to advance one or more of the projects listed, prioritizing projects first by tier then by project readiness.(b) In instances when projects listed in the LEAP transportation document referenced in this subsection (15) are no longer viable or have been completed, the department may recommend in its next budget submittal alternative project proposals from the local jurisdictions if the project is similar in type and scope and consistent with limitations on certain funds provided. In the event that the listed project has been completed, the local jurisdictions may, rather than submitting an alternative project, be reimbursed in the year in which it was scheduled for documented costs incurred implementing the listed project, not in excess of the amount awarded from the funding program.(c) At least 10 business days before advancing or swapping a project pursuant to this subsection, the department must notify the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature. The advancement of a project may not hinder the delivery of the projects for which the reappropriations are necessary for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium.(((18)))(16) $702,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide a statewide vanpool benefit for all state employees. For department employees working in remote job sites, such as mountain passes, the department must ensure employees are able to access job sites via a subsidized vanpool or provide a modal alternative for the "last mile" to ensure employees can access the job site without additional charge.(((19)))(17) $200,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to update the 2019 feasibility study to add a fifth travel Washington intercity bus line in the Yakima Valley. The department must provide a summary report of the updated feasibility and cost estimates to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.(((20)))(18) $555,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation and $500,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for an interagency transfer to the Washington State University extension energy program to administer a technical assistance and education program for public agencies on the use of alternative fuel vehicles. The Washington State University extension energy program shall prepare a report regarding the utilization of the program and submit this report to the transportation committees of the legislature by November 15, 2023.(((21)))(19)(a) $500,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for King county metro to develop a pilot program to place teams, including human services personnel, along routes that are enduring significant public safety issues and various disruptive behavior in south King county. The team would be available to deescalate disruptions, provide immediate access to transit resources, and refer customers to community resources to break cycles of inappropriate behavior. The teams must consist of individuals trained in deescalation and outreach. Team functions and duties should be cocreated with community stakeholders.(b) King county metro must provide a report to the transportation committees of the legislature by June 30, 2024, regarding the effectiveness of the program, any suggestions for improving its efficacy, and any modifications that might be necessary for other transit providers to institute similar programs.(c) King county metro must provide at least a 50 percent match to develop the pilot program funded under this subsection.(((22)))(20) $500,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for planning to move Grays Harbor transit operation and administration facilities from the current location.(((23)))(21) As part of the department's 2025-2027 biennial budget request, the department must submit budget materials for the public transportation division separated into operating and capital budgeted programs.(((24) Beginning January 1, 2025, $2,000,000))(22) $290,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for new transit coordination grants, prioritizing projects that coordinate transit service to and from Washington state ferry terminals. Program eligibility must be expanded to include proposals from transit agencies in counties with populations fewer than 700,000 that coordinate service to and from Washington state ferry terminals.(((25) Beginning January 1, 2025, $900,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to implement certain recommendations from the 2023 frequent transit service study. The department shall define levels and types of demand-response service and measure access to these services within Washington for the purpose of gaining a fuller picture of transit access. The department must collect ongoing transportation data and develop systems to allow for analysis of disparities in access to existing fixed route transit. The data collection should prioritize collecting information on accessibility and inclusion of people with disabilities, vulnerable populations in overburdened communities, and other underserved communities. The department shall submit a report on data collection efforts to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management by June 30, 2025.(26) Beginning January 1, 2025, $11,800,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the following projects identified in LEAP Transportation Document 2024-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed March 6, 2024:(a) Base Refurbish & Expansion for Growth/Columbia County Public Transportation (L4000182);(b) Kitsap Transit: Design & Shore Power (G2000115);(c) Pierce Transit - Meridian (L2021197); and(d) King County Metro South Annex Base - Electrification Elements (L4000174).(27)))(23) $100,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for King county metro to implement a pilot program to provide funds to nonprofit organizations to offer rideshare vouchers to persons who are low-income and people with disabilities who rely on paratransit to get to and from work or medical appointments. King county metro must work with a group who provides dialysis services in King county and with a group who provides employment services and supports to adults with disabilities in the four most populous counties in Washington. The department must submit a report to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature by June 1, 2025. The report must incorporate feedback from participants to the extent possible and evaluate the effectiveness of the program as an alternative to current public transportation programs.Sec. 919. 2024 c 310 s 222 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâMARINEâPROGRAM XPuget Sound Ferry Operations AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($571,594,000))Â Â Â Â Â $541,178,000Puget Sound Ferry Operations AccountâFederalAppropriation. . . .(($198,650,000))Â Â Â Â Â $197,187,000Puget Sound Ferry Operations AccountâPrivate/LocalAppropriation. . . .$121,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($770,365,000))Â Â Â Â Â $738,486,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The office of financial management budget instructions require agencies to recast enacted budgets into activities. The Washington state ferries shall include a greater level of detail in its 2023-2025 supplemental and 2025-2027 omnibus transportation appropriations act requests, as determined jointly by the office of financial management, the Washington state ferries, and the transportation committees of the legislature. This level of detail must include the administrative functions in the operating as well as capital programs. The data in the tables in the report must be supplied in a digital file format.(2) (($97,060,000))$75,020,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâfederal appropriation and (($51,450,000))$29,385,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for auto ferry vessel operating fuel in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, which reflect cost savings from a reduced biodiesel fuel requirement and, therefore, is contingent upon the enactment of section 703, chapter 472, Laws of 2023. The amount provided in this subsection represents the fuel budget for the purposes of calculating any ferry fare fuel surcharge. The department shall review future use of alternative fuels and dual fuel configurations, including hydrogen.(3) $500,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for operating costs related to moving vessels for emergency capital repairs. Funds may only be spent after approval by the office of financial management.(4) The department must work to increase its outreach and recruitment of populations underrepresented in maritime careers and continue working to expand apprenticeship and internship programs, with an emphasis on programs that are shown to improve recruitment for positions with the state ferry system.(5) $175,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to continue a study of passenger demographics. The study may be included as part of a larger origin and destination study. The department shall report study results to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023. Following completion of the study, the department must compare study results to the composition of groups outlined in RCW 47.60.310, both by overall representation of ferry riders and by route. A summary is due to the office of the governor and transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.(6) The department shall continue to oversee a consultant study to identify and recommend cost-effective strategies to maximize walk-on passenger ridership of the Anacortes â San Juan ferry routes. The study is due to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023. By December 1, 2024, any feasible near to medium term solutions identified from the study must be reported to the office of the governor and transportation committees of the legislature and include cost estimates for implementation.(7) (($16,973,000))$8,873,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for Washington state ferries to:(a) Provide scholarships, coursework fees, and stipends for candidates to become licensed deck officers (mates);(b) Improve the process for unlicensed candidates who have achieved able-bodied sailor (AB) status to earn their mate's license;(c) Annually hire, orient, train, and develop entry level engine room staff at the wiper classification with the intention of successfully promoting to oiler classification;(d) Create an operations project management office;(e) Increase human resources capacity to expand recruitment efforts including to communities currently underrepresented within the Washington state ferries, and add a workforce ombuds; and(f) Hire additional dispatch staff, or any other staff mandatory for system operations.(8) $169,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for hiring an additional service planner.(9)(a) During negotiations of the 2025-2027 collective bargaining agreements, the department must conduct a review and analysis of the collective bargaining agreements governing state ferry employees, to identify provisions that create barriers for, or contribute to creating a disparate impact on, newly hired ferry employees, including those who are women, people of color, veterans, and other employees belonging to communities that have historically been underrepresented in the workforce. The review and analysis must incorporate, to the extent practicable, the findings and recommendations from the December 2022 joint transportation committee study on Washington state ferries' workforce, and must also include, but not be limited to, provisions regarding seniority, work assignments, and work shifts. The review and analysis must also include consultation with the governor's office of labor relations, the governor's office of equity, and the attorney general's office.(b) For future negotiations or modifications of the collective bargaining agreements, it is the intent of the legislature that the collective bargaining representatives for the state and ferry employee organizations may consider the findings of the review and analysis required in (a) of this subsection and negotiate in a manner to remove identified barriers and address identified impacts so as not to perpetuate negative impacts.(10) $1,504,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 188, Laws of 2023 (state ferry workforce development issues). If chapter 188, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(11) $5,000,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for support of the Kitsap transit passenger ferry to supplement service on the Seattle-Bremerton route.(12) $100,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to assess temporary service restoration options for the Sidney, British Columbia route until Washington state ferries can resume its service. Washington state ferries must provide service options and recommendations to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 15, 2023.(13) $2,549,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for security services at Colman Dock.(14) $13,856,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for overtime and familiarization expenses incurred by engine, deck, and terminal staff. The department must provide updated staffing cost estimates for fiscal years 2024 and 2025 with its annual budget submittal and updated estimates by January 1, 2024.(15) $1,064,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for traffic control at ferry terminals at Seattle, Fauntleroy, Kingston, Edmonds, Mukilteo, and Bainbridge Island, during peak ferry travel times, with a particular focus on Sundays and holiday weekends.(16) $93,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Washington state ferries to secure housing for workforce training sessions and to pay in advance for the costs of transportation worker identification credentials, merchant mariner credentials, and medical examinations for incoming ferry system employees and trainees.(17) $10,417,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for vessel maintenance initiatives to:(a) Add a second shift at the Eagle Harbor maintenance facility;(b) Establish maintenance management project controls to maximize vessel maintenance work at the Eagle Harbor facility;(c) Expand the existing Washington state ferries Eagle Harbor apprenticeship program from two to eight apprentices; and(d) Maintain assets in a state of good repair by investing in enterprise asset management operating capacity.(18)(a) $855,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for Washington state ferries to provide to Seattle Central Community College for a pilot with the Seattle Maritime Academy for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium. Funding may not be expended until Washington state ferries certifies to the office of financial management that a memorandum of agreement with Seattle Central Community College has been executed, and the office of financial management determines that funds provided in this subsection are utilized for programs that are a benefit to the Washington state ferries or the prospective workforce pipeline of the Washington state ferries. The memorandum of agreement with Seattle Central Community College must address:(i) Prioritized use of training and other facilities and implementation of joint training opportunities for Washington state ferries' employees and trainees;(ii) Development of a joint recruitment plan with Seattle Central Community College aimed at increasing enrollment of women and people of color, with specific strategies to recruit existing community and technical college students, maritime skills center students, high school students from maritime programs, including maritime skills center students, foster care graduates, and former juvenile rehabilitation and adult incarcerated individuals; and(iii) Consultation between the parties on the development of the training program, recruitment plan and operational plan, with an emphasis on increasing enrollment of women and people of color.(b) The joint training and recruitment plan must be submitted to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023. The Washington state ferries must submit findings of program effectiveness and recommendations for continuation of the pilot, to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.(19) $420,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account appropriationâstate is provided solely for a contract with an organization with experience evaluating and developing recommendations for the Washington state ferries' workforce to provide expertise on short-term strategies including, but not limited to, addressing recruitment, retention, diversity, training needs, leadership development, and succession planning. The consultant shall provide additional assistance as deemed necessary by the Washington state ferries to implement recommendations from the joint transportation committee 2022 workforce study. Periodic updates must be given to the joint transportation committee and the governor.(20) By December 31st of each year, as part of the annual ferries division performance report, the department must report on the status of efforts to increase the staff available for maintaining the customary level of ferry service, including staff for deck, engine, and terminals. The report must include data for a 12-month period up to the most recent data available, by staff group, showing the number of employees at the beginning of the 12-month period, the number of new employees hired, the number of employees separating from service, and the number of employees at the end of the 12-month period. The department report on additional performance measures must include:(a) Numbers of trip cancellations due to crew availability or vessel mechanical issues;(b) Current level of service compared to the full-service schedules in effect in 2019; and(c) Retention rates of employees who have completed on the job workforce development programs and overall employee retention rates.(21) (($10,000,000))$5,000,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to increase deck and engine positions across the system, prioritizing positions that will mitigate crew related cancellations and reduce overtime expenditures. The department must include an update on the number of positions hired by job class as part of the annual performance report. The legislature intends to provide $16,000,000 on an ongoing basis to support additional crew efforts.(22) $500,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to evaluate options for the state to return to providing state passenger-only ferry service to support existing ferry service routes.(a) The study must focus on the routes recommended for further study by the 2020 study of passenger-only ferry service by the Puget Sound regional council as well as San Juan county interisland passenger-only ferry service. The department must contract with a third-party entity with experience in passenger-only ferry service.(b) The evaluation must study options for the state to return to providing state passenger-only ferry service to support existing ferry service routes. The study must include estimated ridership, operating costs including labor, vessel procurement options with prioritization given to clean fueled ferries such as electric ferries, funding options including state subsidies of passenger-only ferry districts, and schedule and timing to implement passenger-only ferry options in evaluated routes.(c) A progress report is due to the governor and transportation committees of the legislature by October 30, 2024. A final report is due to the governor and transportation committees of the legislature by June 1, 2025.(23) $100,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to reimburse walk-on customers for emergency expenses incurred as a result of a cancellation of the last sailing of the day. In consideration for receiving the reimbursement, an applicant must sign a release of claims drafted by the department. The department shall create a process for reimbursement and set a per diem limit for reimbursement per individual.(24) $3,170,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for temporary expanded weekday midday King county water taxi service support to and from Vashon Island.Sec. 920. 2024 c 310 s 223 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâRAILâPROGRAM YâOPERATINGCarbon Emissions Reduction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,250,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($83,043,000))Â Â Â Â Â $82,990,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâFederalAppropriation. . . .$1,335,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâPrivate/LocalAppropriation. . . .$46,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($86,674,000))Â Â Â Â Â $86,621,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The department shall continue to pursue restoring Amtrak Cascades service to pre-COVID service levels, and to the service levels committed to through the department's obligation of funding from the federal American recovery and reinvestment act. A status report must be provided to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management by September 1, 2023.(2)(a) $2,250,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the continued coordination, engagement, and planning for a new ultra high-speed ground transportation corridor with participation from Washington state, Oregon state, and British Columbia, and is a reappropriation of funds appropriated in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. For purposes of this subsection, "ultra high-speed" means a maximum testing speed of at least 250 miles per hour. These efforts are to support and advance activities and must abide by the memorandum of understanding signed by the governors of Washington and Oregon states, and the premier of the province of British Columbia in November 2021. The department shall establish a policy committee with participation from Washington state, Oregon state, and British Columbia, including representation from the two largest caucuses of each chamber of the Washington state legislature, and coordinate the activities of the policy committee to include:(i) Developing an organizational framework that facilitates input in decision-making from all parties;(ii) Developing a public engagement approach with a focus on equity, inclusion, and meaningful engagement with communities, businesses, federal, state, provincial, and local governments including indigenous communities;(iii) Developing and leading a collaborative approach to prepare and apply for potential future federal, state, and provincial funding opportunities, including development of strategies for incorporating private sector participation and private sector contributions to funding, including through the possible use of public-private partnerships;(iv) Beginning work on scenario analysis addressing advanced transportation technologies, land use and growth assumptions, and an agreed to and defined corridor vision statement; and(v) Developing a recommendation on the structure and membership of a formal coordinating entity that will be responsible for advancing the project through the project initiation stage to project development and recommended next steps for establishment of the coordinating entity. Project development processes must include consideration of negative and positive impacts on communities of color, low-income households, indigenous peoples, and other disadvantaged communities.(b) By June 30, 2024, the department shall provide to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature a high-level status update that includes, but is not limited to, the status of the items included in (a)(i) through (v) of this subsection.(c) By June 30, 2025, the department shall provide to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature a report detailing the work conducted by the policy committee and recommendations for establishing a coordinating entity. The report must also include an assessment of current activities and results relating to stakeholder engagement, planning, and any federal funding application. As applicable, the assessment should also be sent to the executive and legislative branches of government in Oregon state and appropriate government bodies in the province of British Columbia.(3) Consistent with the ongoing planning and service improvement for the intercity passenger rail program, $335,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâfederal appropriation is provided solely for the Cascades service development plan, to be used to analyze current and future market conditions and to develop a structured assessment of service options and goals based on anticipated demand and the results of the state and federally required 2019 state rail plan, including identifying implementation alternatives to meet the future service goals for the Amtrak Cascades route. The work must be consistent with federal railroad administration guidance and direction on developing service development plans, and must be completed by June 30, 2024.(4) The department shall continue to provide high quality intercity passenger rail service, align planning efforts for continued growth and on-time performance improvements consistent with federally recognized corridor development programs, and implement improvements consistent with planning efforts through leveraging federal funding opportunities. New passenger rail equipment is essential to service enhancements. The department shall make every effort to coordinate with service partners to prepare for the arrival of new trainsets and implementation of service enhancements. A status report must be provided to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management by December 1, 2024.(5) $500,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâfederal appropriation is provided solely for the Cascades corridor planning as part of the corridor identification and development program, in coordination with the Oregon state department of transportation. The department must continue to pursue funding opportunities for the Cascades corridor though the corridor identification and development program and the federal-state partnership programs at the federal rail administration. The department must notify the office of the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature of funding opportunities from the programs and any corresponding state match needs.(((6) $50,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to coordinate with partners on Amtrak long distance rail service.))Sec. 921. 2024 c 310 s 224 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâLOCAL PROGRAMSâPROGRAM ZâOPERATINGCarbon Emissions Reduction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$275,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($14,282,000))Â Â Â Â Â $14,266,000Motor Vehicle AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$2,567,000Multiuse Roadway Safety AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($1,230,000))Â Â Â Â Â $750,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,000,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($20,354,000))Â Â Â Â Â $19,858,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $500,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for development, administration, program management, and evaluation of the federal fund exchange pilot program.(2) $1,063,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department, from amounts set aside out of statewide fuel taxes distributed to counties according to RCW 46.68.120(3), to contract with the Washington state association of counties to:(a) Contract with the department of fish and wildlife to identify, inventory, and prioritize county-owned fish passage barriers;(b) Continue streamlining and updating the county road administration board's data dashboard, to provide a more detailed, more transparent, and user-friendly platform for data management, reporting, and research by the public and other interested parties;(c) Commission a study to develop guidance for county public works departments conducting environmental justice assessments in their communities and recommend best practices for community engagement plans to address environmental health disparities for identified overburdened communities;(d) Contract for a study to identify best practices within public works for the recruitment and retention of employees, including: Recommendations for improving outreach and recruitment to underrepresented populations, methods to partner with local community colleges and universities, methods to expand apprenticeship and internship programs, strategies to increase training and development opportunities, and recommendations for career advancement programs and better work-life balance outcomes;(e) Update the 2020 county transportation revenue study; and(f) By December 15, 2024, report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature the deliverables from and the amounts expended on the purposes enumerated in this subsection.(((4)))(3)(a) $200,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to develop the preliminary phase of an action plan for the establishment of cycle highways in locations that connect population centers and support mode shift.(b) The action plan may complement and incorporate existing resources, including the state trails database maintained by the recreation and conservation office, local and regional plans, and the state active transportation plan.(c) The action plan may also include, but is not limited to:(i) Recommended design; geometric and operational criteria and typologies appropriate to urban, suburban, and rural settings; settings that include shared use; and incremental approaches to achieve desired facility types;(ii) A model or methodology to project potential demand and carrying capacity based on facility quality, level of traffic stress, location, directness, land use, and other key attributes;(iii) Examination of the feasibility of developing high-capacity infrastructure for bicycle and micromobility device use within a variety of contexts and recommendations for pilot projects;(iv) Identification of key gaps in regional networks, including planned and aspirational routes and locations within three miles of high-capacity transit or existing shared-use paths and trails suitable for transportation;(v) Identification of legal, regulatory, financial, collaboration, and practical barriers to development and community acceptance and support of such facilities; and(vi) Recommended strategies to consider and address issues to avoid unintended consequences such as displacement, and to ensure equity in long-term development of such facilities.(d) The department must provide a report with its initial findings, and recommendations for next steps, to the transportation committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025.(((5)))(4) $750,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a grant program to support local initiatives that expand or establish civilian intervention programs for nonmoving violations, focusing on nonpunitive interventions such as helmet voucher programs, fee offset programs, fix-it tickets, and repair vouchers that provide solutions for vehicle equipment failures for low-income road users.(a) Grants must be awarded to local jurisdictions based on locally developed proposals to establish or expand existing programs, including programs with community led organizations. Eligible jurisdictions under the grant program include cities, counties, tribal government entities, tribal organizations, law enforcement agencies, or nonprofit organizations.(b) The department shall report on its website by December 1st of each year on the recipients, locations, and types of projects funded under this subsection.(((6)))(5) $146,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 428, Laws of 2023 (Wahkiakum ferry). If chapter 428, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(((7)))(6)(a) $50,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to examine the feasibility of creating a new budget program for the active transportation division, including, but not limited to, examining:(i) Estimated cost, new staffing needs, and time frame to establish the program;(ii) A proposed budget structure, and whether both operating and capital components should be established; and(iii) Identification of staff, capital projects, and other resources that would need to be transferred from other existing programs.(b) By December 1, 2024, the department shall report examination findings and recommendations to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature.(((8)))(7) $275,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to support Pierce, Skagit, Whatcom, and Wahkiakum county ferries with youth zero-fare policies.(((9)))(8) $500,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the city of Seattle department of transportation to create a digital conflict area awareness management program to provide machine-readable information for transportation operators, such as autonomous vehicle fleet operators, to be aware of conflict areas, such as emergency response zones, work zones, schools, pick up and drop off locations, and other areas where vulnerable road users may be present.(a) Program work must include:(i) The city of Seattle engaging with first responders and transportation management officials and other relevant stakeholders, to determine program implementation needs and processes; and(ii) A feasibility study of implementing the program's mobility and curb data specifications to include, but not be limited to, necessary partners, data platforms, ability to integrate real-time 911 dispatch, emergency vehicles, work zones, and other areas to reduce conflicts for transportation operators of autonomous vehicle fleets on public roads and in the right-of-way.(b) Program work must also be conducted in coordination and partnership with city of Seattle departments, the nonprofit steward of the program's mobility and curb data specifications, the Washington state department of transportation, and other entities potentially impacted by the implementation of the program.(c) As feasible, the city of Seattle shall prepare an implementation pilot of the program to make a standardized data feed available publicly for transportation operator use.(((d) The city of Seattle must provide a report on any findings and recommendations of the program and any implementation needs and process mapping for use by other jurisdictions to the Washington state department of transportation and the transportation committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025.(10)))(9) $150,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to fund one full-time equivalent liaison position within the local program multiagency permit program. Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the department shall work to enhance its multiagency permit program capabilities, with an emphasis on multiagency agreements that streamline, prioritize, and expedite project-level and programmatic permits and approvals. The department shall review current multiagency permit program practices and provide a report with recommendations on the enhancement of the program to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.(End of part)TRANSPORTATION AGENCIESâCAPITALSec. 1001. 2023 c 472 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARDSmall City Pavement and Sidewalk AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$3,975,000Transportation Improvement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($240,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $220,000,000Complete Streets Grant Program AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($14,670,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,670,000Move Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$9,333,000Climate Active Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($19,067,000))Â Â Â Â Â $16,567,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($287,045,000))Â Â Â Â Â $254,545,000Sec. 1002. 2024 c 310 s 301 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROLState Patrol Highway AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($7,888,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,531,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) (($7,888,000))$6,531,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the following projects:(a) $250,000 is for emergency repairs;(b) (($2,000,000))$1,443,000 is for roof replacements;(c) $350,000 is for fuel tank decommissioning;(d) (($500,000 is for generator and electrical replacement;(e) $500,000))$200,000 is for the exterior envelope of the Yakima office;(((f)))(e) $2,000,000 is for energy efficiency projects;(((g)))(f) $1,000,000 is for pavement surface improvements;(((h)))(g) $300,000 is for fire alarm panel replacement;(((i)))(h) $188,000 is for repairs at the Bellevue district office;(((j)))(i) $200,000 is for an academy master plan. As part of the academy master plan, the Washington state patrol must review and provide an analysis on the potential to colocate some training programs with other state agencies, including the department of corrections, the department fish and wildlife, the liquor and cannabis board, and the criminal justice training commission. The Washington state patrol must consult with the other state agencies to determine where cost efficiencies and mutually beneficial shared arrangements for training delivery could occur. The funding for this academy master plan is not a commitment to fund any components related to the expansion of the academy in the future;(((k)))(j) $500,000 reappropriation is for the Tacoma district office generator replacement project; and(((l)))(k) $100,000 reappropriation is for the energy improvement project at the SeaTac northbound facility.(2) The Washington state patrol may transfer funds between projects specified in subsection (1) of this section to address cash flow requirements.(3) If a project specified in subsection (1) of this section is completed for less than the amount provided, the remainder may be transferred to another project specified in subsection (1) of this section not to exceed the total appropriation provided in subsection (1) of this section after notifying the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature 20 days before any transfer.(4) By December 1, 2023, the Washington state patrol shall provide a report to the transportation committees of the legislature detailing utility incentives that will reduce the cost of heating, ventilating, and air conditioning systems funded in this section.(5) By December 1, 2023, the Washington state patrol shall provide its capital improvement and preservation plan for agency facilities to the appropriate committees of the legislature.Sec. 1003. 2024 c 310 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâFACILITIESâPROGRAM Dâ(DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS)âCAPITAL((Connecting Washington AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$3,000))Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($29,810,000))Â Â Â Â Â $15,352,000Move Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$12,011,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,200,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($43,024,000))Â Â Â Â Â $28,563,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $4,025,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for payments of a financing contract issued pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the department facility located at 15700 Dayton Ave N in Shoreline. All payments from the department of ecology pursuant to the agreement with the department to pay a share of the financing contract for this facility must be deposited into the motor vehicle account.(2)(a) $10,011,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to improve its ability to keep facility assets in a state of good repair. In using the funds appropriated in this subsection, the department, with periodic reporting to the joint transportation committee, must develop and implement a prioritization of facility capital preservation needs and repair projects. The legislature intends these to be reasonable, forward-thinking investments that consider potential future space efficiency measures and consolidations, including those assessed as having high commercial value and potential returns to state transportation funds associated with the sale of the property. Prioritization must be based on, but not limited to, the following criteria: (i) Employee safety and facility security; (ii) state and federal regulatory and statutory requirements and compliance issues, including clean buildings requirements; (iii) quality of work issues; (iv) facility condition assessment evaluations and scoring; (v) asset preservation; and (vi) amount of operational support provided by the facility to the achievement of the department's performance measures and outcomes, including facility utilization based on field operations work supported at the location. "Field operations" include maintenance, transportation operations, materials testing, and construction.(b) By October 15, 2024, covering the first 15 months of the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the department must provide a report based on the prioritization of facility preservation needs and repair projects developed pursuant to (a) of this subsection to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature. The report must include: (i) A by facility ranking based on the criteria implemented; (ii) detailed information on the actions taken in the previous period to address the identified issues and deficiencies; and (iii) the plan, by facility, to address issues and deficiencies for the remainder of the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium and the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.(c) The by facility ranking developed under (b) of this subsection must be the basis of an agency budget submittal for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.(3)(a) $1,200,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to evaluate safety rest areas along Interstate 5 and Interstate 90 for potential truck parking expansion opportunities. The department shall also evaluate commercial vehicle inspection locations, in coordination with the Washington state patrol, for potential truck parking expansion opportunities.(b) These evaluations must include assessments of opportunities to provide additional truck parking through rest stop and inspection location reconfiguration, expansion, and conversion, as well as evaluation of potential improvements to restroom facilities at weigh stations with truck parking. The department shall consider opportunities to expand rest stop footprints onto additional department-owned property, as well as opportunities to acquire property for rest stop expansion. Opportunities to convert a rest stop to a commercial vehicle-only rest stop must be considered if property is available to develop a new light-duty vehicle rest stop within a reasonable distance. The department shall include an evaluation of a potential truck parking site at John Hill Rest Area along the Interstate 90 corridor identified in the joint transportation committee's "Truck Parking Action Plan." Evaluations must include cost estimates for reconfiguration, expansion, and conversion, as well as other recommendations for the development of these sites.(c) The department should consult with the federal highway administration, the Washington state patrol, the Washington trucking association, the freight mobility strategic investment board, and local communities.(d) The department must update the transportation committees of the legislature on agency activities and their status by December 1, 2023, and to provide a final report to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.(4) (($15,457,000))$1,000,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for making improvements to the department facility located at 11018 NE 51st Cir in Vancouver to meet the Washington state clean buildings performance standard.(5)(a) $4,100,000 of the ((move ahead WA))motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for preliminary engineering and design associated with the demolition and replacement of the department's vehicle repair and parts building at 6431 Corson Avenue South in Seattle. The department must include any requested construction costs of the facility as a separate project as part of its agency budget submittal for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium utilizing form C-100 for capital projects. The design information must also include detailed information on square footage, components of the facility, and cost comparisons with similar maintenance facilities.(b) By September 1, 2024, the office of financial management, in consultation with the department, must develop criteria for preservation and improvement minor works lists for the department's facilities program. The criteria must incorporate, adjusted where appropriate, provisions already in use in the omnibus capital budget act for minor works, including: (i) The dollar limitation for each project to be included in the list; (ii) the types of projects appropriate to be included in the list; (iii) the project length limitation appropriate to be included in the list; and (iv) a recommended initial allotment, revision request approval, and revision notification process associated with the list. The criteria must be the basis of the preservation and improvement minor works list included in the agency budget submittal beginning with the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.(c) By September 1, 2024, the office of financial management, in consultation with the department, must also develop criteria for providing building related capital requests in a comparable format, adjusted where appropriate, to provisions already in use in the omnibus capital appropriations act for building projects, including the C-100 capital request form and other detail requirements for omnibus capital appropriations act building submissions.Sec. 1004. 2024 c 310 s 304 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâIMPROVEMENTSâPROGRAM IAlaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($23,794,000))Â Â Â Â Â $16,388,000Carbon Emissions Reduction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$250,000Climate Active Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($2,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,100,000Move Ahead WA AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$137,500,000State Route Number 520 Civil Penalties AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$10,000,000Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)âStateAppropriation. . . .$634,000Transportation Partnership AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($46,899,000))Â Â Â Â Â $94,330,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($100,366,000))Â Â Â Â Â $91,237,000Motor Vehicle AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($480,282,000))Â Â Â Â Â $342,563,000Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery FundâFederalAppropriation. . . .(($337,144,000))Â Â Â Â Â $282,810,000Motor Vehicle AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($74,115,000))Â Â Â Â Â $75,127,000Connecting Washington AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($1,960,374,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,120,407,000Special Category C AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($143,917,000))Â Â Â Â Â $138,199,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($14,311,000))Â Â Â Â Â $7,719,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâFederalAppropriation. . . .(($12,287,000))Â Â Â Â Â $480,000((State Route Number 520 Corridor AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$500,000))Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 ExpressToll Lanes AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($319,464,000))Â Â Â Â Â $295,220,000Move Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($737,961,000))Â Â Â Â Â $735,504,000Move Ahead WA AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($373,155,000))Â Â Â Â Â $272,554,000JUDY Transportation Future Funding Program AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$52,000,000Model Toxics Control Stormwater AccountâState. . . .(($15,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,437,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($4,841,703,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,678,459,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire connecting Washington accountâstate appropriation, the entire move ahead WA accountâfederal appropriation, the entire move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation, and the entire transportation partnership accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by fund, project, and amount in LEAP Transportation Document ((2024-1))2025-1 as developed ((March 6, 2024))April 26, 2025, Program - Highway Improvements Program (I). However, limited transfers of specific line-item project appropriations may occur between projects for those amounts listed subject to the conditions and limitations in section 601((, chapter 472, Laws of 2023))of this act.(2) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation and motor vehicle accountâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities listed in LEAP Transportation Document ((2024-2))2025-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((March 6, 2024))April 26, 2025, Program - Highway Improvements Program (I). Any federal funds gained through efficiencies, adjustments to the federal funds forecast, or the federal funds redistribution process must then be applied to highway and bridge preservation activities.(3) Within the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation and motor vehicle accountâfederal appropriation, the department may transfer appropriation authority between programs I and P, except for appropriation authority that is otherwise restricted in this act, as follows:(a) Ten days prior to any transfer, the department must submit its request to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature and consider any concerns raised.(b) The director of the office of financial management must first provide written authorization for such transfer to the department and the transportation committees of the legislature.(c) The department shall submit a report on appropriation authority transferred in the prior fiscal year using this subsection as part of the department's annual budget submittal.(4) The connecting Washington accountâstate appropriation includes up to $1,332,926,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.889.(5) The special category C accountâstate appropriation includes up to $111,106,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.812.(6) The transportation partnership accountâstate appropriation includes up to (($46,899,000))$8,860,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.873.(7) ((The appropriations in this section include savings due to anticipated project underruns; however, it is unknown which projects will provide savings. The legislature intends to provide sufficient flexibility for the department to manage to this savings target. To provide this flexibility, the office of financial management may authorize, through an appropriation modification, reductions in the amounts that are provided solely for a particular purpose within this section subject to the following conditions and limitations:(a) The department must confirm that any modification requested under this subsection of amounts provided solely for a specific purpose are not expected to be used for that purpose in this fiscal biennium;(b) Appropriation modifications authorized under this subsection may not result in increased funding for any project beyond the amount provided for that project in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium in LEAP Transportation Document 2024-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed March 6, 2024;(c) Appropriation modifications authorized under this subsection apply only to amounts appropriated in this section from the following accounts: Connecting Washington accountâstate, and move ahead WA accountâstate; and(d) The office of financial management must provide notice of appropriation modifications authorized under this subsection within 10 working days to the transportation committees of the legislature. By December 1, 2023, and December 1, 2024, the department must submit a report to the transportation committees of the legislature regarding the actions taken to date under this subsection.(8))) The department shall itemize all future requests for the construction of buildings on a project list and submit them through the transportation executive information system as part of the department's annual budget submittal. It is the intent of the legislature that new facility construction must be transparent and not appropriated within larger highway construction projects.(((9)))(8) The legislature continues to prioritize the replacement of the state's aging infrastructure and recognizes the importance of reusing and recycling construction aggregate and recycled concrete materials in our transportation system. To accomplish Washington state's sustainability goals in transportation and in accordance with RCW 70A.205.700, the legislature reaffirms its determination that recycled concrete aggregate and other transportation building materials are natural resource construction materials that are too valuable to be wasted and landfilled, and are a commodity as defined in WAC 173-350-100.(((10)))(9) By June 30, 2025, to the extent practicable, the department shall decommission the facilities for the Lacey project engineering office and the Tumwater project engineering office at the end of their lease terms and consolidate the Lacey project engineering office and the Tumwater project engineering office into the department's Olympic regional headquarters.(((11)))(10) The legislature intends that any savings realized on the following projects will not be attributable to the application of practical design, retired risk, or unused contingency funding for the purposes of RCW 47.01.480:(a) I-5/Marvin Road/SR 510 Interchange (L1100110); and(b) I-82/EB WB On and Off Ramps (L2000123).(((12)))(11)(a) (($337,114,000))$282,810,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fundâfederal appropriation, (($110,439,000))$31,405,000 of the motor vehicle accountâfederal appropriation, (($576,827,000))$525,187,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation, $191,807,000 of the connecting Washington accountâstate appropriation, and (($8,329,000))$217,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the Fish Passage Barrier Removal project (0BI4001) with the intent of fully complying with the federal U.S. v. Washington court injunction by 2030.(b) The fish passage barrier removal program, in consultation with the office of innovative partnerships, shall explore opportunities to employ innovative delivery methods to ensure compliance with the court injunction including, but not limited to, public-private partnerships and batched contracts. It is the intent of the legislature that appropriations for this purpose may be used to jointly leverage state and local funds for match requirements in applying for competitive federal aid grants provided in the infrastructure investment and jobs act for removals of fish passage barriers under the national culvert removal, replacement, and restoration program. State funds used for the purpose described in this subsection must not compromise full compliance with the court injunction by 2030.(c) The department shall coordinate with the Brian Abbott fish passage barrier removal board to use a watershed approach by replacing both state and local culverts guided by the principle of providing the greatest fish habitat gain at the earliest time. The department shall deliver high habitat value fish passage barrier corrections that it has identified, guided by the following factors: Opportunity to bundle projects, tribal priorities, ability to leverage investments by others, presence of other barriers, project readiness, culvert conditions, other transportation projects in the area, and transportation impacts. The department and Brian Abbott fish barrier removal board must provide updates on the implementation of the statewide culvert remediation plan to the legislature by November 1, 2023, and June 1, 2024.(d) The department must keep track of, for each barrier removed: (i) The location; (ii) the amount of fish habitat gain; and (iii) the amount spent to comply with the injunction.(e) During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the department shall provide reports of the amounts of federal funding received for this project to the governor and transportation committees of the legislature by November 1, 2023, and semiannually thereafter.(((13)))(12)(a) (($15,000,000))$4,437,000 of the model toxics control stormwater accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Stormwater Retrofits and Improvements project (L4000040). It is the intent of the legislature, over the 16-year move ahead WA investment program, to provide $500,000,000 for this program.(b) ((Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $6,000,000 is provided solely for the Urban Stormwater Partnership - I-5 Ship-Canal Bridge Pilot (Seattle) project.(c))) The funding provided for stormwater retrofits and improvements must enhance stormwater runoff treatment from existing roads and infrastructure with an emphasis on green infrastructure retrofits. Projects must be prioritized based on benefits to salmon recovery and ecosystem health, reducing toxic pollution, addressing health disparities, and cost-effectiveness. The department of transportation must submit progress reports on its efforts to reduce the toxicity of stormwater runoff from existing infrastructure, recommendations for addressing barriers to innovative solutions, and anticipated demand for funding each fiscal biennium.(((14)))(13)(a) (($25,067,000))$12,011,000 of the connecting Washington accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the SR 3 Freight Corridor (T30400R) project. The legislature intends to provide a total of $78,910,000 for this project, including an increase of $12,000,000 in future biennia to safeguard against inflation and supply/labor interruptions and ensure that:(i) The northern terminus remains at Lake Flora Road and the southern terminus at the intersection of SR 3/SR 302; and(ii) Multimodal safety improvements at the southern terminus remain in the project to provide connections to North Mason school district and provide safe routes to schools.(b) With respect to right-of-way acquisition and the construction of the SR 3 Freight Corridor project (T30400R), tribal consultation with the Suquamish tribe shall begin at the earliest stage of planning, including without limitation on all funding decisions and funding programs, to provide a government-to-government mechanism for the tribe to evaluate, identify, and expressly notify governmental entities of any potential impacts to tribal cultural resources, archaeological sites, sacred sites, fisheries, or other rights and interests in tribal lands and lands within which the tribe possesses rights reserved or protected by federal treaty, statute, or executive order. The consultation is independent of, and in addition to, any public participation process required under state law, or by a state agency, including the requirements of Executive Order 21-02 related to archaeological and cultural resources, and regardless of whether the agency receives a request for consultation from the Suquamish tribe. Regularly scheduled tribal consultation meetings with the Suquamish tribe shall continue throughout the duration of any funding or program decisions and proposed project approval.(((15) $6,000,000))(14) $384,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation and (($10,000,000))$3,342,000 of the move ahead WA accountâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the SR 3/Gorst Area - Widening project (L4000017). Tribal consultation with the Suquamish tribe must begin at the earliest stage of planning, including, without limitation, all funding decisions and funding programs, to provide a government-to-government mechanism for the tribe to evaluate, identify, and expressly notify governmental entities of any potential impacts to tribal cultural resources, archaeological sites, sacred sites, fisheries, or other rights and interests in tribal lands and lands within which the tribe possesses rights reserved or protected by federal treaty, statute, or executive order. The consultation is independent of, and in addition to, any public participation process required under state law, or by a state agency, including the requirements of Executive Order 21-02 related to archaeological and cultural resources, and regardless of whether the agency receives a request for consultation from the Suquamish tribe. Regularly scheduled tribal consultation meetings with the Suquamish tribe must continue throughout the duration of any funding program and proposed project approval.(((16)))(15)(a) $94,500,000 of the move ahead WA accountâfederal appropriation, $137,500,000 of the move ahead WA accountâprivate/local appropriation, and $43,000,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the I-5 Columbia river bridge project (L4000054). The legislature finds that the replacement of the I-5 Columbia river bridge is a project of national significance and is critical for the movement of freight. One span is now 105 years old, at risk for collapse in the event of a major earthquake, and no longer satisfies the needs of commerce and travel. Replacing the aging interstate bridge with a modern, seismically resilient, multimodal structure that provides improved mobility for people, goods, and services is a high priority. Therefore, the legislature intends to support the replacement of the I-5 Columbia river bridge with an investment of $1,000,000,000 over the 16-year move ahead WA investment program.(b) The legislature recognizes the importance of the I-5/Mill Plain Boulevard project (L2000099) and intends to provide funding for reconstruction of the existing interchange in coordination with construction of the Interstate 5 bridge over the Columbia river.(c) The department shall provide regular updates on the status of ongoing coordination with the state of Oregon on any bistate agreements regarding sharing of revenues, use of revenues, and fiscal responsibilities of each state. Prior to finalizing any such agreement, the department shall provide a draft of the agreement to the transportation committees of the legislature for review and input. Additionally, the department shall advise on the status of any bistate agreements to the joint transportation committee beginning in September 2023 and quarterly thereafter until any agreements are finalized.(((17) The legislature recognizes the importance of the US-12/Walla Walla Corridor Improvements project (T20900R) and intends to advance funding to provide matching funds if competitive federal funding is awarded for the final remaining four-lane section between Wallula and Nine Mile Hill. The department, in consultation with local governments in the vicinity, must pursue any federal funding available.(18) $2,642,000))(16) $94,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the US 101/Simdars Bypass project (L4000013).(((19) $338,512,000))(17) $343,674,000 of the connecting Washington accountâstate appropriation, (($3,109,000))$1,582,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation, (($27,201,000))$26,735,000 of the motor vehicle accountâprivate/local appropriation, (($178,543,000))$174,712,000 of the move ahead WA accountâfederal appropriation, (($36,370,000))$10,001,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation, and (($211,131,000))$161,680,000 of the motor vehicle accountâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the SR 167/SR 509 Puget Sound Gateway project (M00600R).(a) Any savings on the project must stay on the Puget Sound Gateway corridor until the project is complete.(b) In making budget allocations to the Puget Sound Gateway project, the department shall implement the project's construction as a single corridor investment. The department shall continue to collaborate with the affected stakeholders as it implements the corridor construction and implementation plan for state route number 167 and state route number 509. Specific funding allocations must be based on where and when specific project segments are ready for construction to move forward and investments can be best optimized for timely project completion. Emphasis must be placed on avoiding gaps in fund expenditures for either project.(c) The entire multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation in this subsection is for:(i) The design phase of the Puyallup to Tacoma multiuse trail along the state route number 167 right-of-way acquired for the project to connect a network of new and existing trails from Mount Rainier to Point Defiance Park; and(ii) Segment 2 of the state route number 167 completion project shared-use path to provide connections to the interchange of state route number 167 at 54th to the intersection of state route number 509 and Taylor Way in Tacoma.(((20)))(18) $2,213,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation and $14,012,000 of the connecting Washington accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the SR 224/Red Mountain Vicinity Improvement project (L1000291). The department shall provide funding to the city of West Richland to complete the project within the project scope identified by the legislature and within the total amount provided by the legislature. The department shall not amend the project's scope of work to add pavement preservation on state route number 224 from the West Richland city limits to Antinori Road.(((21) $409,667,000))(19) $363,020,000 of the connecting Washington accountâstate appropriation, (($500,000 of the state route number 520 corridor accountâstate appropriation,)) $10,000,000 of the state route number 520 civil penalties accountâstate appropriation, $52,000,000 of the JUDY transportation future funding program accountâstate appropriation, and $5,592,000 of the motor vehicle accountâprivate/local appropriation are provided solely for the SR 520 Seattle Corridor Improvements - West End project (M00400R) and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(a) The department shall immediately proceed with awarding the bid for the Portage Bay Bridge and Roanoke Lid project to the team that submitted the proposal with the apparent best value in September 2023. Consistent with negotiated timelines, the legislature expects the award to be made by March 15, 2024, and assumes that the department shall expedite executing the contract with the awarded team. Once the contract is executed for this project, the department shall seek consequential cost reduction opportunities through value engineering and prioritizing functionality and usability of the Portage Bay Bridge and Roanoke Lid. The department shall report on the status of the project and cost reduction efforts to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 15, 2024.(b) Upon completion of the Montlake Phase of the West End project, the department shall sell or transfer that portion of the property not necessary for transportation purposes, and shall initiate a process to convey or transfer such portion of the surplus property to a subsequent owner.(c) ((Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $500,000 of the state route number 520 corridor accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for noise mitigation activities. It is the intent of the legislature to provide an additional $600,000 for noise mitigation activities.(d))) Pursuant to chapter 281, Laws of 2024, the department shall apply for a sales tax deferral for construction work on the SR 520 Seattle Corridor Improvements - West End project (M00400R).(((22) $450,000))(20) $391,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation ((is))and $5,562,000 of the motor vehicle accountâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the SR 900 Safety Improvements project (L2021118). The department must: (a) Work in collaboration with King county and the Skyway coalition to align community assets, transportation infrastructure needs, and initial design for safety improvements along state route number 900; and (b) work with the Skyway coalition to lead community planning engagement and active transportation activities.(((23)))(21) $7,500,000 of the motor vehicle accountâfederal appropriation is provided solely for a federal fund exchange pilot program. The pilot program must allow exchanges of federal surface transportation block grant population funding and state funds at an exchange rate of 95 cents in state funds per $1.00 in federal funds. The projects receiving the exchanged federal funds must adhere to all federal requirements, including the applicable disadvantaged business enterprise goals. The entirety of the appropriation in this subsection must be held in unallotted status until surface transportation block grant population funding has been offered to the state, and the department determines that a federalized project or projects funded in this section is eligible to spend the surface transportation block grant population funding. $7,125,000 from existing state appropriations identified elsewhere within this section are available to be used as part of the exchange. Upon determination that a project or projects funded in this section is eligible to spend the offered surface transportation block grant population funding, state funds appropriated in this section for the eligible state project or projects in an amount equal to 100 percent of the offered surface transportation block grant population funding must be placed in unallotted status. The legislature intends to evaluate the utility and efficacy of the pilot program in the 2025 legislative session while reappropriating any remaining funds into the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium. Therefore, the department may issue additional calls for projects with any remaining funds provided in this subsection.(((24) $9,593,000))(22) $9,195,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation((, $552,000 of the connecting Washington accountâstate appropriation,)) and (($209,000))$584,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the SR 522/Paradise Lk Rd Interchange & Widening on SR 522 (Design/Engineering) project (NPARADI), specifically for design of, preliminary engineering, and right-of-way acquisition for the interchange and widening as a single project. The department must consider reserving portions of state route number 522, including designated lanes or ramps, for the exclusive or preferential use of public transportation vehicles, privately owned buses, motorcycles, private motor vehicles carrying not less than a specified number of passengers, or private transportation provider vehicles pursuant to RCW 47.52.025.(((25)))(23) Prior to initiating new advertisements or requests for qualifications for the following projects: SR 9/Marsh Road to 2nd Street Vicinity (N00900R), SR 526 Corridor Improvements (N52600R), US 395 North Spokane Corridor (M00800R), and SR 18 - Widening - Issaquah/Hobart Rd to Raging River - Phase 1 (L1000199), the capital projects advisory review board shall review the planned procurement methods for these projects. The board shall provide recommendations on procurement methods to the office of financial management, the department, and the transportation committees of the legislature for project L1000199 by July 1, 2024, and projects N52600R, N00900R, and M00800R by December 1, 2024. After the board provides recommendations, the department may initiate new advertisements and requests for qualifications, incorporating the recommendations as appropriate.The department shall structure the advertisements, requests for qualifications, and requests for proposals, for projects referenced in this subsection, in a manner that provides a high degree of certainty that bids come in as expected according to engineer estimates made through the cost estimate valuation process. The department may request bid offers with alternatives for components of a larger project so that the department may present to the legislature modified options for projects to minimize project delays and stay within appropriated funding resources. If alternatives provided are at or below the engineer estimates, the department may proceed with the project award.((If bid proposals exceed engineer estimates by more than five percent or $10,000,000, the department shall report this information to the transportation committees of the legislature within two weeks of receiving the bid proposals, and pause award and contract execution.(26)))(24) $750,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Grady Way Overpass at Rainier Avenue South I-405 BRT Access study (L1000333).(((27) $1,804,000))(25) $270,000 of the connecting Washington accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the SR 164 East Auburn Access project (L1000120). The department must work with the Muckleshoot tribe to deliver the project.(((28)))(26) $250,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for preliminary engineering of the SR 14/Camas Slough Bridge project (L1000352). Funds may be used for predesign environmental assessment work, community engagement, design, and project cost estimation.(((29) $1,000,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for matching funds for the department to apply to the federal highway administration's wildlife crossings pilot program, in the 2024 grant application cycle, for wildlife crossing underpasses on U.S. 97 between Tonasket and Riverside.(30) $1,800,000))(27) $1,720,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation and (($12,287,000))$480,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the department to develop and implement a technology-based truck parking availability system along the Interstate 5 corridor in partnership with Oregon state and California state to maximize utilization of existing truck parking capacity and deliver real-time parking availability information to truck drivers (L1000375). The department may use a portion of the appropriation in this subsection for grant proposal development and as state match funding for technology-based truck parking availability system federal grant applications. The department must update the transportation committees of the legislature on agency activities and their status by December 1, 2023, and provide a final report to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.(((31)))(28) $1,000,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the design on the I-5 Fort Lewis weigh station and SR 906 Phase 3 truck parking improvements (L1000377).(((32)))(29) The legislature intends to provide $4,950,000 in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium for additional truck parking improvements (((L1000376))). As part of the department's 2025-2027 budget submittal, the department and the freight mobility strategic investment board, after consulting with appropriate entities, must provide a list of specific truck parking solutions within the amounts provided in this subsection (((32))). The list may also include additional funding recommendations beyond this amount for more immediate expansion of truck parking capacity, as well as for long-term expansion of truck parking capacity.Sec. 1005. 2024 c 310 s 305 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâPRESERVATIONâPROGRAM PMove Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($105,219,000))Â Â Â Â Â $101,593,000Recreational Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$769,000Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)âStateAppropriation. . . .$70,411,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($154,960,000))Â Â Â Â Â $142,494,000Motor Vehicle AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$560,102,000Motor Vehicle AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($17,010,000))Â Â Â Â Â $13,121,000Connecting Washington AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($48,726,000))Â Â Â Â Â $48,910,000State Route Number 520 Corridor AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($7,434,000))Â Â Â Â Â $9,092,000Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($12,202,000))Â Â Â Â Â $9,811,000Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($1,662,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,213,000Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 ExpressToll Lanes AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($15,183,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,702,000Transportation Partnership AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$12,036,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,005,714,000))Â Â Â Â Â $978,254,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire connecting Washington accountâstate appropriation, the entire move ahead WA accountâfederal appropriation, the entire move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation, and the entire transportation partnership accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by fund, project, and amount in LEAP Transportation Document ((2024-1))2025-1 as developed ((March 6, 2024))April 26, 2025, Program - Highway Preservation Program (P). However, limited transfers of specific line-item project appropriations may occur between projects for those amounts listed subject to the conditions and limitations in section 601((, chapter 472, Laws of 2023))of this act.(2) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation and motor vehicle accountâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities listed in LEAP Transportation Document ((2024-2))2025-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((March 6, 2024))April 26, 2025, Program - Highway Preservation Program (P). Any federal funds gained through efficiencies, adjustments to the federal funds forecast, or the federal funds redistribution process must then be applied to highway and bridge preservation activities.(3) Within the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation and motor vehicle accountâfederal appropriation, the department may transfer appropriation authority between programs I and P, except for appropriation authority that is otherwise restricted in this act, as follows:(a) Ten days prior to any transfer, the department must submit its request to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature and consider any concerns raised.(b) The director of the office of financial management must first provide written authorization for such transfer to the department and the transportation committees of the legislature.(c) The department shall submit a report on appropriation authority transferred in the prior fiscal year using this subsection as part of the department's annual budget submittal.(4) ((The transportation partnership accountâstate appropriation includes up to $3,280,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.873.(5) $22,000,000))$9,500,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for extraordinary costs incurred from litigation awards, settlements, or dispute mitigation activities not eligible for funding from the self-insurance fund (L2000290). The amount provided in this subsection must be held in unallotted status until the department submits a request to the office of financial management that includes documentation detailing litigation-related expenses. The office of financial management may release the funds only when it determines that all other funds designated for litigation awards, settlements, and dispute mitigation activities have been exhausted.(((6)))(5) Within the connecting Washington accountâstate appropriation, the department may transfer funds from Highway System Preservation (L1100071) to other preservation projects listed in the LEAP transportation document identified in subsection (1) of this section, if it is determined necessary for completion of these high priority preservation projects. The department's next budget submittal after using this subsection must appropriately reflect the transfer.(((7)))(6) By June 30, 2025, to the extent practicable, the department shall decommission the facilities for the Lacey project engineering office and the Tumwater project engineering office at the end of their lease terms and consolidate the Lacey project engineering office and the Tumwater project engineering office into the department's Olympic regional headquarters.(((8)))(7) The appropriations in this section include funding for starting planning, engineering, and construction of the Elwha River bridge replacement. To the greatest extent practicable, the department shall maintain public access on the existing route.(((9)))(8) $7,500,000 of the motor vehicle accountâfederal appropriation is provided solely for a federal fund exchange pilot program. The pilot program must allow exchanges of federal surface transportation block grant population funding and state funds at an exchange rate of 95 cents in state funds per $1.00 in federal funds. The projects receiving the exchanged federal funds must adhere to all federal requirements, including the applicable disadvantaged business enterprise goals. The entirety of the appropriation in this subsection must be held in unallotted status until surface transportation block grant population funding has been offered to the state and the department determines that a federalized project or projects funded in this section is eligible to spend the surface transportation block grant population funding. $7,125,000 from existing state appropriations identified elsewhere within this section are available to be used as part of the exchange. Upon determination that a project or projects funded in this section is eligible to spend the offered surface transportation block grant population funding, state funds appropriated in this section for the eligible state project or projects in an amount equal to 100 percent of the offered surface transportation block grant population funding must be placed in unallotted status. The legislature intends to evaluate the utility and efficacy of the pilot program in the 2025 legislative session while reappropriating any remaining funds into the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium. Therefore, the department may issue additional calls for projects with any remaining funds provided in this subsection.(((10) $21,000 of motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 54, Laws of 2023 (bridge jumping signs) (G2000114).(11) $4,319,000 of the move ahead Washington accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for SR 525 Bridge Replacement - Mukilteo (L2021084). Of the amounts in this subsection, $155,000 must be transferred to the city of Mukilteo for purposes of community planning and business engagement.))(9) The appropriations in this section include funding for the following projects:(a) SR 241/Mabton Bridge;(b) SR 112 Preservation and Maintenance;(c) SR 155/Omak Bridge Rehabilitation;(d) SR 4/Abernathy Creek Bridge - Replace Bridge;(e) SR 525 Bridge Replacement - Mukilteo;(f) Land Mobile Radio (LMR) Upgrade;(g) SR 104/Port Angeles Graving Dock Settlement and Remediation; and(h) Bridge Jumping Signs.Sec. 1006. 2024 c 310 s 306 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâTRANSPORTATION OPERATIONSâPROGRAM QâCAPITALMotor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($10,606,000))Â Â Â Â Â $10,538,000Motor Vehicle AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($12,226,000))Â Â Â Â Â $12,768,000Motor Vehicle AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$500,000Move Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$611,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($23,943,000))Â Â Â Â Â $24,417,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) (($5,547,000))$5,548,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation, (($8,830,000))$8,465,000 of the motor vehicle accountâfederal appropriation, and $500,000 of the motor vehicle accountâprivate/local appropriation are provided solely for Programmatic Investment for Traffic Operations Capital projects (000005Q). By December 15th of each odd-numbered year, the department shall provide a report to the legislature listing all traffic operations capital project investments completed in the prior fiscal biennium.(2) $3,080,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to construct pedestrian signals at nine locations on state route number 7 from 124th Street South to 189th Street South (0000YYY).(3) $1,463,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the replacement of 22 existing traffic cameras and installation of 10 new traffic cameras, including five pole installation sites, on the Interstate 90 corridor between mileposts 34 and 82 (L2021144). The department shall consult with news media organizations to explore options to allow such organizations access to traffic camera feeds.Sec. 1007. 2024 c 310 s 307 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâWASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTIONâPROGRAM WCarbon Emissions Reduction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($116,021,000))Â Â Â Â Â $111,527,000Move Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($49,828,000))Â Â Â Â Â $32,674,000Puget Sound Capital Construction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($388,304,000))Â Â Â Â Â $351,678,000Puget Sound Capital Construction AccountâFederalAppropriation. . . .(($87,047,000))Â Â Â Â Â $72,199,000Puget Sound Capital Construction AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($2,150,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,636,000Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)âStateAppropriation. . . .$472,000Transportation Partnership AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($9,705,000))Â Â Â Â Â $7,446,000Connecting Washington AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($21,883,000))Â Â Â Â Â $12,874,000((Capital Vessel Replacement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$21,688,000))TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($697,098,000))Â Â Â Â Â $590,506,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed in LEAP Transportation Document ((2024-2))2025-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((March 6, 2024))April 26, 2025, Program - Washington State Ferries Capital Program (W).(2) (($24,260,000))$25,135,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for emergency capital repair costs (999910K). Funds may only be spent after approval by the office of financial management.(3) (($21,688,000 of the capital vessel replacement))$18,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the acquisition of a 144-car hybrid-electric vessel (((L2000329)))(L2021073). The amounts provided in this subsection are contingent upon the enactment of chapter 429, Laws of 2023. (4) ((Beginning January 1, 2025, $11,554,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for construction of the first hybrid electric Olympic class vessel (L2000329).(5) $1,500,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Future Hybrid Electric Ferry Class Pre-Design study (L2021131) to advance procurement of a new class of vessel that will account for changes in technology, staffing, and system needs. The department shall initiate a vessel predesign to replace the aging Issaquah class ferries with a new automobile hybrid electric ferry intended to operate on the Vashon Southworth-Fauntleroy route. The predesign study must include a review of the benefits and costs of constructing all future new vessels based on the same design. The review may also compare and contrast the benefits and costs of utilizing the existing hybrid electric Olympic class vessel design.(6) $8,032,000))$2,032,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for modernization of the ticketing and reservation system (990052C). ((Of this amount, $3,032,000 must be held in unallotted status until Washington state ferries has consulted with the office of the chief information officer on the project scope and integration capabilities of the reservation system with existing Good to Go! and ORCA next generation products, and reported results to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature.(7) $125,000))(5) $302,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction accountâstate appropriation and (($125,000))$302,000 of the Puget sound capital construction accountâfederal appropriation are provided solely for development of a terminal wait times information system (998609A). Washington state ferries must consult with the office of the chief information officer on a technology solution for automated vehicle detection, and report the project scope, along with office of the chief information officer recommendations, to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.(((8) The transportation partnership accountâstate appropriation includes up to $7,195,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.873.(9)))(6) For the purposes of ferry and terminal electrification, the department must apply to the department of ecology for additional competitive grant funds available from Volkswagen settlement funds, and report on the status of the grant application by December 1, 2023.(((10)))(7) For the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the marine division shall provide to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature a report for ferry capital projects in a manner consistent with past practices as specified in section 308, chapter 186, Laws of 2022.(((11) Beginning January 1, 2025, $6,175,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for construction of hybrid electric vessels (L2021073).(12) Beginning January 1, 2025, $24,265,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for terminal electrification (L1000341).))Sec. 1008. 2024 c 310 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâRAILâPROGRAM YâCAPITALCarbon Emissions Reduction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($114,800,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,968,000Essential Rail Assistance AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($1,412,000))Â Â Â Â Â $570,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($697,000))Â Â Â Â Â $384,000Move Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,500,000Move Ahead WA Flexible AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($33,500,000))Â Â Â Â Â $20,968,000((Multimodal Transportation AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$12,000))Transportation Infrastructure AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($16,621,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,826,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($101,403,000))Â Â Â Â Â $46,222,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâFederalAppropriation. . . .(($25,903,000))Â Â Â Â Â $19,525,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($295,848,000))Â Â Â Â Â $98,963,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by project and amount in LEAP Transportation Document ((2024-2))2025-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((March 6, 2024))April 26, 2025, Program - Rail Program (Y).(2)(a) $2,680,000 of the transportation infrastructure accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for new low-interest loans approved by the department through the freight rail investment bank (FRIB) program. The department shall issue FRIB program loans with a repayment period of no more than 15 years, and charge only so much interest as is necessary to recoup the department's costs to administer the loans. The department shall report annually to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management on all FRIB loans issued.(b) The department may change the terms of existing loans in the essential rail assistance account for repayment of loans, including the repayment schedule and rate of interest, for a period of up to 15 years for any recipient with a total loan value in the program of over 10 percent as of June 30, 2023.(3) (($5,000,000 of the transportation infrastructure accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a low-interest loan for the Port of Longview Rail Corridor Expansion project (L1000347) to accommodate current and future port cargo-handling needs. The low-interest loan must comply with the requirements of RCW 47.76.460(2).(4) $7,567,000))$4,861,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for new statewide emergent freight rail assistance projects identified in the LEAP transportation document referenced in subsection (1) of this section.(((5)))(4) $369,000 of the transportation infrastructure accountâstate appropriation and $1,100,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for final reimbursement to Highline Grain, LLC for approved work completed on Palouse River and Coulee City (PCC) railroad track in Spokane county between the BNSF Railway Interchange at Cheney and Geiger Junction and must be administered in a manner consistent with freight rail assistance program projects.(((6)))(5) The department shall issue a call for projects for the freight rail assistance program, and shall evaluate the applications in a manner consistent with past practices as specified in section 309, chapter 367, Laws of 2011. By November 15, 2024, the department shall submit a prioritized list of recommended projects to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature.(((7) $25,000,000))(6) $500,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation ((is))and $5,000,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâfederal appropriation are provided solely for state match contributions to support the department's application for federal grant opportunities for a new ultra high-speed ground transportation corridor. These funds are to remain in unallotted status and are available only upon award of federal funds. The department must provide periodic grant application updates to the transportation committees of the legislature, as well as anticipated state match estimates for successful grants.(((8) $33,500,000))(7) $20,968,000 of the move ahead WA flexible accountâstate appropriation ((is))and $6,900,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâfederal appropriation are provided solely for rehabilitation of the Palouse River and Coulee City Railroad (L4000079). Up to $433,000 of the amount in this subsection may be used for management and oversight of operation and maintenance activities.(((9) $19,990,000))(8) $4,155,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâfederal appropriation is provided solely for the rehabilitation of the Salmon Bay drawbridge (752010A) to ensure the efficient movement of freight and passenger trains.(((10) $6,300,000))(9) $1,023,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to fund a zero emission drayage truck demonstration project (L1000324) at Northwest Seaport Alliance facilities.(((11) $14,000,000))(10) $500,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation((, and beginning January 1, 2025, $14,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation, are))is provided solely to fund a zero emission shore power infrastructure demonstration project at Northwest Seaport Alliance facilities (L1000325). Local funds sufficient to fully fund this project must be contributed to the project, and any agreements required for the project must be secured.(((12) $5,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to fund the replacement of two Tacoma rail diesel-electric switcher locomotives with zero emission battery-electric switcher locomotives and to install on-site charging equipment at a Tacoma rail facility (L1000327). Local funds sufficient to fully fund this project must be contributed to the project, and any agreements required for the project must be secured.(13)))(11) $150,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the application of durable markings along state route number 906 to create up to 20 parking spaces for larger vehicles, including trucks (L1000336).(((14) $26,500,000))(12) $300,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for port electrification competitive grants (L2021182). All public ports are eligible to receive funds under this subsection. A port seeking to use funds under this subsection to install shore power must adopt a policy that requires vessels that dock at the port facility to use shore power if such vessel is capable of using such power and when such power is available at the port facility. (((15) $2,000,000))(13) $1,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for port electrification at the port of Bremerton (L1000337), which may include the purchase and installation of zero emission port shore power systems and other zero emission infrastructure, equipment, and technology.(((16) $500,000))(14) $145,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation((, and beginning January 1, 2025, $1,500,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation, are))is provided solely for port electrification at the port of Anacortes (L1000338), which may include the purchase and installation of zero emission port shore power systems and other zero emission infrastructure, equipment, and technology.(((17) $2,000,000))(15) $1,307,000 of the transportation infrastructure accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Port of Quincy Rail Infrastructure Expansion project (L1000348), an expansion of rail infrastructure within the Port of Quincy's current rail terminal and to nearby industrial zoned properties in the port district.(((18) Beginning January 1, 2025, $20,000,000))(16) $500,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Puyallup Tribe Port Electrification project (L1000346).Sec. 1009. 2024 c 310 s 309 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâLOCAL PROGRAMSâPROGRAM ZâCAPITALCarbon Emissions Reduction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($53,944,000))Â Â Â Â Â $12,582,000Climate Active Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($169,442,000))Â Â Â Â Â $107,431,000Freight Mobility Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($21,847,000))Â Â Â Â Â $16,460,000Freight Mobility Multimodal AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($27,216,000))Â Â Â Â Â $17,704,000((Highway Infrastructure AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,060,000Highway Infrastructure AccountâFederalAppropriation. . . .$1,500,000))Move Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($117,033,000))Â Â Â Â Â $20,824,000Move Ahead WA Flexible AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($34,500,000))Â Â Â Â Â $11,500,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($31,785,000))Â Â Â Â Â $17,318,000Motor Vehicle AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($129,698,000))Â Â Â Â Â $98,263,000Motor Vehicle AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$35,000,000Connecting Washington AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($117,410,000))Â Â Â Â Â $38,118,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($142,372,000))Â Â Â Â Â $74,201,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($882,807,000))Â Â Â Â Â $449,401,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by project and amount in LEAP Transportation Document ((2024-2))2025-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((March 6, 2024))April 26, 2025, Program - Local Programs Program (Z).(2) The amounts identified in the LEAP transportation document referenced under subsection (1) of this section for pedestrian safety/safe routes to school are as follows:(a) (($47,707,000))$27,707,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation and (($43,058,000))$27,686,000 of the climate active transportation accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for pedestrian and bicycle safety program projects (L2000188 and L1000335). Of the amount of climate active transportation account funds appropriated in this subsection, up to one percent may be used for program administration and staffing.(b) (($31,553,000))$26,020,000 of the motor vehicle accountâfederal appropriation, (($45,399,000))$24,260,000 of the climate active transportation accountâstate appropriation, and (($21,157,000))$15,586,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for safe routes to school projects (L2000189 and L1000334). Of the amount of climate active transportation account funds appropriated in this subsection, up to one percent may be used for program administration and staffing.(c) For future rounds of grant selection, the department must reevaluate the criteria to increase geographic diversity of jurisdictions consistent with the requirements of the healthy environment for all (HEAL) act.(3) The department shall submit a report to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023, and December 1, 2024, on the status of projects funded as part of the pedestrian safety/safe routes to school grant program and the Sandy Williams connecting communities grant program.(4) (($12,792,000))$8,436,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for connecting Washington bicycle and pedestrian projects listed in the LEAP transportation document referenced in subsection (1) of this section.(5) (($46,580,000))$35,278,000 of the motor vehicle accountâfederal appropriation is provided solely for acceleration of local preservation projects that ensure the reliable movement of freight on the national highway freight system (G2000100). The department will select projects as part of its update of the state freight plan, in consultation with the freight mobility strategic investment board and other stakeholders.(6) (($7,125,000))$1,750,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a federal fund exchange pilot program. The pilot program will allow exchanges of federal surface transportation block grant population funding and state funds at an exchange rate of 95 cents in state funds per $1.00 in federal funds. The entirety of the appropriation in this subsection must be held in unallotted status until: Surface transportation block grant population funding has been offered to the state, the department determines that a federalized project or projects funded in section ((305 or 306, chapter 472, Laws of 2023))1004 or 1005 of this act is eligible to spend the surface transportation block grant population funding, and state funds appropriated in section ((305 or 306, chapter 472, Laws of 2023))1004 or 1005 of this act for the eligible state project or projects in an amount equal to 100 percent of the offered surface transportation block grant population funding have been placed in unallotted status. A report on the effectiveness of the exchange program, the total estimated cost of program administration, and recommendations for continuing the pilot program is due to the governor and transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024. The legislature intends to evaluate the utility and efficacy of the pilot program in the 2025 legislative session while reappropriating any remaining funds into the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium. Therefore, the department may issue additional calls for projects with any remaining funds provided in this subsection.(7) (($136,893,000))$40,684,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation and (($25,000,000))$9,600,000 of the move ahead WA flexible accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for new move ahead WA road and highway projects listed in LEAP Transportation Document ((2024-2))2025-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((March 6, 2024))April 26, 2025, Program - Local Programs Program (Z).(a) For projects funded in this subsection, the department expects to have substantial reappropriations for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the department may, on a pilot basis, apply funding from a project with an appropriation that is unable to be used in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium to advance one or more of the projects listed in LEAP Transportation Document ((2024-2))2025-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((March 6, 2024))April 26, 2025, Program - Local Programs Program (Z), prioritizing projects first by project readiness.(i) In instances when projects listed in the LEAP transportation documents referenced in (a) of this subsection are no longer viable or have been completed, the department may recommend in its next budget submittal alternative project proposals from the local jurisdictions if the project is similar in type and scope and consistent with limitations of certain funds provided. In the event that the listed project has been completed the local jurisdictions may, rather than submitting an alternative project, instead be reimbursed in the year in which it was scheduled for documented costs incurred implementing the listed project, not in excess of the amount awarded from the funding program.(ii) At least 10 business days before advancing or swapping a project pursuant to this subsection, the department must notify the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature. The advancement of a project may not hinder the delivery of the projects for which the reappropriations are necessary for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium.(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, (($25,493,000))$3,551,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for three roundabouts to be constructed on state route number 507 in partnership with local authorities (L1000330). The roundabout at Vail is with Thurston county, the roundabout at Bald Hills is with the city of Yelm, and the roundabout at state route number 702 is with Pierce county. The department is to work cooperatively with each local jurisdiction to construct these facilities within department rights-of-way. The department must provide all project predesign and design information developed to date to the local jurisdictions and have a project implementation agreement in place with each local jurisdiction within 180 calendar days of the effective date of this act. The implementation agreement may provide full control for the local authority to construct the project. Once the roundabouts are completed, the operations and maintenance of the roundabouts are the responsibility of the department. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, (($7,000,000))$1,205,000 is for the roundabout at Vail road and state route number 507.(c) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $15,000,000 of the move ahead Washington accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Columbia River Bridge Replacement/Hood River to White Salmon project (L4000046). The office of financial management shall place the amounts in this subsection in unallotted status. As funds are appropriated by the Oregon legislature, the office of financial management may release amounts provided in this subsection to match Oregon appropriations.(8) (($39,185,000))$21,885,000 of the climate active transportation accountâstate appropriation, (($11,600,000))$500,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation, $1,550,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation, and (($3,000,000))$500,000 of the move ahead WA flexible accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for move ahead WA pedestrian and bike projects listed in LEAP Transportation Document ((2024-2))2025-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((March 6, 2024))April 26, 2025, Program - Local Programs Program (Z). For projects funded in this subsection, if the department expects to have substantial reappropriations for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the department may, on a pilot basis, apply funding from a project with an appropriation that is unable to be used in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium to advance one or more of the projects listed in LEAP Transportation Document ((2024-2))2025-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((March 6, 2024))April 26, 2025, Program - Local Programs Program (Z), prioritizing projects first by tier then by project readiness.(a) In instances when projects listed in the LEAP transportation document referenced in this subsection (8) of this section are no longer viable or have been completed, the department may recommend in its next budget submittal alternative project proposals from the local jurisdictions if the project is similar in type and scope and consistent with limitations of certain funds provided. In the event that the listed project has been completed the local jurisdictions may, rather than submitting an alternative project, instead be reimbursed in the year in which it was scheduled for documented costs incurred implementing the listed project, not in excess of the amount awarded from the funding program.(b) At least 10 business days before advancing or swapping a project pursuant to this subsection, the department must notify the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature. The advancement of a project may not hinder the delivery of the projects for which the reappropriations are necessary for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium.(9) $16,800,000 of the climate active transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the statewide school-based bicycle education grant program (L1000309). The department may partner with a statewide nonprofit to deliver programs.(10) (($25,000,000))$16,800,000 of the climate active transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Sandy Williams connecting communities pilot program (L1000308) to deliver projects to reconnect communities that have been bifurcated by state highways. Priority must be given to historically marginalized or overburdened communities. The department may consult with the Cooper Jones active transportation safety council to identify geographic locations where there are high incidences of serious injuries and fatalities of active transportation users among vulnerable populations.(11) (($14,000,000))$1,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation((, and beginning January 1, 2025, $10,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation, are))is provided solely for the Guemes Ferry Boat Replacement project (L4000124).(12) (($6,500,000))$1,400,000 of the move ahead WA flexible accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for development of an applied sustainable aviation evaluation center (L2021135). Snohomish county, in partnership with Washington State University, shall plan and establish facilities to evaluate, qualify or certify, and research technologies that can minimize the impact of aviation on human health and the environment. Funds may be used for, but are not limited to, planning, construction, and land acquisition for sustainable aviation fuel (SAF) qualification testing (ASTM D4054), research on the impact of SAF on the environment and human health, and SAF storage for the purpose of advancing sustainable aviation. At a minimum, three sustainable aviation platforms must be considered:(a) Sustainable aviation fuel (SAF);(b) Hydrogen; and(c) Battery electric energy storage mechanisms.(13) The legislature intends to fund the Ballard and Magnolia Bridge project (L4000123), as described in section 911(18) ((and (19))), chapter 472, Laws of 2023.(14) (($200,000))$30,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Seattle office of planning and community development to update and add to the 2020 I-5 Lid Feasibility Study with additional test cases with ramp changes and removals in downtown Seattle and alternative assumptions with regards to parking, expansion of Freeway Park, affordable housing, and commercial real estate (L2021140). The Seattle office of planning and community development shall conduct ongoing community engagement with underrepresented constituencies to support the technical work of this study and raise public awareness of opportunities of I-5 lids. Focus should be given to low-income households living and working in the I-5 lid study areas in central Seattle.(15) (($1,000,000))$500,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to award grants to local jurisdictions to implement network-wide traffic conflict screening programs using video analytics in controlled intersections with a disproportionate number of traffic violations and injuries to active transportation users (L2021149). Grants must be awarded proportionally across the state and include controlled intersections in both urban and rural environments and along state highways and county roads. Grant recipients must report back to the department all traffic violation and active transportation facility data acquired during the grant period and provide the department with appropriate next steps for the state and the local jurisdiction to improve traffic safety for active transportation users in such intersections. The department must report such findings and recommendations to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.(16)(a)(i) $5,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to establish a program for providing rebates to qualifying persons who purchase e-bikes and qualifying equipment and services from a qualifying retailer. Of this amount, $3,000,000 is for rebate amounts as described under (a)(iii)(A) of this subsection, and $2,000,000 is for rebate amounts as described under (a)(iii)(B) of this subsection.(ii) To qualify for and use the rebate under this subsection, a person must be a resident of Washington state and purchase an e-bike and qualifying equipment and services, if any, from a qualifying retailer in this state. Qualifying equipment and services must be purchased as part of the same transaction as the e-bike.(iii)(A) For persons who are at least 16 years of age and reside in households with incomes at or below 80 percent of the county area median income, the amount of the rebate is up to $1,200 on the sale of an e-bike and any qualifying equipment and services.(B) For all other persons who are at least 16 years of age, the amount of the rebate is up to $300 on the sale of an e-bike and any qualifying equipment and services.(C) No more than one rebate may be awarded per household.(iv)(A) The department must establish application procedures for e-bike retailers to participate in the rebate program, and application and award procedures for applicants to participate in the program. If an applicant qualifies for a rebate amount and there is sufficient funds to award the applicant with the appropriate rebate amount, the department must provide the qualifying individual the rebate amount in a format that can be redeemed at the time of purchase at a qualifying retailer.(B) An applicant must provide contact information, including a physical address, email address, and phone number, and demographic information, including the applicant's age, gender, race, and ethnicity, to the department on a form provided by the department at the time of applying for the rebate. The department may share or provide access to such information with the University of Washington to provide the University of Washington an opportunity to ask program applicants and recipients to fill out a survey collecting information only to the extent to inform its report described under (d) of this subsection.(v) A qualifying retailer must register with the department before participating in the rebate program. A qualifying retailer must:(A) Verify the identity of the qualifying individual at the time of purchase; and(B) Calculate and apply the rebate at the time of purchase.(vi) The department must reimburse a qualifying retailer that accepts a rebate from a qualifying individual no later than 30 days after the rebate is redeemed.(vii) For purposes of this subsection (16)(a):(A) "E-bike" means an electric assisted bicycle as defined in RCW 46.04.169, but does not include mountain bikes.(B) "Qualifying equipment and services" means a bicycle helmet, safety vest, bicycle light, or bicycle lock, and any maintenance or other services agreed upon by the qualifying retailer and qualifying individual at the time of purchase.(C) "Qualifying retailer" means a retail business establishment with one or more physical retail locations in this state that provides on-site e-bike sales, service, and repair and has registered with the department to participate in the rebate program established under this subsection.(b) For fiscal year 2025, (($2,000,000))$432,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to establish an e-bike lending library and ownership grant program. The department may accept grant applications from other state entities, local governments, and tribes that administer or plan to administer an e-bike lending library or ownership program for their employees for commute trip reduction purposes. The department may also accept grant applications from nonprofit organizations or tribal governments that serve persons who are low-income or reside in overburdened communities and that administer or plan to administer an e-bike lending library or ownership program for qualifying persons. Grant recipients must report program information and participation data to the University of Washington to inform its report described under (d) of this subsection.(c) It is the intent of the legislature that funding provided in (a) and (b) of this subsection continue to be appropriated in the 2025-2027 and 2027-2029 fiscal biennia.(d) Of the amounts provided in this subsection (16), $90,000 is for the department to contract with the University of Washington's sustainable transportation lab to publish a general policy brief that provides innovative e-bike rebate and lending library or ownership grant program models and recommendations, a report on survey results based on data and demographic information collected under the e-bike rebate program established in (a) of this subsection, and a report on program information and data collected under the e-bike lending library and ownership grant program established in (b) of this subsection. An initial brief and report must be submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature by July 1, 2024, with the final policy brief and report due to the transportation committees of the legislature by ((July 1, 2025))December 1, 2025.(e) The department may not collect more than five percent of appropriated amounts to administer the programs under (a) and (b) of this subsection.(17) (($21,847,000))$16,460,000 of the freight mobility investment accountâstate appropriation and (($27,216,000))$17,704,000 of the freight mobility multimodal accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for freight mobility strategic investment board projects listed in the LEAP transportation document referenced in subsection (1) of this section.(18) (($4,150,000))$1,660,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for matching funds for federal funds to reconstruct Grant county and Adams county bridges as part of the Odessa groundwater replacement program (L1000322).(19) (($9,240,000))$9,100,000 of the connecting Washington accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Aberdeen US 12 Highway-Rail Separation project (L1000331).(20) The appropriations in this section include savings due to anticipated project underruns; however, it is unknown which projects will provide savings. The legislature intends to provide sufficient flexibility for the department to manage to this savings target. To provide this flexibility, the office of financial management may authorize, through an appropriation modification, reductions in the amounts that are provided solely for a particular purpose within this section subject to the following conditions and limitations:(a) The department must confirm that any modification requested under this subsection of amounts provided solely for a specific purpose are not expected to be used for that purpose in this fiscal biennium;(b) Appropriation modifications authorized under this subsection may not result in increased funding for any project beyond the amount provided for that project in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium in LEAP Transportation Document ((2024-2))2025-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((March 6, 2024))April 26, 2025;(c) Appropriation modifications authorized under this subsection apply only to amounts appropriated in this section from the following accounts: Connecting Washington accountâstate, and move ahead WA accountâstate; and(d) The office of financial management must provide notice of appropriation modifications authorized under this subsection within 10 working days to the transportation committees of the legislature. By December 1, 2023, and December 1, 2024, the department must submit a report to the transportation committees of the legislature regarding the actions taken to date under this subsection.(21) (($5,000,000))$2,000,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to assist local jurisdictions in addressing emergent issues related to safety for pedestrians and bicyclists (LXXXPBF). Funds may only be spent after approval from the office of financial management. By December 15th of each odd-numbered year, the department shall provide a report to the legislature listing all emergent issues addressed in the prior fiscal biennium. Reporting may be done in conjunction with the transportation operations division.(22) ((Beginning January 1, 2025, $22,944,000))$6,150,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the following projects identified in LEAP Transportation Document ((2024-2))2025-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((March 6, 2024))April 26, 2025:(a) North Aurora Safety Improvements (L4000154);(b) North Broadway Pedestrian Bridge (L2021082);(c) ((State Route 547 Pedestrian and Bicycle Safety Trail (Kendall Trail) (L4000144);(d))) 72nd Ave & Washington Ave Active Transportation Components (L2021194);(((e)))(d) Bluff Trail Hood River to White Salmon (L2021199);(((f)))(e) Columbia Heights Safety Improvements (L2021195);(((g)))(f) La Center Pac. Hwy Shared Use Path (L2021196);(((h)))(g) SR 240/Aaron Dr Complete Streets Improvements (L2021193);(((i)))(h) View Ridge Safe Routes to Schools (L1000342);(((j)))(i) 84th Ave NE Pedestrian and Bicycle Project (L1000366);(((k)))(j) Communities for a Health Bay electric boat (L1000368);(((l)))(k) SR 303 Warren Ave Bridge Pedestrian Improvements (L2000339); and(((m) SR 520 & 148th NE Bicycle/Pedestrian Crossing))(l) Overlake Area Bicycle/Pedestrian Improvements (L2021047).(End of part)TRANSFERS AND DISTRIBUTIONSSec. 1101. 2024 c 310 s 403 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE TREASURERâSTATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTIONMotor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation: For motorvehicle fuel tax statutory distributions tocities and counties. . . .(($461,954,000))Â Â Â Â Â $451,996,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation: For distribution to cities andcounties. . . .$26,786,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation: Fordistribution to cities and counties. . . .$23,438,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($512,178,000))Â Â Â Â Â $502,220,000Sec. 1102. 2024 c 310 s 404 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE TREASURERâTRANSFERSMotor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation: For motorvehicle fuel tax refunds and statutorytransfers. . . .(($1,955,782,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,913,772,000Sec. 1103. 2024 c 310 s 405 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSINGâTRANSFERSMotor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation: For motorvehicle fuel tax refunds and transfers. . . .(($253,180,000))Â Â Â Â Â $205,018,000Sec. 1104. 2024 c 310 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE TREASURERâBOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND DEBT TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE ACCOUNT AND TRANSPORTATION FUND REVENUETransportation Partnership AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($221,000))Â Â Â Â Â $14,000Connecting Washington AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($4,531,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,169,000Special Category C AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($444,000))Â Â Â Â Â $123,000Highway Bond Retirement AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($1,475,218,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,474,853,000Ferry Bond Retirement AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$4,616,000Transportation Improvement Board Bond RetirementAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$10,305,000Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$28,262,000Toll Facility Bond Retirement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$76,372,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,599,969,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,596,714,000Sec. 1105. 2024 c 310 s 407 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE TREASURERâBOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR DEBT TO BE PAID BY STATUTORILY PRESCRIBED REVENUEToll Facility Bond Retirement AccountâFederalAppropriation. . . .$192,490,000Toll Facility Bond Retirement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($26,562,000))Â Â Â Â Â $26,955,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($219,052,000))Â Â Â Â Â $219,445,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $35,250,000 of the toll facility bond retirement accountâfederal appropriation may be used to prepay certain outstanding bonds if sufficient debt service savings can be obtained.Sec. 1106. 2024 c 310 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE TREASURERâBOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES AND FISCAL AGENT CHARGESTransportation Partnership AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($46,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,000Connecting Washington AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($1,017,000))Â Â Â Â Â $541,000Special Category C AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($95,000))Â Â Â Â Â $31,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,158,000))Â Â Â Â Â $577,000Sec. 1107. 2024 c 310 s 406 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE TREASURERâADMINISTRATIVE TRANSFERS(1) Transportation Partnership AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Motor VehicleAccountâState. . . .$175,000,000(2) Connecting Washington AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Move Ahead WAAccountâState. . . .(($200,000,000))$95,000,000(3) Electric Vehicle AccountâState appropriation:For transfer to the Move Ahead WA FlexibleAccountâState. . . .$29,200,000(4) Electric Vehicle AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the MultimodalTransportation AccountâState. . . .$32,730,000(5) Washington State Aviation AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the AeronauticsAccountâState. . . .$150,000(6) Carbon Emissions Reduction AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Climate ActiveTransportation AccountâState. . . .(($178,885,000))$112,748,000(7) Carbon Emissions Reduction AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Climate TransitPrograms AccountâState. . . .(($408,000,000))$374,110,000(8) Carbon Emissions Reduction AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Puget Sound FerryOperations AccountâState. . . .$4,200,000(9) ((Move Ahead WA Flexible AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Move Ahead WAAccountâState. . . .$100,000,000(10))) Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement ProjectAccountâState Appropriation: For transfer to theMotor Vehicle AccountâState. . . .(($25,000,000))$37,992,000(((11)))(10) Highway Safety AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the State Patrol HighwayAccountâState. . . .(($84,000,000))$74,000,000(((12)))(11)(a) Transportation PartnershipAccountâState Appropriation: For transfer to theTacoma Narrows Toll Bridge AccountâState. . . .$6,611,000(b) It is the intent of the legislature that this transfer is temporary, for the purpose of minimizing the impact of toll increases. An equivalent reimbursing transfer is to occur after the debt service and deferred sales tax on the Tacoma Narrows bridge construction costs are fully repaid in accordance with chapter 195, Laws of 2018.(((13)))(12) Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation:For transfer to the State Patrol HighwayAccountâState. . . .$1,500,000(((14)))(13) Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation:For transfer to the County Arterial PreservationAccountâState. . . .$4,844,000(((15)))(14) Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation:For transfer to the Freight Mobility InvestmentAccountâState. . . .$8,511,000(((16)))(15) Motor Vehicle AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Rural ArterialTrust AccountâState. . . .$4,844,000(((17)))(16) Motor Vehicle AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the TransportationImprovement AccountâState. . . .$9,688,000(((18)))(17)(a) State Route Number 520 Civil PenaltiesAccountâState Appropriation: For transfer to the MotorVehicle AccountâState. . . .$1,000,000(b) The transfer in this subsection is to repay moneys loaned to the state route number 520 civil penalties account in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium.(((19)))(18) State Route Number 520 Civil PenaltiesAccountâState Appropriation: For transfer to theState Route Number 520 Corridor AccountâState. . . .(($560,000))$308,000(((20)))(19)(a) Capital Vessel ReplacementAccountâState Appropriation: For transfer to theConnecting Washington AccountâState. . . .$29,000,000(b) It is the intent of the legislature that this transfer is temporary, for the purpose of minimizing the use of bonding in the connecting Washington account.(((21)))(20) Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Complete StreetsGrant Program AccountâState. . . .$14,670,000(((22)))(21) Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Highway SafetyAccountâState. . . .(($3,000,000))$21,000,000(((23)))(22) Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Motor VehicleAccountâState. . . .$15,000,000(((24)))(23) Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Freight MobilityMultimodal AccountâState. . . .$8,511,000(((25)))(24) Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Move Ahead WA FlexibleAccountâState. . . .$11,790,000(((26)))(25) Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Puget Sound CapitalConstruction AccountâState. . . .$175,000,000(((27)))(26) Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Puget SoundFerry Operations AccountâState. . . .$90,500,000(((28)))(27) Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Regional MobilityGrant Program AccountâState. . . .$27,679,000(((29)))(28) Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Rural MobilityGrant Program AccountâState. . . .$12,223,000(((30)))(29) Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the State Patrol HighwayAccountâState. . . .$59,000,000(((31)))(30)(a) Alaskan Way Viaduct ReplacementProject AccountâState Appropriation: For transfer tothe Transportation Partnership AccountâState. . . .(($47,899,000))$76,899,000(b) $22,899,000 of the amount transferred in this subsection represents repayment of debt service incurred for the construction of the SR 99/Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement project (809936Z).(((32)))(31) Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Motor VehicleAccountâState. . . .$543,000(((33)))(32)(a) General Fund AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the State Patrol HighwayAccountâState. . . .$625,000(b) The state treasurer shall transfer the funds only after receiving notification from the Washington state patrol under section 207, chapter 472, Laws of 2023.(((34)))(33) Puget Sound Ferry Operations AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Puget Sound CapitalConstruction AccountâState. . . .$121,828,000(((35)))(34) Move Ahead WA AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Puget Sound FerryOperations AccountâState. . . .$120,000,000(((36)))(35) Advance Right-Of-Way Revolving FundâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the JUDY TransportationFuture Funding Program AccountâState. . . .$40,000,000(((37)))(36) Transportation Infrastructure AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Essential Rail Assistance AccountâState. . . .$1,000,000(((38)))(37) Regional Mobility Grant Program AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the MultimodalTransportation AccountâState. . . .$6,098,000(((39) Move Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation:For transfer to the Motor Vehicle AccountâState. . . .$50,000,000))(38) Move Ahead WA AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Puget Sound CapitalConstruction AccountâState. . . .$48,000,000(39) Move Ahead WA AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the TransportationPartnership AccountâState. . . .$78,000,000(40) Move Ahead WA AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Transportation2003 Account (Nickel Account)âState. . . .$13,500,000(End of part)MISCELLANEOUS 2023-2025 FISCAL BIENNIUMNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1201. A new section is added to 2024 c 310 (uncodified) to read as follows:The appropriations to the department of transportation in chapter 472, Laws of 2023, chapter 310, Laws of 2024, and this act must be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in chapter 472, Laws of 2023, chapter 310, Laws of 2024, and this act. However, after May 1, 2025, unless specifically prohibited, the department may transfer state appropriations for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium among operating programs after approval by the director of the office of financial management. However, the department shall not transfer state moneys that are provided solely for a specific purpose. The department shall not transfer funds, and the director of the office of financial management shall not approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state funds and not federal funds. The director of the office of financial management shall notify the appropriate transportation committees of the legislature before approving any allotment modifications or transfers under this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1202. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) 2023 c 472 s 601 (uncodified);(2) 2024 c 310 s 108 (uncodified); and(3) 2024 c 310 s 501 (uncodified).Sec. 1203. 2024 c 310 s 502 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: TRANSIT, BICYCLE, AND PEDESTRIAN ELEMENTS REPORTINGBy November 15th of each year, the department of transportation must report on amounts expended to benefit transit, bicycle, or pedestrian elements within all connecting Washington projects in programs I, P, and Z identified in LEAP Transportation Document ((2024-2))2025-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((March 6, 2024))April 26, 2025, in a manner consistent with past practices as specified in section 602, chapter 186, Laws of 2022.Sec. 1204. 2024 c 310 s 503 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: LOCAL PARTNER COOPERATIVE AGREEMENTS(1) If a transportation project, where the Washington state department of transportation is the lead and the project is scheduled to be delivered or completed in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium as shown on the LEAP Transportation Document ((2024-2))2025-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((March 6, 2024))April 26, 2025, is in jeopardy of being delayed because the department is unable to deliver or complete the project within the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium and other local jurisdictions are able to deliver or complete the work, the department must coordinate with the appropriate local jurisdictions to determine if a potential local partner is ready, willing, and able to execute delivery and completion of the project within the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium.(2) The department must compile a list of projects under this section, including the timing under which the local partner agency can deliver or complete the projects within the 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 fiscal biennia. The department must submit the compiled list of projects to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by November 1, 2023.(End of part)MISCELLANEOUSNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1301. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1302. Except for section 723 of this act, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.(End of part)--- END ---